(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“The only other person in the world who could understand the position they were in was each other.””
“...she was affected by a horrible and scarring bout of small pox...”
“The actress, 28, earned her first Oscar nomination in 2017 for her performance as Tonya Harding in I, Tonya.”
“She’s back in contention this year for embodying Queen Elizabeth I opposite Saoirse Ronan as Mary Stuart in the drama, from House of Cards writer Beau Willimon.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In a scene from director Josie Rourke’s film, exclusive to PEOPLE, Robbie stars as a young Elizabeth, urging her suitor for many years, Robert Dudley (Joe Alwyn), to pursue Mary, who has returned to Scotland to claim her throne.”
““Do not ask this of me,” Dudley pleads with Elizabeth.”
““If you wed her, she is ours,” Elizabeth says.”
““Marry the beautiful queen of Scots and we can control her.”
“With Mary you too can become prince Image zoom Margot Robbie in Mary Queen of Scots Credit Focus Features Robbie shared recently with Harper s Bazaar that her costars were often intimidated when she was in costume as Elizabeth I especially when she played the Queen in the years after...”


"The only people in the world who can understand their situation are each other."
“… She was infected by a terrible and scarred smallpox... "
"The 28 year old actress won her first Oscar nomination in 2017 for her role as Tonya Harding in me, Tonya."
This year, she was once again targeted for her role as Queen Elizabeth I and Mary Stewart, saorse Ronan's rival, in the play of house of cards screenwriter Bo willimont
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
In a scene in director Josie Locke's film "the exclusive of man", Robbie plays a young Elizabeth, who has been urging her suitor Robert Dudley (Joe Alvin) to pursue Mary for many years. Mary has returned to Scotland to inherit the throne
"Don't ask me that," Dudley pleaded with Elizabeth
Elizabeth said, "if you marry her, she will be ours."
"Marry the beautiful queen of Scotland and we can control her."
"With Mary, you can also become a prince image zooming Marguerite Robbie in Scotland Queen Mary credit focus feature. Robbie shares recent fairs with Harper, and her partners are often intimidated when she dresses Elizabeth I, especially when she plays queen in a few years later..."



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Brb just going to watch the film one more time.”
“Also how ridiculous is their cover of the classic HSM ballad?”
“We well as long as they’re not faking it now then that’s totally fine, because they've now actually transformed in Sharpay and Ryan only without the mean streaks.”
“PHEW.”
“After we wrapped though I’ve always had a love for you, you are literally like my twin brother,’ Ashley lovingly continued.”
“‘I think I was definitely a lot like Sharpay and was like who is this person?”
“‘We did not get off on the best foot,’ Lucas adds.”
“We hated each other, I’m not kidding,’ Ash said of when they first met.”
“We were not good friends, lets be honest.”
“‘We were not close.”


"I just want to see the movie again."
"And how ridiculous are their classic HSM folk covers?"
"We're good, as long as they don't pretend now, that's all right, because they've really changed with Sharpay and Ryan now, but they don't have those mean winning streak."
"Bah."
"I've always loved you since we broke up, but you're just like my twin brother," Ashley continued affectionately
"I think I must be very much like Sharpay, like who is this man?"
Lucas added: "our performance is not the best."
"We hate each other, I'm not kidding," ash said of their first meeting
"To be honest, we are not good friends."
"We're not close."



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...has gone to Beyonce Alicia Keys Lorde and Amy Winehouse...”
“Yet those two words became a misleading focus of the real problem which is the low number of female nominees on the ballot despite an unprecedentedly diverse slate of nominees in terms of race and musical genre and despite a powerful MeToo themed performance from Kesha and speech from Janelle...”
“...overcome the explicit barriers and unconscious biases that impede female advancement in the music community While details were scarce at press time and a letter calling for Portnow s resignation signed by a group of female music industry senior executives arrived just minutes after the announcement arrived the organization promised...”
“...more information in the coming weeks...”
“Portnow’s letter follows in full:“To The Music Community…“After hearing from many friends and colleagues, I understand the hurt that my poor choice of words following last Sunday’s Grammy telecast has caused.”
“I also now realize that it’s about more than just my words.”
“Because those words, while not reflective of my beliefs, echo the real experience of too many women.”
“I’d like to help make that right.”
““The Recording Academy is establishing an independent task force to review every aspect of what we do as an organization and identify where we can do more to overcome the explicit barriers and unconscious biases that impede female advancement in the music community.”
“We will also place ourselves under a microscope and tackle whatever truths are revealed.”


“… To Beyonce Alicia case Lord and Amy Winehouse... "
"However, these two words have become a misleading focus of the real problem, that is, despite the unprecedented diversity of nominees' lists in terms of race and music types, and despite the strong performance of Katha's metoo theme and Janel's speech, the number of female nominees in the vote is very small..."
“…… To overcome the obvious obstacles and unconscious prejudices that hinder women's progress in the music industry, and the details were not enough when the reporter issued the manuscript, a letter signed by a group of female music executives demanding portno's resignation arrived a few minutes after the announcement of the organization's commitment arrived... "
“… More information will be available in the coming weeks... "
The full text of portno's letter is as follows: "to the music world..." After listening to many letters from friends and colleagues, I understand the harm caused by my poor choice of words after the Grammy TV broadcast last Sunday
"I also realize now that it's not just my words."
"Because though these words can't reflect my faith, they echo the real experience of too many women."
"I want to help you correct that."
"The academy is setting up an independent working group to review every aspect of what we do as an organization and to determine where we can do more to overcome the obvious barriers and unconscious biases that hinder women's progress in music."
"We will also put ourselves under a microscope to study any truth that is revealed."



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Coming up with ways to honor people s love for something and give them new things to love is a great Christmas thing to do While there are moments that are lifted straight from the film such as frozen pole licking that makes inventive use of vacuum technology there are...”
“This is an additive experience, not a replacement experience,” Cary says.”
“Rudolph previously told EW that live performance gives her more “adrenaline” and “energy,” but otherwise this broadcast is “another animal.”Armisen echoes these sentiments, saying, “It’s different, but it helps a lot.”
“I love it.”The live experience of SNL will no doubt come in handy when it comes to bringing a live musical to television.”
“It’s the best.”
““It’s just, you pick right up and start talking away.”
““Every time I see an SNL alum, it’s like seeing a friend from high school,” Armisen tells EW of the experience working with Gasteyer and Rudolph.”
“Armisen brings his droll humor to one of the film’s more iconic moments as an intimidating elf.”
“Rudolph and Gasteyer in particular get to show off their chops as triple-threat performers, dancing and singing in ways that will delight and surprise fans.”
“...honorable mention for appearing on a fictional version of SNL on 30 Rock...”


"It's a great Christmas to come up with some ways to express people's love for something and give them new love, and some moments are directly mentioned from the movies, such as freezing rod licking, which creatively uses vacuum technology, and..."
"It's an additional experience, not an alternative experience," Cary said
Rudolph previously told the Wall Street Journal that the live performance gave her more "adrenaline" and "energy", but in addition, the broadcast was "another animal". "It's different, but it helps a lot," he said
"I love it." SNL's live experience will undoubtedly be useful for live musicals on TV
"It's the best."
"It's just that you answer the phone right away and start talking."
"Every time I see an SNL alumni, it's like seeing a high school friend," amison told reporters about working with Gastel and Rudolph
"Amison brings his humor to a more iconic moment in the film, playing a daunting elf."
"Rudolph and Gastel are especially able to show their ribs as triple threat performers. Their dancing and singing style will make fans happy and surprised."
“… The honorary award for appearing in 30 rock band's SNL novel... "



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“2018 Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez Stun One Amazing Year After Debut as a Couple Exclusive This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors...”
“RELATED CONTENT Jennifer Lopez Says She d Want a More Intimate Proposal Than One on the Red Carpet Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez Reflect on Amazing Year Since Their Met Gala Debut Exclusive Jennifer Lopez Shows Off Her Toned Abs While Out in Miami With Boyfriend Alex Rodriguez Met Gala...”
“Rodriguez called the year “awesome,” while Lopez agreed, saying it had been an “amazing year.”Watch the video below to hear more of what they shared.”
“ET caught up with Lopez and her boyfriend, Alex Rodriguez, at Monday's glamorous Met Gala, where they dished about their time together since their public debut.”
“Watch the epic dance-off below, which also featured a hilarious duet.”
“Naturally, the World of Dance judge proved that no matter what song was chosen, she couldn't be bested!”
“On his end, Fallon shimmied to "Babe" by Styx.”
“Dressed in a body-hugging red gown with sequins and a thigh-high slit, J.Lo took the stage first and danced to "Three Times a Lady" by Commodores and then to Richard Harris' "MacArthur Park."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"In 2018, when Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez made their exclusive debut as lovers, they surprised the audience one year later, because we can't upload information from the sponsors, so this video is not available..."
"Related content: Jennifer Lopez says she wants a more intimate proposal than on the red carpet. Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez look back on their amazing year since their debut at a blind date party. Exclusive Jennifer Lopez showed off her strong ABS on a blind date with her boyfriend Alex Rodriguez in Miami..."
Rodriguez called the year "fantastic", while Lopez agreed, calling it "amazing". Watch the video below and listen to more information they share
"Et met Lopez and her boyfriend Alex Rodriguez at the glamorous metropolitan party on Monday, where they talked about their time together after their debut."
"Watch the epic dance below, including a funny duet."
"Naturally, the judges in the dance industry have proved that no matter which song they choose, she can't be defeated!"
"On his side, Fallon swayed in the Styx and became a" baby. "
Wearing a tight red robe with sequins and high thigh slits, Luo Guancong took the stage and danced to brigadier general's three ladies and Richard Harris's MacArthur park



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If I had a gun, I thought, I would shoot you,” she writes.”
“One time he hit me, and I looked right in his face.”
“Cookies, chips.”
“I’d sneak food to eat in the bathroom.”
“I’d get up in the middle of the night and eat.”
“Food was my only happiness.”“And so, I began to hide my eating.”
“We had lived with a lack of food for so long that when it was there, I felt like I had to eat it before it disappeared.”
“He joked about putting a lock on the refrigerator.”
“My mother was always at work, so she didn’t see how he treated me.”“My body seemed to offend him, but he couldn’t help but stare, especially when I was eating.”
“Me, not so much.”


"If I had a gun, I thought, I would shoot you," she wrote
"Once he hit me, I looked him in the face."
"Biscuits, chips."
"I'll sneak food to the bathroom."
"I get up in the middle of the night to eat."
"Food is my only pleasure." "So I started hiding my food."
"We have been living in an environment where food is scarce for a long time. When it appears, I feel that I have to eat it before it disappears."
"He joked about locking the fridge."
"My mother is always at work, so she doesn't know how he treats me." "My body seems to offend him, but he can't help staring at me, especially when I eat."
"I don't like it very much."



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'Jersey Shore: Family Vacation' is all set to return to MTV on August 23.ÂYou can watch the season 2 teaser below.Â”
“In the small teaser, viewers see Vinny Gaudagnino getting slapped and also get a glimpse of a "wedding".”
“...she added.”
“Daddy and Mommy can't wait to meet you Christopher John you are going to be the most spoiled little boy ever!!!!"”
“We have a sweet little boy on the way!Â We Are truly blessed and our hearts are filled with so much joy and happiness," she continued.Â December can't come soon enough!”
“"Â"Now that we are safely into our second trimesterâ€¦us and our little monkey are ready to tell the world Our little family is growing!”
“Deena captioned the post, "Chris and I decided to wait until we were ready to spill the beans!”
“The reality TV star had revealed her pregnancy to the public via Instagram in early July 2018.”
“The look on 'Snooki' Polizzi's face is absolutely priceless when Deena makes her huge announcement.”
“...https://t.co/yEBNox8433 pic.twitter.com/e1m6dPrMAd â€” DJ Katrina ðŸ’‹ (@KatrinaK_DJ) July 26, 2018Deena Nicole Cortese shares some massive news and reveals that she is pregnant.”


"Jersey coast: family vacation will return to MTV on August 23. You can see the season 2 trailer below. "
In this little joke, the audience saw Winnie gaudanino slapped in the face and saw a "wedding"
“…… She added
"Mom and dad can't wait to see you, Christopher John. You're going to be the most spoiled little boy ever!!"
"We have a lovely little boy on the way! "We are really lucky that our hearts are filled with so much happiness and happiness," she continued. "December won't come soon!"
Now that we are safely in the second trimester, we and our little monkey are ready to tell the world that our little family is growing
"Chris and I decided to wait until we were ready to leak," Dina wrote in the title of the post
"The reality star revealed her pregnancy to the public through instagram in early July 2018."
"When Dina announces her big decision, the expression on snooky Polizzi's face is absolutely priceless."
“... https://t.co/yEBNox8433pic.twitter.com/e1m6dPrMAd "DJ Katrina ०'Ÿ(@ katrinak Ÿ u DJ) on 26 August, 20187, Deena Nicole Cortese shared some important news and revealed that she was pregnant."



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The guys are generally inconsistent but Madison (Austen's new GF) comments on Chelsea's posts.”
“She doesn't seem to hang with the cast outside of Danni either.”
“Kathryn seems to only have mutual communication with Danni (people comment on her posts but she doesn't comment on others).”
“From my POV I've noticed:Cam, Naomi, Chelsea, Danni all have mutual communication with each other.”
“Deleted comments/posts?”
“Conspiracy theories?”
“Does anyone know any BTS info on these relationships?”
“With this season being centered around everyone getting along minus Thomas/Ashley I've noticed some inconsistencies on social media with who seems to engage with who and wanted to open it to discussion here.”


"The two guys usually don't agree, but Madison (Austin's new girlfriend) commented in a post at Chelsea
"She didn't seem to be with the actors outside of Dany either."
"Katherine seems to only interact with Dany (people comment on her posts, but she doesn't comment on others)."
"In my opinion, attention: cam" Naomi, Chelsea, Dany all communicate with each other. "
"Deleted comments / posts?"
"Conspiracy theory?"
"Does anyone know any BTS information about these relationships?"
"The focus of this season is that everyone except Thomas / Ashley gets on well with each other. I have noticed some inconsistencies on social media. Who seems to be in contact with who and wants to have a discussion here."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...he had that kind of insecurity that sometimes makes you say dumb things in certain situations such as you re rooting for the Eagles over the Patriots when you re in Boston...”
“The Belichick Brady combo is the greatest ever but I m sick of seeing the Patriots win When asked which of his film characters he most identified with Rudd said I think my character in I Love You Man because...”
“Without hesitation, Rudd emphatically responded: “I’m rooting for the Philadelphia Eagles.”
“I’m a bit of a history buff, and to be here … was very moving.”The big question of Rudd was who he was rooting for in the Super Bowl on Sunday.”
“It was so profound to walk through the Yard and learn about the history.”
“I’ve never been here before.”
““It’s been great getting to see Harvard.”
““The whole day has been a blast,” Rudd said during the press conference that followed the roast.”
“Rudd then received his Pudding Pot tonight at the closing ceremony, where he was roasted by the club members and participated in their latest show, “Intermission Impossible,” the company’s 170th production.”
“Normally I would do this with a drill, but I didn’t bring my Makita with me.”The party then moved through the Square to tour Harvard Yard.”


“…… He has that sense of insecurity that sometimes makes you say stupid things in certain situations, such as when you were in Boston supporting the eagle above the Patriots... "
"Bailychick Brady is the greatest combination ever, but when asked that he most agreed with Rudd's film role, I was tired of seeing the Patriot win. He said that I think my role in I love you is because..."
"I support the Philadelphia Eagles," Rudd replied without hesitation
"I'm a history fan. I'm here It's very moving. " Kevin Rudd's biggest question is who he supports in Sunday's Super Bowl
"It's moving to walk through the yard and learn about history."
"I've never been here before."
"It's great to see Harvard."
"It's been a busy day," Rudd said at a press conference after the barbecue
Rudd then received his pudding can at tonight's closing ceremony, where he was grilled by club members and took part in their latest show, the impossible intermission, the company's 170th production
"I usually do it with a drill, but I didn't bring my Makita with me." Then they walked across the square to visit Harvard campus



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...was not immediately returned...”
“...lover of Luann de Lesseps now husband Tom D Agostino Jr Nobody nails down Nicholson she joked and finally summarized whatever went on between the pair as one big sloppy mess whatever A request for comment from Nicholson s rep...”
“In an attempt to decipher Morgan s admission Cohen asked Did you have more than one night with him Would you stop going into the lovers and the hook ups she asked referencing her RHONY storyline of being a past...”
““Time out, Andy, don’t let that go!” he said.”
““Have I?” she said coyly, alongside an intrigued Michael Rapaport, who also appeared on Wednesday night’s show.”
“When Nicholson’s name came up, Morgan alluded that the two already have a romantic past.”
“In a game dubbed, “Would Sonja Date Him,” host Andy Cohen went through a list of famous older gentlemen and asked the notoriously flirty “Housewife” if she would ever get date them.”
““Who hasn’t!” the reality star, 53, said on “Watch What Happens Live” when asked if she has dated the 79-year-old actor.”
“...lovers and vice versa...”
“Click to email this to a friend Opens in new window Click to share on Twitter Opens in new window Click to share on Facebook Opens in new window Add Jack Nicholson to the list of Sonja Morgan s famous...”


“… No immediate return... "
“… No one nailed Nicholson to death, Lu'an de Lesseps' lover and now husband, Tom Agostino, Jr. she joked that she finally summed up everything that happened between them into a mess, no matter what comments Nicholson's representatives asked for... "
"In order to explain what Morgan admitted, Cohen asked if you had spent more than one night with him. Could you stop talking about your lovers and partners? She asked about her Ron like story about the past..."
"Pause, Andy, don't let it pass! "He said
"Yes? "She said shyly, next to a curious Michael Rapaport, who was also on the show on Wednesday night."
"When Nicholson's name appeared, Morgan suggested that they had a romantic past."
In a game called "will Sonja date him?" host Andy Cohen browses a list of well-known elderly gentlemen and asks the "housewife" who is known for flirting if she will date them
"No one! The 53 year old reality star said when asked on "watch live" whether to date the 79 year old actor
“… Lovers, and vice versa... "
"Click send this email to a friend to open in a new window click Share on Twitter to open in a new window click Share on Facebook to open in a new window add Jack Nicholson to Sonja Morgan's celebrity list..."



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Amy and Chris reportedly met last year through her personal assistant, Fischer's sister Kim.”
“Amy married her boyfriend of three months in a star-studded wedding overlooking the Pacific Ocean in the small beach community outside of Los Angeles.”
“But Amy Schumer seemingly kept her friends and family in the dark leading up to her secretive nuptials in Malibu, Calif., on Feb. 13, according to US Weekly.”
“The 36-year-old actress reportedly notified guests of her wedding to Chris Fischer just two days before the pair's 'very laid-back' beach-side vows.”
“Scroll down for video Newlyweds Amy Schumer seemingly kept her friends and family in the dark leading up to her secretive nuptials in Malibu Calif on Feb 13 according to US Weekly seen on Instagram Most of the guests found out the wedding was happening from a text Amy sent...”
“...an insider revealed...”
“'It was, 'Hey, this is happening.”
“If you can make it, great.”
“If not, no worries.''”
“'Everyone was having a good time,' the source said.”


According to reports, Amy and Chris met last year through her personal assistant, Fisher's sister Kim
"Amy and her 3-month-old boyfriend held a star wedding overlooking the Pacific Ocean in a small beach community outside Los Angeles."
Amy Schumer seems to have been keeping a secret from her friends and family before her secret wedding in Malibu, California, on February 13, US Weekly reported
"It's reported that the 36 year old actress announced her wedding to Chris Fischer two days before their" very leisurely "beach vow
"On February 13, American weekly saw on instagram that Amy Schumer, the newlyweds, seemed to have been hiding from her friends and family before her secret wedding in Malibu, California. Most of the guests found the wedding from Amy's text messages..."
“… An insider revealed that
"Yes, hey, it's true."
"If you can do it, that's great."
"If not, don't worry."
"Everyone had a good time," the source said



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'”Watch Baldwin on The Tonight Show in the clip above.”
“And then he won and I remember lying in bed and going, ‘Oh no.”
“...with the current Commander in Chief...”
“Still, he has a few questions over Trump’s apparent Twitter binges.”
“In a previous interview with The Hollywood Reporter, Baldwin had called his Emmy-winning Saturday Night Live impersonation of Trump to be “agony” — mainly because there’s no end in sight to something he expected to only perform a few times.”
“So Trump attacked on social media by tweeting, “Alec, it was also agony for those who were forced to watch.”
“You were terrible.”
“Bring back Darrell Hammond, much funnier and a far greater talent!”“The interesting thing is nobody’s actually forced to watch,” Baldwin said on The Tonight Show.”
““I found that out.”
“We don’t force anyone to watch.”


"'" watch Baldwin's tonight show in the clip above. "
"And then he won, and I remember lying in bed and saying," oh no. "
“… With the current commander in chief... "
"However, he still has some questions about Trump's apparent twitter binge."
"In a previous interview with Hollywood Reporter, Baldwin said that his Emmy winning Saturday night live imitation of trump was" painful "- mainly because he was looking forward to only a few performances with no end in sight."
"So trump tweeted on social media and said," Alec, it's also painful for those who are forced to watch. "
"You are terrible."
"Bring Darrell Hammond back, he's more funny and talented! "Interestingly, no one is actually forced to watch," Baldwin said on the tonight show
"I found out."
"We don't force anyone to watch."



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you think these two should give love another shot?”
“He went on to say, “I don’t know if it was supposed to stay, but it was supposed to come into my life and teach me what I have learned.”
“While some reports claim the pair are definitely back together, the So So Def producer recently revealed that it’s actually nothing more than wishful thinking on behalf of their fans, according to The Jasmine Brand.”
““All of this is a speculation I guess when someone gets single.”
“The fans actually really want to see us back together, so people have been championing this, but none of this is actually true,” Dupri admits.”
““I dated Janet damn near 10 years.”
“I don’t have to hide.”
“Why would I sneak around with someone that y’all know that I been with?”
“I know her better than the man she met.”Learn more about their rumored romance below.”
“ORIGINAL STORY: 9/26/2017Janet Jackson’s marriage to Wissam Al-Mana was short-lived but reportedly still full of drama.”


"Do you think these two people should give love another chance?"
"I don't know if it should stay, but it should come into my life and teach me what I have learned," he added
"Although it has been reported that the two must have been reunited, according to the jasmine brand, the producer of so so so def recently revealed that this is just the wishful thinking of their fans."
"It's all speculation, I guess when someone is single."
"The fans really want to see us get back together, so people have been supporting that, but it's not true," admitted Dupree
"I've been dating Janet for almost 10 years."
"I don't have to hide."
"Why should I fool around with people you all know?"
"I know her better than the man she met." Now learn more about their legendary romance
"Original story: on September 26, 2017, Janet Jackson's marriage to vissam al mana was short but said to be dramatic."



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Desiree Navarro/WireImageImage zoom Credit: Aurora Rose/Patrick McMullan/Getty...”
“Happy #valentinesday,” he wrote.”
““We get to smile, laugh and love.”
“While Siriano’s social media is heavily dedicated to his work, he wished a happy Valentine’s Day to his estranged husband earlier this year with a silly photo from their wedding.”
“Walsh last shared a photo with the season 4 Project Runway winner in May, a snap from an event honoring volunteer-based organization Bottomless Closet NYC, which outfits and trains women in need for job interviews.”
“In a change in tradition, Siriano and Walsh both wore black suits while their guests, including Kelly Osbourne and America’s Next Top Model star Jay Manuel, were encouraged to don white.”
“Image zoom Brad Walsh and Christian Siriano | Credit: Cindy Ord/GettyImage zoom Brad Walsh | Credit: Brad Walsh/InstagramThe pair got married in a stunning outdoor ceremony in July 2016, three years after announcing their engagement.”
“Siriano, 32, has yet to comment publicly on the news.”
“It’s nobody’s business and I don’t want to discuss, but that’s what’s up.” Walsh also added a shrug emoji to the note.”
““I was contacted by a writer for a website who somehow found out, so rather than let them break it, I’m telling you myself.”


"Image zooming source: Desiree Navarro / wireimageimage zooming source: Aurora Rose / Patrick McMullan / Getty..."
"Happy Valentine's day," he wrote
"We can smile, laugh and love."
"While Siriano's social media has invested a lot of energy in his work, earlier this year, he used a stupid picture of their wedding to wish his separated husband a happy Valentine's day."
Walsh's last photo with the fourth season t-channel champion was taken in May this year. This is a snapshot of an event honoring the volunteer organization "bottomless wardrobe New York", which provides clothing and training for women in need of job interviews
"In order to change the tradition, siliano and Walsh both wear black suits, while their guests, including Kelly Osborne and Jay Manuel, the next top American model star, are encouraged to wear white."
"Image zooming Brad Walsh and Christian Siriano | image zooming: Cindy ord / gettyimage zoom Brad Walsh | image zooming: Brad Walsh / instagram the couple held an amazing outdoor wedding in July 2016 three years after announcing their engagement."
"Ciriano, 32, has yet to comment publicly on the news."
"It's nobody's business, and I don't want to discuss it, but that's how it is." Walsh also added a shrug to the note
"The author of a website contacted me and somehow found out, so instead of letting them destroy it, I told you myself."



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To this end, Hughes rates the stock an Overweight (i.e.”
“...regulatory risk exists PDCE has been successful building a backlog of permits and DUCs for forward development Hughes wrote...”
“Looking ahead, Wells Fargo analyst Donald Fandetti thinks the company is well-positioned to benefit in the current climate.”
“$972.6 million.”
“The IPO raised $97.5 million, and the company boasts a current market cap ofreiterate our Overweight rating on GHLD.”
“Guild Holdings sold 6.5 million shares, which was below the 8.5 million anticipated.”
“The opening was only moderately successful, with the stock holding at or near $15, below the $17 planned.”
“The San Diego-based company held its IPO last year, in the latter half of October.”
“The company has a footprint across most of the States, and operates through retail and word-of-mouth channels.”
“Guild Holdings is a mortgage company, originating, selling, and servicing home loans in the US residential mortgage sector.”


To this end, Hughes rated the stock as overweight (i.e
“… There are regulatory risks. Pdce has successfully accumulated a large number of licenses and Duc for future development. Hughes wrote that
"Looking ahead, Donald fandetti, an analyst at Wells Fargo, believes that in the current environment, Wells Fargo is fully capable of benefiting from it."
"972.6 million."
"The IPO raised $97.5 million and the company's current market capitalization has exceeded our overweight rating of ghld."
"Guild holdings sold 6.5 million shares, lower than the expected 8.5 million shares."
"The opening was only moderately successful, with the stock holding price reaching or close to $15, lower than the planned $17."
"The San Diego based company launched an IPO in late October last year."
"The company has a footprint in most U.S. states and operates through retail and word-of-mouth channels."
Guild holdings is a mortgage company that initiates, sells and services home loans in the U.S. mortgage industry



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““If she walks in my closet, the hats are up on the top shelf, [and she points and says] ‘Haaat!’ [She’s] very excited.””
“Hat!’ ”“I think she’s just really proud of herself that she recognizes that,” Deschanel added.”
“Zooey Deschanel and husband Jacob Pechenik recently welcomed their second child, son Charlie Wolf Pechenik, her rep confirms to PEOPLE exclusively.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Zooey, Jacob and their daughter Elsie are overjoyed to welcome the newest member of their family,” her rep tells PEOPLE.”
“A separate source tells PEOPLE the little boy arrived last week in Los Angeles.”
“Charlie joins big sister Elsie Otter, whom the couple welcomed in July 2015 shortly after saying their “I do”s.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Zooey Deschanel Reveals Her Daughter Has an Adorable New ObsessionA source confirmed to PEOPLE in January that the actress, 37, and her producer husband would be giving their daughter a sibling.”


"If she comes into my closet, the hat will be on the top shelf," she said, pointing to me! "(she) is very excited."
"Hat! "I think she's just proud to know that," added Deschamps
"Zooey Deschanel and her husband Jacob pechenik recently welcomed their second child, their son Charlie wolf pechenik, whose agent exclusively confirmed to people."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Zoe, Jacob and their daughter Elsie are very happy to welcome the new members of their family," her representative told people
"Another source told people that the little boy arrived in Los Angeles last week."
"Charlie joined her sister Elsie Ott, who was welcomed by the couple shortly after they said" I do "in July 2015."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Related video: Zooey Deschanel revealed that her daughter has a cute new obsession. In January, sources confirmed that the 37 year old actress and her producer husband would give their daughter a brother and sister."



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It had been building up for a while, and while the past month has been incredible, all of the ups and downs and stress and excitement really takes a toll on my mental health.””
““So last night I called out of the show because I had a massive anxiety attack in the afternoon,” the actress wrote in an Instagram post on Wednesday.”
“Patti Murin, who plays Princess Anna in the musical Frozen, opened up about her rough journey with anxiety after having to cancel a performance on Tuesday night (April 17).”
“While Broadway stars get up on stage in front of hundreds of people every night, that doesn’t stop them from experiencing mental health struggles.”


"It's been accumulating for a while, and although the past month has been unbelievable, all the ups and downs and the stress and excitement have really damaged my mental health."
"So I called out last night because I had a serious anxiety disorder this afternoon," the actress wrote on instagram on Wednesday
"Patti murin, who plays Princess Anna in the musical frozen, has to cancel a performance on Tuesday (April 17) night and tells a story of her bumpy journey with anxiety."
"Although Broadway stars appear in front of hundreds of people every night, it doesn't stop them from experiencing mental health struggles."



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Speaking to Entertainment Tonight show runner Roberto Aguirre-Sacasa said the identity of Fred Andrew’s shooter will be “The mystery that launches season two”.”
“Season 1 left us at a cliff-hanger when Fred Andrews was shot in front of his son Archie.”
“Due to Ross Butler’s ongoing commitments with Netflix series 13 Reasons Why, the role of Reggie has been recast, with Charles Melton taking on the role.”
“Twenty Seven The Hills Have Eyes Chapter Twenty Eight There Will Be Blood Are there any changes to the Riverdale season 2 cast...”
“Nineteen Death Proof Chapter Twenty Tales from the Darkside Chapter Twenty One House of the Devil Chapter Twenty Two Silent Night Deadly Night Chapter Twenty Three The Blackboard Jungle Chapter Twenty Four The Wrestler Chapter Twenty Five The Wicked and the Divine Chapter Twenty Six The Tell Tale Heart Chapter...”
“Roberto Aguirre Sacasa has been revealing the episode titles through his Twitter and we ve got up to episode 28 Chapter Fourteen A Kiss Before Dying Chapter Fifteen Nighthawks Chapter Sixteen The Watcher in the Woods Chapter Seventeen The Town That Dreaded Sundown Chapter Eighteen When a Stranger Calls Chapter...”
“Any more episode titles?”
“...pic.twitter.com/PXh0HzYsan — Archie Comics (@ArchieComics) July 7, 2017The first episode has already been filmed, and will be called ‘Chapter Fourteen: A Kiss Before Dying’, as confirmed by series developer Roberto Aguirre-Sacasa through his Twitter account.”
“21 more episodes to go!”
“The first episode of #Riverdale Season 2 has finished filming.”


In an interview with Entertainment Tonight host Roberto Aguirre sacasa, Fred Andrew's identity as a shooter will be "the mystery of season two"
"When Fred Andrews was shot in front of his son Archie, the first season put us on the brink of a cliff."
"Thanks to the continued collaboration between Ross Butler and Netflix's" reason 13, "Reggie's role has been reshaped and taken over by Charles Melton."
"Twenty seven mountains have eyes chapter 28 will have blood what's the change of Riverdale's cast in the second season..."
"Nineteen death certificates Chapter 20 stories in the dark chapter 21 devil's house Chapter 22 silent night fatal night Chapter 23 Blackboard Jungle Chapter 24 wrestler Chapter 25 villain and God Chapter 26 chapters about the soul..."
"Roberto Aguirre sacasa has revealed the title of this episode through his twitter. We have reached episode 28 Chapter 14 a kiss on the deathbed Chapter 15 Nighthawk Chapter 16 The Catcher in the woods Chapter 17 the town afraid of sunset Chapter 18 when a stranger calls Chapter 18..."
"Do you have any more titles?"
“... pic.twitter.com/PXh0HzYsan -The first episode of @ archiecomics on July 7, 20177 has been filmed and will be called "Chapter 14: a kiss before death", as confirmed by the series developer Roberto Aguirre sacasa through his twitter account
"21 more episodes!"
"The first episode of Riverdale Season 2 is finished."



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Presale tickets go on sale Friday, Sept. 22.”
“The ventriloquist took some time away from her beloved puppets to share her plans for some of the $1 million prize money.”
“Ventriloquist and national sensation Darci Lynne Farmer won the “America’s Got Talent” season 12 title on Wednesday.”
“Throughout the season, she seemed to handle the pressure like a total pro.”
“Still, you have to wonder what went through her brain as she stood on that finale stage waiting for the big announcement.”
“Farmer admitted her nerves almost got the better of her.”
“It's Darci Lynne/Facebook“I was so stressed out.”
“That was the longest 30 seconds of my life,” Farmer told Entertainment Tonight.”
““I was, like, just spit it out Ty Ty!”
“”And how adorable did she look when she found out she won?”


Advance tickets will be available on Friday, September 22
"The ventriloquist took some time out of her beloved puppet and shared some of her plans to win a $1 million prize."
On Wednesday, ventriloquist and national sensation Darcy Lynn farmer won the 12th season of "America's got talent."
"Throughout the season, she seemed to handle the pressure like a professional."
"Still, when she's on the final stage waiting for a big announcement, you want to know what's going on in her head."
"Farmer admits that her nervousness almost controlled her."
"It's Darcy Lynn / Facebook." I'm under a lot of pressure
"That was the longest 30 seconds of my life," farmer told entertainment tonight
"I, like, spit it out!"
"How cute does she look when she finds out she won?"



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementDo you think there is more than just friendship going on between Chris Pine and Sofia Boutella?”
“Other stars spotted at the party include Joe Jonas and Sophie Turner, Nicole Richie, Scott Eastwood and Hailee Steinfeld.”
“Sofia took to Instagram to gush over Chris’ acting skills and promoted his movie, saying that he is a “special human” and very dear to her and a very talented actor as well, of course.”
““You can tell they were all really good friends and having a great double date.”We should mention first before the speculations go out of control, that Chris and Sofia have been great friends for a while but indeed, their relationship has always had the potential for more.”
“She kept pushing Sofia to do photos and checking in on her,” the insider shared.”
““Troian was so cute.”
“Furthermore, it looks like their buddies also encouraged them to interact and were there to make sure everybody was having fun.”
““They were together the entire time and kept walking with his hand around her waist.”Aww… Can we smell love in the air?”
“Chris kept stepping back to let her have the spotlight and wouldn’t take photos but kept watching her when she would pose,” the eyewitness stated.”
““They were super cute.”


"Do you think it's more than friendship between Chris pine and Sophia butra?"
"Other stars we saw at the party included Joe Jonas and Sophie Turner, Nicole Ritchie, Scott Eastwood and Haley Stanfield."
Sophia spoke highly of Chris' acting skills on instagram and promoted his film, saying that he was a "special person", very lovely to her and, of course, a very talented actor
"You can see that they are good friends and have a good double date." Before we lose control of speculation, we should first mention that Chris and Sophia used to be good friends, but in fact, their relationship has always had greater potential
"She kept pushing Sophia to take pictures and to see her," the person familiar with the matter said
"Trojan is lovely."
"And it seems that their friends encourage them to interact and be there to make sure everyone has a good time."
"They've been together all the time, walking around her waist in their arms." Ah Can we smell love in the air? "
"Chris kept stepping back, putting her in the spotlight, refusing to take pictures, but kept watching her pose," the witness said
"They're super cute."



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kenworthy and Rippon are the first openly gay U.S. Winter Olympians to compete in the games.”
“"You've tweeted more about me than I have about him.”
“ -- And the jabs at Mike Pence keep coming.”
“U.S. Olympic skier Gus Kenworthy took aim at Mike Pence again Thursday night, joking that he's unable to shake the vice president's hand because of a thumb injury.”
“"Broke my thumb yesterday in practice," Kenworthy tweeted, along with an x-ray of his thumb.”
“"It won't stop me from competing (obvi) but it does prevent me from shaking Pence's hand so... Silver linings!”
“Will be giving my teammates (and literally everyone else) an enthusiastic 'thumbs up!'”
“...of encouragement the rest of the trip."”
“A Twitter user blasted Kenworthy, tweeting at him, "Your obsession with Pence is creepy."”
“But Kenworthy, unlike fellow openly gay U.S. Olympian Adam Rippon, hasn't publicly criticized Pence too much.”


"Kenworthy and Rippon are the first American winter Olympians to openly participate in the Winter Olympics."
"You think more of me on Weibo than I think of him."
"The attack on Mike burns continues."
"US Olympic skier Gus Kenworthy aimed at Mike burns again Thursday night, joking that he couldn't shake hands with the vice president because of a thumb injury."
"I broke my thumb in practice yesterday," Kenworthy tweeted, along with an X-ray of his thumb
"It won't stop me from competing, but it does stop me from shaking hands with burns, so... A glimmer of hope! "
"Will give my teammates (and others) a warm" thumbs up "!"
"The rest of the journey is about encouragement."
One twitter user attacked Kenworthy and tweeted to him, "your obsession with burns is creepy."
"But Kenworthy doesn't criticize burns as openly as Adam rippen, an American Olympic athlete who is openly gay."



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This was also withdrawn by the end of the summer that same year before Wright called time on their romance once and for all, with the divorce being finalised in 2010.”
“While all seemed well and good on the marital front - with Robin appearing at Sean's side when he bagged the Best Actor at the 2009 Oscars - just a few short months later Penn filed for divorce again.”
“But four months later, it appeared that the celebrity couple had changed their minds and withdrew them.”
“However, by the late 2000s their courtship had gone through a number of reported rocky spells with divorce plans announced in early 2007.”
“Robin Wright Penn & Sean PennGetting together in 1989 – just after his divorce from Madonna – Robin and Sean got hitched in 1996 after welcoming two children together.”


"The agreement was also withdrawn at the end of the summer of the same year, until Wright completely ended their relationship, and the divorce agreement was finalized in 2010."
"Although everything seems to be fine in terms of marriage - Robin was with Sean when he won the best actor Oscar in 2009 - just a few months later, Penn filed for divorce again."
"But four months later, the celebrity couple seems to have changed their mind and quit."
"However, by the end of the 21st century, their courtship has gone through many difficult times, and the divorce plan was announced in early 2007."
"Robin Wright pan and Sean pan got together in 1989 - just after his divorce from Madonna - Robin and Sean got married in 1996 when their two children were together."



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...not in the competition yet...”
“Date The contestant went on a date and gave out a rose at the rose ceremony.”
“It is a spin-off of the reality television game shows The Bachelor and The Bachelorette, and is a winter counterpart to the summer series Bachelor in Paradise.”
“The show is hosted by Chris Harrison and Hannah Storm of ABC’s sister station ESPN.”
“It has been described by ABC as "an ode to the Winter Olympic Games", and aired as counterprogramming against NBC's coverage of the 2018 Winter Olympics.”
“Ashley Brewer presents the play-by-play and live interviews during the games.”
“[2]The series reunite previous contestants from The Bachelor and The Bachelorette at a winter resort in Manchester, Vermont, where they are competing with contestants from the various international adaptations of the franchise in various winter sports challenges.”
“1 3 Contestants edit Elimination table edit Place Contestant Episode 1 2 3 4 1st Ashley Last In Date Winner Kevin Date In Date 2nd Courtney In In In Runner up Lily In In In Dean In Date Last Runner up Lesley In Date Last Luke Date Date In Runner...”
“...up Stassi In Date In 9 10 Bibiana Date In In Split Jordan N A a In In Split 11 12 Ally In In Out Josiah Last In Out 13 14 Christian In In Split Clare In Last Split 15 Yuki In In Out 16 Michael In In Quit 17”
“Ben In In Quit 18 Tiffany In In Quit 19 20 Jenny In Out Rebecca Date Out 21 Benoit In Quit 22 26 Eric Out Jamey Out Laura Out Lauren Out Zoe Out Key edit The contestant is male...”


“… I'm not in the game yet... "
"The date player went on a date and gave a rose at the rose ceremony."
"It's a derivative of the reality TV game bachelor and single woman and a winter version of the summer series Bachelor in heaven."
"It's hosted by Chris Harrison and Hannah storm of ABC sister station ESPN."
ABC calls it a "Winter Olympics anthem," which runs counter to NBC's coverage of the 2018 Winter Olympics
"Ashley brewer introduced the match and the live interview during the match."
"[2] at a winter resort in Manchester, Vermont, the series brings together contestants from singles and single women who compete with international adaptations of the franchise from a variety of winter sports challenges."
"13 contestants edit elimination table edit competition location Episode 1 Episode 2 Episode 3 Episode 4 first place Ashley last date champion Kevin date second place Courtney date runner up Lily date Dean date last place runner up Leslie date last place Luke date runner up..."
“… Upper Stacey on the date of 9 10 biana on the date of the split Jordan n a on the date of the split 11 12 allies on the outside Josiah on the last outside 13 14 Christianity on the last split Claire on the last split 15 Yuki on the outside 16 Michael on the inside quit 17 "
"Ben in quit 18 Tiffany in quit 19 20 Jenny in out Rebecca date out 21 Benoit in quit 22 26 Eric out Jamey out Laura out Lauren out Zoe out key edit contestant is male..."



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...and not Styles via Twitter Tuesday...”
“The former One Direction member also addressed his surprising kiss with Corden on Carpool Karaoke which had aired the night before saying I would like to take the opportunity to announce that we will also be having a baby Corden announced the birth of his third child with his wife...”
“James Corden and Wife Julia Welcome Third ChildStyles and Corden, 39, have frequently collaborated together on the late night show — including a week-long residency by Styles in May in which he appeared in each episode to perform songs off his self-titled debut album.”
““I got the call Jules was going into labor so James naturally called the funniest man he knew… he obviously wasn’t available.”RELATED VIDEO: It’s a Girl!”
““I was sitting at home two hours ago in this suit, obviously,” he said.”
“...giant baby While he looked at ease in his hosting duties which included interview guests Owen Wilson Jane Krakowski and Joel Edgerton Styles said he was given two hours warning before stepping on the Late Late Show s stage...”
“Just half an hour ago James and his wife Jules had a beautiful baby girl Image zoom Credit Terence Patrick CBS Styles told the audience he was just at the hospital before I came to fill in and she looks a lot like James mainly because James looks like a...”
“The “Sign of the Times” singer, 23, greeted the enthusiastic audience, telling them, “I actually have some great news.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“...night...”


“… Instead of tweeting on Tuesday... "
"The former one-way member also talked about his amazing kiss on car sharing karaoke with Corden, which was broadcast the night before. He said that I would like to take this opportunity to announce that we will also have a child. Corden announced that he and his wife had a third child..."
"James cordon and his wife Julia welcome their third child, styles, and 39 year old cordon, who often work together on late night shows - including styles' week-long live performance in May, where each episode appears on his debut album of the same name, singing songs."
"I got a call from Jules about to give birth, so James naturally called the funniest man he knew He's obviously not available. " Related video: it's a girl
"Obviously, I was sitting at home in this suit two hours ago," he said
“… Giant baby, although he looks relaxed in his hosting duties, which include interviewing guests Owen Wilson, Jane Krakowski and Joel Edgerton style, said he was given a two-hour warning before embarking on the late stage of the show. "
"Just half an hour ago, James and his wife Jules had a beautiful baby girl image. Terence Patrick CBS styles told the audience that he was in the hospital before I came to fill in. She looks like James, mainly because James looks like him
"I really have some good news," the 23-year-old time icon singer saluted the enthusiastic audience
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
“… At night... "



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She has two brothers, older sibling Michael Joseph Jackson Jr. and the younger Prince Michael Jackson II.”
“...time She was 11 years old when she spoke at his memorial service on July 7 2009 calling him the best father you could ever imagine Jackson who is currently filming the second season of Fox s Star is the sole daughter of mother Debbie Rowe and father...”
“Thank you for the magic forever and always In what Rolling Stone dubbed as her first ever in depth interview following her father s June 2009 death the model actress opened up about the close knit relationship she had with her father saying I feel him with me all the...”
“And our souls will never change in that way.”
“Though I am not you, and you are not me, I know with all my being that we are one.”
““You are always with me and I am always with you.”
““I will never feel love again the way I did with you,” her post continued.”
“In it, Jackson is seen wearing his iconic white sequin glove.”
“The 19-year-old, who made headlines Sunday for speaking out against “Nazi, white supremacist jerks” at the MTV Video Music Awards, shared a 2001 photo of herself kissing her dad.”
““Birthday wishes to the love of my life, the one person who showed me what passion truly was, the one that gave me solid morals to live by and how to dream,” she wrote.”


She has two older brothers, the younger Michael Joseph Jackson and the younger Prince Michael Jackson II
“…… On July 7, 2009, when she said at Jackson's memorial service that Jackson was the best father you can imagine, she was only 11 years old, and Jackson, who is currently filming the second season of Fox Star, is the only child of his mother Debbie law and father... "
"Always thank you for your magic, always after the rolling stones called it her first ever in-depth interview, her father's model actress who died in June 2009 opened up her intimate relationship with her father and said," I feel he has everything with me... "
"Our souls will never change like this."
Although I am not you and you are not me, I know that we are one
"You'll always be with me, and I'll always be with you."
"I'll never feel the love I feel when I'm with you again," her post continued
In the photo, Jackson is wearing his signature white sequined gloves
The 19-year-old, who made headlines Sunday by publicly opposing "Nazi, white supremacist asshole" at the MTV Music Video Awards, shared a photo of herself kissing her father in 2001
"Birthday wishes are for the love of my life, for someone who shows me passion, for someone who gives me strong morality and dreams," she wrote



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'Once I commit to something, I stick with it, so you never know… I’ve loved Danielle Spencer since 1989; that’s never going to change,' he said.”
“Thank you linesman...”
“And more than five years later, on Tuesday Russell Crowe took to Twitter to confirm that he and ex-wife Danielle Spencer had finally divorced.”
“The finalisation of their split comes after the Gladiator star sold more than $3.7 million worth of jewellery, art and movie memorabilia collected during their marriage at auction on Saturday night.”
“'Yesterday I officially became divorced': Russell Crowe finalises split from Danielle Spencer ... five years after their marriage broke down'In other news ... yesterday , April 9th , 2018 at 12:30pm Eastern Daylight time (Aus) ...”
“I officially became divorced,' Russell tweeted on Tuesday.”
“'Thank you linesman .”
“Thank you ball boys.'”
“[Sic].”
“Russell's Sotheby's auction, titled The Art of Divorce, was held on Saturday - the same day as his 54th birthday and wedding anniversary with Danielle.”


"Once I make a commitment, I'll stick to it, so you'll never know I've been in love with Danielle Spencer since 1989; it's never going to change. "
"Thank you, linesman..."
More than five years later, Russell Crowe tweeted on Tuesday that he and his ex-wife Danielle Spencer finally divorced
"Before their final decision to break up, the Gladiator star sold more than $3.7 million worth of jewelry, art and movie souvenirs at an auction on Saturday night, which they collected during their marriage."
"Yesterday I officially divorced": Russell Crowe finally broke up with Danielle Spencer... In another piece of news five years after their marriage broke up... Yesterday, April 9, 2018, 12:30 pm EDT (Australia)
"I'm officially divorced," Russell tweeted on Tuesday
"Thank you, linesman."
"Thank you, caddies."
"[sic]."
Russell's Sotheby's auction, the art of divorce, took place on Saturday, his 54th birthday and his wedding anniversary with Danielle



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“With the help of friends like Olsen, he intends to continue raising funds and awareness.”
“"Thanks to the amazing research we fund at John’s Hopkins, Stanford and UCSF, new drugs and new therapies have been developed, helping thousands of those struggling with this sometimes fatal disease," he explained.”
“Since then he's helped raise millions for the foundation.”
“She was only 47."”
“"One year later, Gay lost her life to it.”
“"Just three years after I found out what ‘scleroderma’ was, my sister was sitting in the audience at the benefit, now actually diagnosed with this orphan disease," he explained in an essay he penned for TODAY.”
“Saget sits on the board of the Scleroderma Research Foundation, and his involvement with fundraising for the organization started before he had a direct connection to the autoimmune disease.”
“While neither Olsen nor her sister decided to take part in the Netflix series "Fuller House" with Saget and the rest of the gang, she's been a faithful supporter of this event and of the cause that's so close to her friend's heart.”
“"So honored my dear friend Ashley Olsen came to support my SclerodermaResearch.org Foundation @SRFcure Event as she has all these years," the actor-comedian wrote in an Instagram caption alongside of photo of him, Olsen and John Oliver from the big night.”
“This year's event raised $1.2 million for the charity.”


"With the help of Olsen and other friends, he intends to continue to raise funds and raise awareness."
"Thanks to the amazing research we funded at Johns Hopkins, Stanford and the University of California, San Francisco, new drugs and new therapies have been developed to help thousands of people fighting this sometimes fatal disease," he explained
"Since then, he has helped the foundation raise millions of dollars."
"She's only 47."
"A year later, guy died."
"Just three years after I discovered what scleroderma is, my sister, sitting in the audience of the charity foundation, is now actually diagnosed with this kind of orphan disease," he explained in an article for today
Sajit is a member of the board of directors of the scleroderma research foundation and has been involved in the fund-raising work of the organization before he had a direct connection with autoimmune diseases
"Although neither Olsen nor her sister has decided to join sajit and other gang members in the Netflix movie Fuller's house, she has always been a loyal supporter of the event and the cause with which she has a close relationship with her friends."
"It's a great honor for my dear friend Ashley Olsen to support me." Scleroderma research.org the comedian wrote in a headline on instagram: "the foundation is an event she's been running over the years, with photos of him, Olsen and John Oliver."
"This year's event raised $1.2 million for charities."



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Even though Colton told Becca he was falling in love with her, she sent him home after he made the final four.”
“ADADThat, combined with Colton’s virgin revelation (although Becca was more concerned with the fact that he had only been in one serious relationship), basically sealed his fate.”
“They must feel Colton is the closest thing they’ll get to Sean.”
““My thoughts are Sean Lowe has been their only successful Bachelor.”
““I’m hearing that they will be announcing the next ‘Bachelor’ soon and it will be Colton,” he tweeted.”
“Last week, blogger Reality Steve leaked the news early.”
“Colton could be a very interesting Bachelor.”ADUnfortunately, plenty of viewers feel otherwise.”
“...he’s also a guy who is surprisingly funny and charismatic.”
“.”


"Although Colton told Becca that he was in love with her, she sent him home after he entered the semi-finals."
"Adat believes that, together with Colton's virginity revelation (although Becca is more concerned that he has only experienced a serious relationship), it basically determines his fate."
"They must think Colton is the closest to Sean."
"I think Sean law is their only successful bachelor."
"I hear they're going to announce the next bachelor soon, and that's Colton," he tweeted
"Last week, blogger Steve leaked the news ahead of time."
"Colton could be a very interesting bachelor." Fortunately, many viewers have different feelings
“…… He is also a surprisingly interesting and attractive person
“.”



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 19-year-old went topless to display her newest tattoo, a series of chakras going down the middle of her chest.”
“Though she is facing the camera, she kept the photo relatively tame, strategically using flower emojis to cover more sensitive areas.”
“InstagramJackson also shared a shot of the tattoo in progress, thanking the artist and writing "@sweriet always comin thru."”
“InstagramThe actress and model also shared the finished tattoo in a more covered up photo.”
“It's not the first time she's bared all on Instagram.”
“In May, Jackson shared a photo of herself hanging out topless on her balcony.”
“She defended the pic, stating she thinks that "being naked is part of what makes us human."”
“RELATED: Paris Jackson Poses Topless on Instagram, Says 'Being Naked Is Part of What Makes Us Human'"It's actually a beautiful thing and you don't have to make it sexual the way many Hollywood stars (and the media) do," she continued.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"At 19, she went topless to show off her latest tattoo, with a series of chakras running down the center of her chest."
"Although she's facing the camera, she keeps the photos relatively flat and strategically uses floral expressions to cover more sensitive areas."
Instagram Jackson also shared a photo of an ongoing tattoo, thanking the artist, and wrote "@ sweriet always comin thru"
"Instagram, the actress and the model also shared a tattoo completed in a more hidden photo."
"It's not the first time she's been naked on instagram."
In May, Jackson shared a photo of himself hanging out on a balcony naked
She defended the photos, saying she believed "nudity is part of humanity."
"Related reports: Paris Jackson was topless on instagram and said," nudity is part of human beings. "It's actually a beautiful thing. You don't have to make it sexy like many Hollywood stars (and the media)," she continued



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Are ‘Beauty and the Beast’ and ‘Power Rangers’ queerbaiting LGBT fans?”
“Earlier this month, she took to Twitter to talk about the anxiety she experienced over her sexuality.”
“Although this was the first explicit statement about her sexual orientation, the star hasn’t been shy about the topic of sexuality in the past.”
“I wasn't referring to all the beronica shippers, just the ones who had been particularly cruel to me personally."”
“That being said, I have never ever wanted to alienate anyone and my tweet was thoughtless.”
““I have never heard the term ‘queerbaiting’ in my life until today.”
““I’m very very new to the LGBT community,” she wrote in the tweet.”
“We have literally no say in what happens.”In Purser’s coming out tweet, she mentions her previous comments towards the queerbaiting backlash and apologized for what seems to be a tweet directed towards the fans who strongly shipped the two female characters.”
“But we didn't write the show?”
“One twitter user, by the name of “jamie not spears,” tweeted “beronica fans are frustrated because they were blatantly, undeniably queerbaited into watching the show.”Purser retweeted the user’s thread, responding, “And I get that, representation is so powerful and important.”


"Are beauty and the beast and Power Ranger fans of gays?"
"Earlier this month, she tweeted about her anxiety about her sexuality."
"Although this is the first time that she has made a clear statement about her sexual orientation, the star has not been shy about the topic of sex in the past."
"I'm not talking about all the baronica shippers, just those who are particularly cruel to me."
"Having said that, I have never thought of alienating anyone, and my microblog is also thoughtless."
"I didn't hear the word 'gay' until today."
"I'm a stranger to the LGBT community," she wrote on her microblog
"In fact, we have no say in what happened." In her tweet by pursuit, she referred to her previous comments about her strong dissatisfaction with homosexuals and apologized that the tweet appeared to be aimed at fans who strongly supported the two female characters
"But we didn't write the show?"
A twitter user named "Jamie not words" tweeted: "belonika's fans are frustrated because they are openly and undeniably invited to watch the show." The administrator forwarded the user's post and responded, "I see, representativeness is so powerful and important."



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Right before passing out, I felt like I was in the middle of a campfire.””
“I was pissed.”The TV personality joked, “I’ll be back in two.”
“The talk show host, 53, announced on Wednesday’s show that she was diagnosed with Graves’, an autoimmune disease that affects the thyroid, in addition to thyroid issues of which she was previously aware.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Graves’ disease squeezes the muscles behind the eyeballs,” she explained, adding that it has made her eyeballs twitch.”
“Williams admitted that her viewers spotted the eye issue before she did, adding that she attributed symptoms to focusing on her son Kevin‘s senior year of high school and applying to colleges as well as her work.”
“Image zoom Wendy Williams | Credit: Courtesy Wendy Williams Show“Wendy is a true champion and has never missed a day of work.”
“But her health and well-being must be put before all else,” a show rep tells PEOPLE.”
““Wendy has been openly dealing with her Graves’ Disease for many years in addition to hyperthyroidism.”
“Yesterday, Wendy’s doctor prescribed a necessary three weeks of rest to get her levels and medication in sync.”


"Just before I fainted, I felt like I was in a campfire."
"I'm angry," the TV celebrity joked. "I'll be back in two minutes."
The 53 year old talk show host announced on Wednesday that she had been diagnosed with Graves' disease, an autoimmune disease that affects the thyroid gland, and that she had previously been aware of thyroid problems
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Graves' disease squeezes the muscles behind the eyeball," she explained, adding that it makes her eyeballs twitch
Williams admitted that her audience had noticed eye problems before she did, adding that she attributed the symptoms to her focus on her son Kevin's senior year in high school, her college application and her job
Image zooming Wendy Williams | credit: Wendy Williams shows "Wendy is a real champion and never misses a day's work."
"But her health and happiness must come first," a show representative told people
"Besides hyperthyroidism, Wendy has been publicly treating Graves' disease for many years."
"Yesterday, Wendy's doctor gave her a necessary three week break to keep her level up with the drugs."



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Stay tuned for all the news and details on Prince Harry and Meghan Markle’s engagement here!”
“"But then, as I said, [they] would have probably been best friends - best friends with Meghan."”
“The couple who have been together since last year and announced their engagement on the morning of 27 November looked very much in love as they sat down with the BBC s Mishal Husain for their television appearance and spoke...”
“...about Harry s romantic proposal and their whirlwind romance...”
“Talking about the stunning engagement ring, Prince Harry turned conversation to his late mother in an incredibly emotional way.”
“The ring is is obviously yellow gold because that s her favourite and the main stone itself I sourced from Botswana and the little diamonds either side are from my mother s jewellery collection to make sure that she s...”
“...with us on this on this crazy journey together Harry revealed...”
“MORE Why Meghan and Harry are so perfect for each other When asked what it meant to have Princess Diana s diamonds on her engagement ring the American actress 36 replied I think everything about Harry s thoughtfulness is and...”
“...the inclusion of that and obviously not being able to meet his mom it s so important to me to to know that she s a part of this with us...”
“And I think in being able to meet his aunts and and also like Julia and just different people who were so important to his mom I m able to in some way know a part of her through them...”


"Stay tuned for all the news and details of Prince Harry's engagement to Megan markel!"
"But, as I said, (they) could be best friends - Megan's best friends."
"The couple have been together since last year and announced their engagement on the morning of November 27. When they sat down with Mishal Husain of the BBC to appear on TV and speak, they looked very much in love with each other..."
“… About Harry's romantic proposal and their whirlwind romance... "
"Talking about that amazing engagement ring, Prince Harry talked to his late mother in an incredible emotional way."
"This ring is obviously gold, because that's her favorite love. The main jewels I purchased from Botswana, the small diamonds on both sides are my mother's jewelry collection, to ensure that she..."
“… Along with us on this crazy journey, Harry revealed that
"More why Megan and Harry are so perfect for each other when asked what is Princess Diana's diamond in her engagement ring, American actress 36 replied," I think everything about Harry's thoughtfulness is and... "
“… Including this matter, and obviously can't see his mother, I'm very important to know that she is a part of us... "
"I think I can meet his aunts, and like Julia and other people who are so important to his mother, I can get to know a part of her through them to some extent..."



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Advertisement"If it's finished, it's finished," Echeverría said.”
“...of the pack in the global fast fashion arms race...”
“From here, the designersAdvertisementcheck social media to determine the most opportune moment to launch new products.”
“It's Zara's company policy not to allow employees to be quoted in news stories.”
“"We go to the fairs in Paris and Italy and then have a look at the books and decide what is the good content for us," one designer, whose name Zara did not share, told Business Insider.”
“Both Zara and Forever 21 have come under scrutiny for this practice in the past, being accusedToday, the design process has expanded beyond the realms of runway shows and spread to social media and, specifically, Instagram.”
“AdvertisementFast-fashion stores have historically been known to mimic trends from the runway, offering similar products at lower prices than high-fashion labels.”
“While the runway shows are still an important part of its design process today, Zara has remained steadfast that these shows act only as places of inspiration.”
“AdvertisementThe power of the Instagram influencerof selling copycat products and ripping off designs.”
“While its slick supply chain and distribution process enable the company to turn around new items quickly and bring them to its 2 238 stores twice a week it is the designers who are burdened with the responsibility of coming up with new styles that enable Zara to stay ahead...”


"If the ad is done, it's done," said Echeveria
“… Leading the global arms race in fast fashion... "
"From here, designers start to examine social media to determine the best time to launch new products."
"Zara's company policy is not to allow employees to be quoted in news reports."
"We went to the Paris and Italian fairs and read a book to decide what was good for us," one designer told business insider, who Zara didn't give his name
"Zara and Forever 21 have been censored for this practice in the past, and today they are accused that the design process has gone beyond the field of t-shows and spread to social media, especially instagram."
"Advertising fast fashion stores have always been seen as imitating the trend on the catwalk, offering similar products at a lower price than high-end fashion brands."
"Although the runway shows are still an important part of its design process today, Zara firmly believes that these shows are just a source of inspiration."
"Instagram influences the power of selling imitative products and plagiarizing design."
"Although its smooth supply chain and distribution process enable the company to quickly turn around new products and bring them to 238 stores twice a week, the designer has the responsibility to launch new styles and keep Zara in the lead..."



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Tamra Judge’s nasty family feud exploded after her teenage son refused to give his dad a ticket to his graduation ceremony and RadarOnline.com has the exclusive scoop about the bitter battle.”
“The Real Housewives of Orange County star posted two photos of Spencer celebrating his high school graduation and his upcoming 18th birthday with a sweet tribute.”
““My tall handsome , smart, shy, kind hearted , loving son Spencer graduates today & turns 18 (June 14) .”
“I can’t stop crying and wondering HOW IS THIS POSSIBLE?”
“?‍♀️ I love him so much ❤ I know life has so many wonderful things in store for you!”
“Congratulations son #2018 #blessed?”
“#donttouchthehair,” she wrote.”
“Her ex-husband, Simon Barney, posted a picture of Judge with their daughter Sidney from her high school graduation, claiming that he needed a ticket to the ceremony.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
Tamra judge's grubby family feud erupted when her teenage son refused to give his father a ticket to the graduation ceremony RadarOnline.com The website has exclusive coverage of the bitter battle. "
"The Real Housewives of the Orange County stars have posted two pictures of Spencer celebrating his high school graduation and his upcoming 18th birthday, and they pay a sweet tribute."
"My son Spencer graduated today, 18 years old (June 14),"
"I can't help crying and wonder how this is possible?"
I love him so much ❤  I know there are so many wonderful things waiting for you in life
"Congratulations on your son's happiness in 2018?"
"Don't touch your hair," she wrote
Her ex husband, Simon Barney, posted a picture of the judge and his daughter Sidney graduating from high school, claiming that he needed a ticket for the wedding



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It does not have to define you and I refuse to allow it to define me or control me.””
“It can be incredibly isolating.”
“Although she was first diagnosed in 2001 (when she was hospitalized for a physical and mental breakdown), “I didn’t want to believe it,” the superstar singer-songwriter tells PEOPLE editor in chief Jess Cagle.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Carey says she finally sought treatment recently after “the hardest couple of years I’ve been through” — years of professional upheaval, an E!”
“...reality show and romantic drama.”
““Until recently I lived in denial and isolation and in constant fear someone would expose me,” she says.”
““It was too heavy a burden to carry and I simply couldn’t do that anymore.”
“I sought and received treatment, I put positive people around me and I got back to doing what I love — writing songs and making music.”Image zoom Credit: Cliff WattsOne of the most successful singers of all time, with 18 No.”
“1 hits and more than 200 million records sold, Carey spent many of her years in the spotlight suffering in silence.”


"It doesn't have to define you, I refuse to let it define me or control me."
"It can be incredibly isolated."
"Although she was first diagnosed in 2001 (when she was hospitalized with physical and mental breakdown)," the superstar singer and songwriter told people editor Jesse kagel, "I don't want to believe it."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
After "the hardest years I've been through," Kelly said, she recently sought treatment - years of career upheaval, an e! "
“… Reality shows and romantic dramas. "
"Until recently, I lived in denial and isolation, worrying that someone would expose me," she said
"The burden is too heavy to carry. I really can't go on."
"I sought and received treatment, I put positive people around me, and I started doing what I love to do - writing songs and making music." Credit for image zooming: Cliff waters is one of the most successful singers of all time, ranking 18th
"With a click through rate and sales of more than 200 million records, Kelly has endured in the spotlight for many years."



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Emmys will air live from L.A.’s Microsoft Theater on September 17.”
“There’s nothing wrong with the drive shaft.”Kimmel explained that he wanted to help Theroux, 45, campaign for an Emmy nomination for his role as Kevin Garvey in HBO’s The Leftovers.”
“Jimmy Kimmel pranked his friend by turning his car into a moving billboard — and the TV host had a little help from Jennifer Aniston to pull it off.”
““Your wife Jennifer Aniston helped me out.”
“You know that recall notice you got for your car?” Kimmel, 49, asked Theroux during Jimmy Kimmel Live!”
“...on Tuesday, May 16.”
““There’s nothing wrong with the car.”
“It was not being repaired.”
““Because I feel like HBO could be doing a better job of promoting this for you, we had some experts adorn your car in a way that is going to bring you a lot of attention,” the comedian said.”
“A post shared by @justintheroux on May 16, 2017 at 6:36pm PDTEmmy nomination voting begins June 12, and the nominees will be announced on July 13.”


"The Emmy Awards will be broadcast live at the Microsoft theater in Los Angeles on September 17."
"There is no problem with the propeller shaft." Kimmel explained that he wanted to help seru, 45, run for the Emmy nomination because he played Kevin Garvey in HBO's leftover girl
"Jimmy Kimmel's prank turned his car into a moving billboard - the TV host got a little help from Jennifer Aniston before he drove away."
"Your wife, Jennifer Aniston, helped me."
"Do you know the recall notice for your car? "Kimmel, 49, asked seru on Jimi Kimmel live!"
“…… Tuesday, 16 May. "
"No problem with the car."
"It wasn't fixed at the time."
"Because I think HBO can better promote this for you, we have some experts decorating your car, which will bring you a lot of attention," the comedian said
"@ justintheroux posted a post at 6:36 p.m. on May 16, 2017, my nomination vote will start on June 12, and the nominees will be announced on July 13."



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...is also working on a new project...”
“I realized that my kids need me in the stands and on the sidelines my husband and I need that time to reconnect RELATED VIDEO Nicole Kidman Opens Up About the Massive Grief She Felt After Suffering a Miscarriage While the job change will allow for more family time Faris...”
““I feel like it was in that moment that really repositioned my priority compass and our family’s priority compass.”
““What kicked it off is that I had a really tough miscarriage,” she says.”
“...go off for work at 3 30 a m every Saturday and Sunday morning Faris adds that after going through a rough year health wise she knew it was time to make a change...”
“I have three kids Caroline Grace 10 JJ 8 and Landon 4 and working at GMA Weekend and The View has been awesome but I m so excited to not go to bed at 8 30 or 9 p m on a Friday or Saturday night because my alarm would...”
““I’m excited to get my life back,” she says.”
““I’m really grateful that I’ve had the opportunity to work with some of the most brilliant minds on camera and off camera,” says Faris who says her decision to switch roles was for both professional and personal reasons.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“She’ll leave both at the end of August for a new role at ABC focused on reporting and breaking news.”


“… I'm also working on a new project... "
"I realized that my children needed me to stand in the stands, my husband and I needed time to connect again. Nicole Kidman opened up the huge grief after her abortion, and the change in work would allow more family time..."
"I think it was at that moment that I really redefined my priority compass and our family's priority compass."
"The reason for the miscarriage was that it was very difficult for me," she said
“… She leaves work at 3:30 a.m. on Saturdays and Sundays, and Faris adds that after a tough year, she knows it's time to make a change... "
"I have three children, Caroline grace 10 JJ 8 and Landon 4, working in GMA weekend, where the scenery is great, but I'm excited to stay up at 8:30 or 9:00 on Friday or Saturday night because my alarm clock will..."
"I'm excited to get my life back," she said
"I really appreciate the opportunity to work with some of the most talented people in and out of the camera," said Faris, who decided to change roles for both professional and personal reasons
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"She will leave the two companies at the end of August to take on a new role at ABC, focusing on news reporting and breaking news."



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I appreciate any and every person reading this and I’m grateful for everything in my life, positive and negative.””
“I will always have love and respect for my family.”
“Icon Award fans questioned her family loyalty...”
“Paris, the 20-year-old daughter of the late Michael Jackson, address her critics on social media, telling them not to worry about her or her family’s business.”
“Dear social media followers friends stalkers lovers and haters and fellow moonwalkers Please do not tell me demands try to control how I handle my relationship with the people in my life specifically my family she wrote in an Instagram...”
“Story...”
““As amazing and as s—-y as things can be, it is no one’s business but ours.”
“I understand that some of you feel some sort of connection or need to be a part of our lives considering you watched us grow up.”
“However, I am handling my situation exactly how my father did.”
“And I am happy keeping it that way.”


"I am very grateful to everyone who read this article. I am very grateful for everything in my life, positive or negative."
"I will always love and respect my family."
"Idol fans question her loyalty to her family..."
Paris, the 20-year-old daughter of the late Michael Jackson, spoke to her critics on social media, telling them not to worry about her or her family's business
"Dear social media followers, friends, followers, lovers, haters and peers, please don't tell me that I try to control how I deal with people in my life, especially my family, she wrote in instagram..."
"Story..."
"No matter how amazing it is, how amazing it is, it's none of people's business, it's only our business."
"I know some of you feel connected or need to be part of our lives because you're watching us grow up."
"However, my situation is exactly what my father did."
"I'm happy to keep it that way."



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Hangover actor quips that the show Seinfeld has "been a real launching pad for whites" and calls Seinfeld's Netflix series Comedians in Cars Getting Coffee "lazy, car-based non-comedy."”
“Galifianakis purposely mixes up Jerry's last name, even going as far as to write that the Seinfeld star was only funny from 1993 to 1997.”
“Galifianakis begins to throw jabs at Seinfeld from the very beginning, when he expresses his disappointment in having the comedian on the show, especially after previously nabbing interviews with Hillary Clinton and President Obama.”
“...aim at Seinfeld and showed hip hop s golden child and her unborn child a whole lot of love...”
“Zach Galifianakis returned with a new episode of his Funny or Die faux talk show Between Two Ferns on Thursday June 14 and called on Jerry Seinfeld and Cardi B for a hilarious six minute interview in which Galiafinakis took...”


The hero of "hangover" joked that "Seinfeld" is "the real launching pad for white people", and said that the comedian in the car drinking coffee in "Seinfeld" is "lazy, car based non comedy"
Galifianakis deliberately confused Jerry's surname, and even wrote "Seinfeld" from 1993 to 1997
"Galifianakis has been critical of Seinfeld from the beginning, when he expressed his disappointment at the comedian's appearance on the show, especially after interviewing Hillary Clinton and President Obama."
“…… Aiming at Song Fei, she shows a lot of love to Jin Tong and her unborn child... "
"On Thursday, June 14, Zach galifinakis came back with a new episode of his funny or parody talk show between two ferns. He visited Jerry Seinfeld and Katie B for a six minute funny interview, in which galifinakis accepted..."



Number  40
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She recently attended the premiere of A Quiet Place with husband Ryan Reynolds, where she impressively styled her own hair and intertwined sparkly jewels within her high pony — a glamorous and unexpected twist.”
“Ryan Reynolds and Blake Lively on the Joys of ParenthoodAnd Lively has been showing off some major diamond accessories everywhere she goes.”
“She “geeked out” over meeting Big Bird while wearing a striped sweater and shimmery psychedelic-print skirt.”
“She’s been on a colorful style streak lately, recently wearing a rainbow ensemble for a visit to Sesame Street.”
“Image zoom Credit: Ethan Miller/GettyShe wore her hair pulled back into a half up-do with wavy, teased strands by her go-to hairstylist, Rod Ortega, and a clean makeup look with pretty pink lip by makeup artist Kristofer Buckle.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“She finished off her look with a pair of graphic-print Christian Louboutin pumps.”
“Lively attended the Lionsgate presentation at CinemaCon in a midnight blue double-breasted blazer over a white collared shirt, complete with an orange pattern bow tie from Charleston-based brand Brackish, for a look that gives us total Gossip Girl flashbacks.”
“And on Thursday she surprised us once again when she showed up to CinemaCon in Las Vegas wearing an ultra-short Sonia Rykiel tuxedo dress paired with a colorful bowtie.”
“From her head-turning accessories to her intricate hairstyles, she always impresses us on the carpet in outfits she proudly styles herself.”


"She recently attended the premiere of" a quiet place "with her husband, Ryan Reynolds. She gave herself an impressive haircut and inlaid her feet with glittering Jewelry - a fascinating and unexpected turn."
"Ryan Reynolds and Blake Lively talk about the joy of parenthood, and lively has been showing off some of the main diamond jewelry wherever she goes."
She was wearing a striped sweater and a sparkling psychedelic print skirt, and was dazed at the sight of the big bird
"Recently, she wore a rainbow dress to visit Sesame Street, which is a colorful fashion."
"Image scaling credit: Ethan Miller / Geddes pulls her hair back into a half up curl, and she goes to the hairdresser rod Ortega to tease her hair. The makeup artist Kristofer buckle makes a clean look with beautiful pink lips."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"She ended up with a pair of high heels with Christian Louboutin."
"Lively attended the launch of Lionsgate on cinemacon. Wearing a midnight blue double breasted suit, a white-collar shirt and an orange bow tie of Charleston brackish brand, lively gave us a panoramic view of gossip girls."
"Last Thursday, she appeared on cinemacon in Las Vegas in a super short Sonia raikiel tuxedo and a colorful bow tie, which surprised us again."
"From her headdress to her complicated hairstyle, she always impresses us on the carpet in the clothes she designs for herself with pride."



Number  41
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“GALLERY: SAG Awards 2018: The best red carpet fashion...”
“Speaking to reporters about his success this awards season, the 59-year-old said: "You have your moment in the sun, there's no guarantee that you're going to keep working," he said.”
“The British actress, 33, was named Outstanding Female Actor in a Drama Series for her portrayal of Queen Elizabeth II in The Crown, beating the likes of Millie Bobby Brown, Laura Linney, Robin Wright and Elisabeth Moss.”
“It's the second year in a row that Claire has won the award – and will also be the last; season three will feature an all new cast, with Olivia Colman taking over the lead role.”
“Unfortunately the star was unable to attend the Los Angeles ceremony.”
“Claire is currently in Berlin filming her new thriller, The Girl in the Spider's Web.”
“"She's really sorry not to be her tonight," her co-star Matt Smith, who plays Prince Philip, told Access Hollywood on the red carpet.”
“Claire Foy stars as Queen Elizabeth II in The CrownOther winners on the night included fellow Brit Gary Oldman, who added to his 2018 trophy haul with the Outstanding Actor trophy for The Darkest Hour.”
“"God forbid, I could get sick, I could get hit by a car.”
“Morgan Freeman, meanwhile, took home the Lifetime Achievement Award.”


"Gallery: sag award 2018: best red carpet fashion..."
In an interview with reporters, the 59 year old talked about his success in this award season, saying: "you have your own sunshine moment, there is no guarantee that you will continue to work."
The 33 year old British actress has been named the outstanding actress in a drama series for her role as Queen Elizabeth II, beating Millie Bob Brown, Laura Lini, Robin Wright and Elizabeth moss
"It's Claire's second and final year in a row; there will be a whole new cast in the third season and Olivia Coleman will take over the lead."
"Unfortunately, the star failed to attend the awards ceremony in Los Angeles."
Claire is currently filming her new thriller "the girl in the cobweb" in Berlin
"She's really sorry she can't be her tonight," her partner Matt Smith, who plays Prince Philip, told a visit to Hollywood on the red carpet
"Claire foy plays Queen Elizabeth II in the crown, and other winners of the night include fellow Briton Gary Oldman, who added to his 2018 trophy with the" best actor in the darkest moment "trophy."
"My God, I might get sick, I might get hit by a car."
Meanwhile, Morgan Freeman won the lifetime achievement award



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...collaborate on songs including some from her new album Trip...”
“Moving forward I will continue to focus on my family friends and music and soon enough the entire truth shall come to light Since splitting from Dot Da Genius Aiko and Big Sean have been happily dating and continue to...”
“Such behavior is abhorrent to me and far from how I conduct myself.”
“However, I believe the truth must be heard, which is that I’ve never been violent or abusive towards any woman in my life.”
“He continued, “Because my nature is peaceful, I’ve been silent out of respect for all involved, and to maintain my privacy.”
“Dot also shot down any notions that he had harmed Aiko, writing on Instagram, “In light of public threats, false allegations and attempts to slander my name and character, I am compelled to speak up."”
“...so glad to be free from all the drugs, depression and confrontation."”
“I only cheated myself.”
“Aiko denied cheating on the producer, tweeting, "Never let a man disrespect u in any way...”
“The split became ugly early on, as many fans assumed Aiko had cheated on Dot, while others assumed Dot had abused the singer.”


“… Co authored songs, including her new album travel
"Looking forward, I will continue to pay attention to my family, friends and music. Soon, the whole truth will be revealed, because Aiko and Shawn have been dating happily and continue to..."
"This kind of behavior is abhorrent to me, far from my way of behavior."
"However, I believe that the truth must be heard, that is, I have never abused or abused any woman in my life."
He went on, "because my nature is peaceful, so out of respect for all concerned, in order to maintain my privacy, I have been silent."
Doth also refuted any claims that he had hurt Aiko, writing on instagram: "in view of public threats, false accusations and attempts to slander my name and character, I have to speak up."
“… I'm happy to get rid of all the drugs, depression and confrontation. "
"I just cheated myself."
Aiko denied cheating the producer, saying on Weibo, "never let a man disrespect you in any way..."
"The breakup became ugly very early, because many fans thought Aiko cheated doth, while others thought doth abused the singer."



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She and Carmelo have been married since 2010.”
“I have my husband here, my friends here, it’s a really exciting time,' the 39-year old television personality admitted.”
“The couple, who have been living separately since April of 2017, have reportedly been spending more time together.”
“'We’re good.”
“I mean, we’ve been together for a really long time so we’re figuring out how to make it work for what is best for (our 11-year-old son) Kiyan and what is best for us,' La La revealed in an interview with People.”
“Mending fences?”
“Carmelo Anthony and La La Anthony attended the Lumiere De Vie Hommes Launch Event Aboard Superyacht Utopia IV on Saturday in New York City the couple are pictured during NY Fashion Week in September 2018 La La and the NBA superstar looked like a blissful couple when they arrived with...”
“...their son for the launch of grooming line Lumiere de Vie Hommes aboard a yacht in New York City on Saturday...”
“At one point, she sat down on Carmelo’s lap and the two started making out as Beyoncé’s hit tune Love On Top rocked the house, according to the magazine.”
“'We’re having fun!”


"She and Carmelo have been married since 2010."
"My husband is here, my friends are here, it's a very exciting moment," the 39 year old television celebrity admits
"It is reported that the couple have been separated since April 2017 and have been together for a longer time."
"We're fine."
"I mean, we've been together for a really long time, so we're trying to figure out how to make it best for (our 11 year old son) Keyang and for us," Lala told people magazine
"The fence?"
"Carmelo Anthony and Lala Anthony attended the launch of" human life "on the super yacht Utopia 4 in New York City on Saturday. The couple were photographed at New York Fashion Week in September 2018. Lala and the NBA superstar looked like a happy couple when they arrived... "
“… Their son was on a yacht in New York on Saturday for the launch of the "human life" beauty series
According to the magazine, once she was sitting on Carmelo's lap, and they began to make out. Beyonce's hit song "love on top" shocked the audience
"We had a good time!"



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO: Taylor Swift’s ‘Gorgeous’ Lyrics Decoded: All About the Singer’s Romance With Boyfriend Joe Alwyn...”
“November is going to be a busy month for the singer, whose performance of a new song from Reputation will air during ABC’s TGIT block on Nov. 9.”
“...the star gave her fans another peek at her new music Thursday night by dropping a new song titled Call It What You Want The latest single read the full lyrics here is the fourth song Swifties have heard from the singer s upcoming sixth studio album Reputation and reveals...”
“...details about her romance with British actor Joe Alwyn...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““All the liars are calling me one / Nobody’s heard from me for months / I’m doing better than I ever was,” she continues.”
“After performing at a Super Bowl party in February, the star largely went under the radar for the rest of 2016 and secretly dated Alwyn for months before news of the relationship went public.”
“Image zoom“My baby’s fly like a jet stream/ High above the whole scene/ Loves me like I’m brand new so call me what you want, yeah,” the Grammy winner sings about her boyfriend.”
““I want to wear his initial on a chain around my neck, not because he owns me/ but ‘cause he really knows me,” Swift also sings.”
“While promoting the song on her social media accounts early Friday morning, Swift shared videos from her life over the last year.”


"Related video: Taylor Swift's" gorgeous "lyrics decoding: all the romantic stories about singer and boyfriend Joe Alvin..."
"November will be a busy month for the singer, who will broadcast a new song from reputation on ABC's TGIT program on November 9."
“… On Thursday night, the star showed her fans her new music. She played a new song called "call it what you want the latest single read the full lyrics here is the fourth song swings have heart from the single's coming sixth studio discover..."
“… Details of her romance with British actor Joe Alvin... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"All the swindlers call me one / no one has heard from me for a few months / I'm doing better than before," she continued
"After performing at the Super Bowl party in February this year, the star was basically in the spotlight for the rest of 2016 and secretly dated Alvin for months before the romance became public."
"Image zooming" my child flies like a jet / above the whole scene / loves me like I'm a brand new one, so call me what you want, yeah, "said her boyfriend, the Grammy award winning lead singer
Swift also sang, "I want to wear his initials around my neck, not because he owns me, but because he really knows me."
On Friday morning, while promoting the song on her social media account, swift shared a video of her life over the past year



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“SUBSCRIBEThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“BAZAARFor more royals and can't-miss fashion and beauty news, sign up for the Harper's BAZAAR Newsletter.”
“At the time, a source even told BAZAAR.com that, "They stayed for five days and it was Prince Charles hosting them."”
“Over the summer it was reported that Meghan and Harry had spent some time with Camilla and Charles at Castle of Mey in Caithness in Scotland, per Us Weekly.”
“The publication spoke to someone who attended the May 2018 nuptials, who revealed that Charles "seemed like the settling hand on the whole day," and Camilla apparently "seemed like she had been doing this forever."”
“And whenever the pair have been photographed together, it's clear that they definitely enjoy one other's company:Chris Jackson Getty ImagesBy all accounts, according to Vanity Fair's profile, both Charles and Camilla were extremely supportive of Prince Harry's wedding to Meghan earlier this year.”
“The family friend also tells Vanity Fair that "Camilla has been very helpful to Meghan," welcoming her into the royal family.”
“Meghan and her step-mother-in-law's relationship is described as "aces," and filled with "real warmth and support," which is lovely to hear.”
“And that's not all.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
Subscribe to this content, which is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Bazaar would like to learn more about the royal family and the fashion and beauty news that can't be missed, please sign up for Harper's Bazaar newsletters."
"At that time, a source even told reporters BAZAAR.com "They stayed for five days, and Prince Charles received them."
Megan and Harry spent the summer with Camilla and Charles at may castle in case, Scotland, according to us weekly
"The publication interviewed a person who attended the wedding in May 2018 and revealed that Charles" seems to be reassuring all day "and Camilla clearly" seems to be doing it forever. "
"When they're photographed together, it's clear that they must enjoy each other's lives: Chris Jackson according to vanity fair, Charles and Camilla are very supportive of Harry's wedding to Megan earlier this year
The family friend also told vanity fair that "Camilla is very helpful to Megan" and that she is welcome to join the royal family
"Megan's relationship with his stepmother is described as" trump card, "full of" real warmth and support. "It sounds lovely."
"It's more than that."



Number  46
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““The contractions are happening as we speak,” the then-mom-to-be joked to Extra about being so close to giving birth.”
“To experience the birth of your child is such a mind blowing event that is greater than anything I can describe.”
“The Million Dollar baby is here!”
“Born Monday, April 3 to Million Dollar Listing Los Angeles‘ Josh Altman and wife Heather Bilyeu Altman, daughter Alexis Kerry Altman came into the world at 4:55 p.m., weighing in at 7 lbs.”
“...and measuring 20 inches long, the couple announced Thursday via their Instagram pages.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““She is absolutely perfect!”
“I’m so in love, more than I ever thought I could be,” Bilyeu Altman captioned a family photo.”
““The greatest day of my life.”
“April 3rd at 4:55pm, [Heather] and I welcomed our amazing baby girl Alexis Kerry Altman into the world,” Altman captioned his version of the same photo.”


"The contractions happened just as we were talking," joked the mother to be, who was so close to giving birth
"Experiencing the birth of a child is exciting, more important than anything I can describe."
"Here comes the million baby!"
"On Monday, April 3, Los Angeles born Josh Altman and his wife Heather Biliu Altman, daughter Alexis Kerry Altman was born at 4:55 p.m., weighing 7 pounds."
"The couple announced on instagram on Thursday that they are 20 inches long."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"She's absolutely perfect!"
"I love so much, deeper than I thought," Biliu Altman wrote in a family photo
"The best day of my life."
"At 4:55 p.m. on April 3, [Heather] and I welcome our amazing baby girl Alexis creortman to the world," Altman said in the title of his version of the same photo



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...foster care...”
“She knew she did not have to have that role anymore and it just came out in tears Since it was posted the video has been viewed more than 1 6 million times and Courtney hopes that at least some of its viewers might become inspired to get involved in...”
“Did someone just turn Disney World turned into a water park?”
“Because this video of two foster children learning they’re being adopted will definitely get your tears flowing.”
“(Don’t say we didn’t warn you.)”
“Courtney and Tom Gilmour of Portland, Pennsylvania have fostered 12-year-old Janielle and 10-year-old Elijah for the last three years.”
“The couple had long planned to adopt the children and were waiting for an official court date when one was finally confirmed in April, just as the family left for a trip to Orlando, Florida, to visit the Magic Kingdom.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“When the family checked into the park, they were handed buttons to write down what they were there to celebrate.”
“Courtney wrote “adopting our kids” on her and Tom’s buttons, took a picture of it, and tweeted it the Walt Disney World Twitter account.”


“… Foster... "
"She knew she didn't have to play that role anymore, and she cried since the video was released. This video has been watched more than 1.6 million times, and Courtney hopes that at least a part of the audience will be inspired to participate in... "
"Did someone turn Disneyland into a water park?"
"Because this video of two adopted children learning that they were adopted will surely bring tears to your eyes."
"Don't say we didn't warn you."
Courtney and Tom Gilmore from Portland, Pennsylvania, have raised 12-year-old yanier and 10-year-old Elijah in the past three years
"The couple had long planned to adopt a child and were waiting for the official date of the court session. A date was finally set in April when their family went to visit the Magic Kingdom in Orlando, Florida."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"When a family moves into the park, they are given a button to write down what they celebrate there."
Courtney wrote "adopt our child" on her and Tom's buttons, took a picture and posted it to Walt Disney World's Twitter account



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They were married in 2010.”
“Winstead split from her own husband, Riley Stearns, in May of last year.”
“Image zoom Credit: Chris The Golden Globe winner, 46, took his romance with the actress public in November when he and Winstead were photographed walking hand in hand in Los Angeles.”
“The announcement came amid news that McGregor was spotted kissing his Fargo costar Mary Elizabeth Winstead.”
“Image zoom Credit: Ben Gabbe/Getty ImagesThe couple announced their split last October, and at the time a family source revealed to PEOPLE that the couple had been separated since last May.”
“The documents list the date of separation as May 28th of last year.”
“Mavrakis’ filed her response, stating that she is asking for sole custody with visitation for her ex, according to the website.”
“The star, 46, has asked for joint custody of their three children: Clara, 21, Jamyan, 16, Esther, 15 and Anouk, 6.”
“McGregor filed for divorce on Jan. 19, citing irreconcilable differences as the reason for their split.”
““It’s disappointing and upsetting but my main concern is our four children are okay,” she told The Sun on Sunday.”


"They got married in 2010."
"Winstead broke up with her husband Riley Sternes last May."
"Image zooming credit: 46 year old Golden Globe winner Chris and Winstead took a hand-in-hand photo in Los Angeles last November, revealing his romantic story with the actress."
"The news came at a time when it was reported that McGregor had been found kissing his Fargo partner, Mary Elizabeth Winstead."
Photo source: Ben gabbe / Getty Images the couple broke up in October last year when a family source revealed that they had been separated since May last year
"The departure date listed in the document is 28 may last year."
According to the website, mavrakis submitted her reply, saying she asked for separate custody of her ex girlfriend
The 46 year old star asked to raise their three children together: Clara, 21, jamiyan, 16, Esther, 15 and anuk, 6
"McGregor filed for divorce on January 19 because of irreconcilable differences."
"It's disappointing and disturbing, but my biggest worry is that our four children are OK," she told the sun on Sunday



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...miss...”
“Luckily this will not be the last time we see BTS on our television sets since shows like Jimmy Kimmel and Ellen DeGeneres have already booked BTS for a special performance on their shows which you won t want to...”
“Introduced by The Chainsmokers, BTS made their U.S. television debut at the 2017 American Music Awards on Sunday, November 19th.”
“BTS is taking the U.S over a landslide by being the first Korean Pop Boy Band to perform on a major American awards show.”
“BTS delivered their latest hit “DNA” with flashy choreography and enormous support from their A.R.M.Y.”
“(a name given to their international fanbase) who accompanied them with chants throughout their performance.”
“Tweets during and after their epic performance took over social media with the hashtag #BTSxAMAs.”
“Fans, attendees and those new to the K-pop boy band fanbase obsessed over their amazing dance moves, voice control, red carpet fashion and physical aspect of the members of the boy band.”
“BTS (currently standing for ‘Behind the Scenes’) is a seven-member South Korean Pop Band formed by Big Hit Entertainment.”
“While most boy bands in the U.S. have from three to five members in their groups, South Korean bands are internationally known for having more than 10 members in the band.”


“… Miss... "
"Fortunately, this won't be the last time we see BTS on TV, because programs like Jimmy Kimmel and Alan DeGeneres have reserved special performances for BTS, and you don't want to..."
"Introduced by smokers, BTS made its debut on American television at the 2017 American Music Awards on Sunday, November 19."
"BTS is the first Korean pop boy band to perform at a major awards ceremony in the United States. It is leading the United States through a landslide."
BTS released their latest hit show "DNA" with gorgeous dance and a.r.m.y. support
(name of international fans), they are accompanied by chants throughout the performance
"During and after their epic performance, twitter took over social media with the tag" btsxamas. "
"Fans, attendees and new fans of the K-pop boys are fascinated by their amazing dance moves, voice control, red carpet fashion and the physical condition of the boys."
"BTS (currently stands for" behind the scenes ") is a seven member Korean pop band formed by a big hit entertainment company."
"Although most boys' bands in the United States have three to five members, Korean bands are famous for their more than 10 members."



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For billion-dollar box-office films released in the past five years:”
“Black Panther’s strong US release set it apart.”
“Similarly, Pixar movies increasingly find their appeal from international audiences.”
“With a huge worldwide opening weekend last year, the eighth installment in the Fast and Furious franchise, The Fate of the Furious, had collected just 16% of its box office revenue from US theaters when it crossed the $1 billion mark.”
“Blockbusters today make less money in the US than elsewhere, which Hollywood studios take into account when planning releases.”
“The last film to do so, The Dark Knight, was released in 2008.”
“Only four films among the 56 analyzed here exceed Black Panther‘s reliance on domestic revenue to reach $1 billion in sales.”
“Black Panther’s US appeal is the strongest of any movie in the past 10 years.”
“Let’s compare that to the highest grossing Hollywood films since 2000.”
“Now eight weeks in, Black Panther is the 10th highest grossing film of all time, the third highest grossing film in North America, and has just passed Titanic in US ticket sales (without accounting for inflation).”


"Over 100 million box office movies in the past five years"
"Panther's strong distribution in the United States makes it different."
"Similarly, Pixar Films are becoming more and more popular with international audiences."
"With last year's world premiere weekend, the eighth film in the series," the fate of fury, "broke through the $1 billion mark and earned only 16% of the box office revenue from U.S. cinemas."
"Blockbusters make less money in the U.S. today than in other places, and Hollywood studios will take that into account when planning their distribution."
"The last movie to do that, the dark knight, was released in 2008."
"Of the 56 films analyzed here, only four exceed Panther's dependence on domestic revenue, with sales reaching $1 billion."
"The attraction of panther in the United States is the strongest movie in the past 10 years."
"Let's compare this to the highest grossing Hollywood movie since 2000."
"The Panther" has been released for eight weeks. It's the tenth highest box office movie ever. The third highest box office movie in North America has just surpassed "Titanic" in the United States



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#rip — Cara Santana (@CaraASantana) June 5, 2018Any of us, at any time, under any circumstances, can find life too hard to bear.”
“Her vibrancy and beauty will live on through her work.”
“Scroll through to see more celebrity reactions to Spade’s death:As “unfussy” as I am, I still loved my Kate Spade bags.”
“If you or someone you know is in emotional distress or considering suicide, call the National Suicide Prevention Lifeline at 1-800-273-TALK (8255).”
“After selling the company in 2007, she launched a new bag line in 2016 called Frances Valentine.”
“After the success of their initial handbag line, the brand expanded to clothing, shoes, eyewear, perfume, stationery and more accessories.”
“The couple launched Kate Spade New York in 1993.”
“Spade is survived by her husband, Andy Spade, whom she wed in 1994, and their 13-year-old daughter Frances.”
““The medical examiner will determine the cause of death, and the investigation is ongoing,” the PIO added.”
“ET on Tuesday and pronounced dead at the scene, a New York Police Department PIO told Us.”


"Rip Cara Santana (@ caraasantana) June 5, 2018 any of us, at any time, under any circumstances, will find life too hard to bear."
"Her energy and beauty will continue through her work."
Scroll to see more celebrity reactions to spades death: Although I'm very "calm", I still like my Kate Spade bag
"If you or someone you know is depressed or considering suicide, please call the national suicide prevention lifeline at 1-800-273-TALK (8255)."
"After selling the company in 2007, she launched a new bag series called Frances Valentine in 2016."
"After the success of their initial handbag series, the brand extends to clothing, shoes, glasses, perfume, stationery and more accessories."
"The couple launched Kate Spade in New York in 1993."
Spade survived when his husband, Andy spade, married their 13-year-old daughter, Francis, in 1994
"The coroner will determine the cause of death and the investigation is ongoing," PIO added
A New York police officer told us that he was arrested on Tuesday and declared dead on the spot



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Over the years, the program has followed the couple as they launched their own business, adopted two children, and struggled with cancer treatment.”
“The show is currently in its sixth season.”
“It also followed their attempts to have a child.”
“The show follows them as they go about their daily lives and deal with the challenges of living in a world that is built for much larger people.”
“A reality series following the pair called, "The Little Couple", began airing at the same time.”
“She, and her husband, who works in medical supplies and telemarketing, moved to Houston, Texas in 2009, as she was offered a job at the Texas Childrens' Hospital.”
“Jen Arnold is a neonatologist who earned her Masters of Medical Education from the University of Pittsburgh Medical Center.”
“Jennifer is 3'2″ tall and Bill is 4′ tall.”
“The Little Couple are Bill Klein and Jennifer Arnold, both of whom have dwarfism.”
“The Little Couple net worth: The Little Couple are reality television personalities who have a net worth of $3.5 million dollars.”


"The program has been tracking the couple for years as they started their own business, adopted two children and struggled with cancer treatment."
"The show is now in its sixth season."
"It's also after they're trying to have children."
"The show focuses on their daily lives and addresses the challenges of living in a world built for larger people."
A reality TV series called "little lovers" began to air at the same time
In 2009, she moved to Houston, Texas, with her husband, who works in medical supplies and telemarketing, because she got a job at Texas children's hospital
"Jan Arnold is a neonatologist who has a master's degree in medical education from the University of Pittsburgh Medical Center."
"Jennifer is three feet two inches tall, bill is four feet tall."
"The young couple are Bill crane and Jennifer Arnold. They both have dwarfism."
"The couple's net assets: they are reality TV stars with a net asset of $3.5 million."



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maksim Chmerkovskiy was unable to perform due to an unspecified personal issue, so eliminated pro Alan Bersten danced with Vanessa Lachey instead.”
“[24] It was announced at the beginning of the show that, due to the tragedy, no elimination would take place.”
“30 30 140 Lindsey Mark 2 22 21 24 27 51 26 28 40 27 24 51 26 28 54 29 28 57 40 40 80 30 30 140 Frankie Witney 3 19 23 25 21 46 24 29 31 30 30 60 26 27 53 25 26 51 38”
“19 Scoring charts edit Couple Place 1 2 3 2 2 3 4 5 6 a 7 8 9 10 b 1 2 Top 4 Top 3 Jordan Lindsay 1 22 24 24 25 49 29 30 39 30 24 54 30 30 60 28 30 58 40 40 80”
“[18]Dance troupe [ edit ]The dance troupe members for the season are former pros Sasha Farber and Jenna Johnson, and season 24 troupe members Artur Adamski, Brandon Armstrong, Hayley Erbert, and Britt Stewart.”
“[17] On October 23, singer Shania Twain joined the panel as a guest judge.”
“[16] Julianne Hough did not return as a permanent judge this season, though she did return as a guest judge during the first night of the finals.”
“[5]Hosts and judges [ edit ]Tom Bergeron and Erin Andrews returned as hosts, while Carrie Ann Inaba, Len Goodman, and Bruno Tonioli returned as judges.”
“[4] On September 6, the rest of the cast was revealed on Good Morning America.”
“[3] Drew Scott was announced as the first celebrity competing for the season partnered with Emma Slater.”


"Maxim chimmelkovsky couldn't perform because of an unspecified personal problem, so the eliminated professional Alan belsten turned to dance with Vanessa Lach."
"[24] announced at the beginning that it would not be eliminated due to this tragedy."
"30 30 140 Lindsay Mark 2 22 21 24 27 51 26 28 40 27 51 26 54 29 28 57 40 30 140 Frankie wittney 3 19 23 25 21 46 24 29 31 30 60 26 27 53 25 51 38"
"19 score table editing positions of lovers 1 23 2 3 4 5 6 a 7 8 9 10 B 1 2 top 4 top 3 Jordan Lindsay 1 22 24 25 49 29 30 39 30 24 54 30 60 28 30 58 40 80"
Members of this season's dance company include former professional Sasha Farber and Jenna Johnson, as well as season 24 members Artur adansky, Brandon Armstrong, Haley Albert and Britt Stewart
[17] Singer Shania Twain joined the jury as a guest judge on October 23
Julian Hoff has not returned as a permanent judge this season, although she returned as a visiting judge on the first night of the final
Host and judge Tom bergeran and Irene Andrews were the hosts again, while Carrie Ann Inaba, Ron Goodman and Bruno tonioli were the judges again
"[4] on September 6, other actors appeared on Good Morning America."
"[3] drew Scott has been announced as the first celebrity to partner Emma Slater in this season's competition."



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Another added:”
“I also had ice diapers added to mine to help w swelling.”
“Those stretch undies are the best things ever after baby.”
“A fan wrote:Congrats!!”
“And, as per usual, people loved the honesty.”
“There was also this adorable exchange:She also shared this photo of her in a hospital robe, because realness.”
“Other women wrote in with their birth experiences too...”
“With graphic detail included.”
“...revealed that her second birth was far easier than the first with her daughter Luna...”
“Looks a lot like daddy there but I can see mommy in his chin And He looks like he s already planning some songs to write down lol However it s not a Chrissy Teigen post unless there s a dollop of realness added and she took to Twitter and...”


Another added:
"I added ice diapers to my diapers to help reduce the swelling."
"Those stretch underwear are the best thing ever, baby."
"Fans wrote: Congratulations!"
"And, as always, people like to be honest."
"There's also a lovely exchange: she also shared this picture of her in a hospital robe because it's" real. "
"Other women also wrote about their birth experiences..."
"Include graphic details."
“… It's much easier to reveal her second child than her first and daughter Luna... "
"It looks like Dad, but I can see mom on his chin, he looks like he has planned some songs to write down to laugh, but this is not a Chris tegan post, unless there is a real addition, she goes on Twitter and..."



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As soon as Elio’s outfits reached the public, inspiring thinkpieces a plenty, the world went gaga for his 1980s wardrobe.”
“...of sex electricity and romanticism...”
“As he jumped on stage at LaGuardia High School s Rising Stars of 2012 event Dougy ing like no white boy had ever Dougied before Lil Timmy Tim decided to don a pair of MC Hammer worthy white adidas sweats...”
“At 17 years old, his fashion sense was clearly still in its formative stages.”
“-- so we’ll start our journey at his first (and so far only) foray into the music world, with his now prolific Lil Timmy Tim act.”
“But Timothée Chalamet ain’t no normal kid -- he’s got a bloody Academy Award nomination!”
“...in your lives...”
“2013 Lil Timmy Tim Okay we don t know about you but we feel it s unfair for anybody to judge the fashion choices of a kid purely because we ve all dressed like an absolute dickhead at some point...”
“These, in our humble opinion, are a selection of his most important looks; the ones that have acted as bookmarks in his style story from the very beginning.”
“But with each passing year, from cocky high school drama kid, to dressing modestly at schmoozy film events, to flat-out dominating the red carpets last awards season, Timothée has always proved that he’s a man of growth.”


"As soon as Elio's clothes came into the market, they inspired a lot of people, and the whole world was crazy about his clothes in the 1980s."
“… Sexuality and romanticism... "
"When he jumped onto the stage of LaGuardia high school's 2012 new star event, dougy ing was like no white boy had ever worn dougy ing before lil Timmy Tim decided to wear a white Adidas Sweatshirt suitable for MC hammer..."
"At the age of 17, his sense of fashion was obviously still in the formative stage."
"So we're going to start our journey with his first (and so far only) foray into music, his now prolific lil Timmy Tim performance."
"But Timothy chalamit is no ordinary kid - he's got a damned Oscar nomination!"
“… In your life... "
"2013 lil Timmy Tim well, we don't know about you, but we think it's unfair for anyone to judge a child's fashion choice simply, because we all dress like idiots..."
"In our opinion, these are the most important selections of his appearance, and from the beginning they are the bookmarks in his style story."
"But over time, from the arrogant high school drama kid, to the well-dressed in boring movie activities, to the red carpet lead last season, Timothy has always proved that he is a growing man."



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“My side piece in orlando.”
“Dear @daxshepard1, this is john.”
“She took time to ask people where they were from, if their homes were OK. She insisted on seeing the gym where everyone was sleeping on cots spread across the floor.”
“Then she took pictures and signed autographs for another half hour.”
“And she sang a song that was cut from Frozen called 'More Than Just The Spare.'”
“Rodriguez continued, "She sang 'Do You Want To Build A Snowman'.”
“#hurricaneirma," she wrote on Instagram.”
“Richard and Rebecca everyone!”
“"When you're #singinginahurricane, your volunteer back up dancers can & will steal the show.”
“Bell shared a pic from the performance, joking she was getting upstaged by her dancers.”


"My supporting role in Orlando."
"Dear @ daxshepard1, I'm John."
"She took the time to ask people where they came from and whether their homes were OK. She insisted on going to the gym, where everyone was sleeping on a bed full of floors. "
"Then she took another half-hour's photo and autograph."
"She also sang a song cut from the ice called 'not just superfluous'
"Rodriguez went on," she sang, "do you want to make a snowman?"
"Hurricane IRMA," she wrote on instagram
"Hello Richard and Rebecca
"When you sing" the new Yorker, "your volunteer partner steals your performance."
Bell shared a photo of the show, joking that she was taken over by her dancers



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...including your lips...”
“Back To TOC Pros Hydrates and moisturizes lips Multipurpose stick Is absorbed easily Long wearing Affordable Cons Contains mineral oil and fragrance Review If you love the heavenly smell of cocoa butter this Palmer s lip balm not only smells delicious but also works exceptionally well for moisturizing dry skin...”
“This lip balm is pure gold and does more than what most expensive brands only claim to do.”
“It also helps minimize the signs of aging and is extremely gentle on your lips.”
“But once you wake up and wipe off the lip balm, your lips will look and feel wonderfully soft and supple.”
“This night treatment is icky to use and leaves a whitish cast behind.”
“...lips...”
“Similar Products Pros Hydrates softens and de flakes parched lips Fragrance free Contains vitamin E and antioxidants Visible difference after just three nights of usage Affordable and easily available Cons Leaves a whitish cast behind Review Night time is perhaps the best time to pamper the hell out of your...”
“If you are big on using organic products, be it cosmetics or skin care, this medicated lip balm by Burt’s Bees is made just for you.”
“The butters in this formula soak into the skin on your lips and leave your pout feeling soft and supple after just a few uses.”


“… Including your lips... "
"Back To TOC Pros Moisturizing Lip Gloss multifunctional lipstick is easy to absorb long wearing price affordable Cons containing mineral oil and fragrance review. If you love the wonderful smell of cocoa butter, this Palmer lip balm is not only delicious, but also moisturizing effect for dry skin is very good."
"This lip balm is pure gold, much more effective than most expensive brands claim."
"It also helps reduce signs of aging and is very gentle on your lips."
But once you wake up and wipe the lipstick, your lips will look and feel very soft.
"This nighttime treatment is disgusting and leaves a white shadow."
“… Lips... "
"The advantages of similar products hydrate soften and descale dry lips fragrance free contains vitamin E and antioxidants are significantly different after only three nights of use, affordable and easy to get the disadvantages left behind by a white comment. Night time may be the best time to spoil your hell up..."
"If you are passionate about using organic products, whether it's cosmetics or skin care products, this kind of lip balm made by Bert bee is tailored for you."
"The butter in this formula will seep into the skin of your lips and make your pout feel soft and supple after several uses."



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Just Weeks After Giving Birth to Daughter Sienna This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Ciara Reveals She Lost 20 Lbs.”
“For more on the adorable couple, watch below!”
“Earlier this month, the Seattle Seahawks quarterback shut down the Seattle Art Museum for a special date night with his lady.”
“The singer has been hard at work getting her figure back in shape, training at the gym and sharing her workouts on social media.”
“RELATED: Russell Wilson Shuts Down Seattle Art Museum For Jaw-Dropping Date Night With CiaraCiara and her husband, Russell Wilson, welcomed Sienna, their first child together, in April.”
“Kim Kardashian West was also in attendance, rocking platinum hair and a black latex dress.”
“The "Goodies" singer showed off her elegant look on Instagram by sharing a handful of pics from the night, as well as a video of herself doing a sassy catwalk.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Just a few weeks after the birth of Siena, the video couldn't be played because we couldn't load the sponsor's information."
"Sheila revealed that she lost 20 pounds."
"For more information about this lovely couple, see below!"
Earlier this month, the Seahawks quarterback closed the Seattle Art Museum for a special date night with his wife
"The singer has been trying to get fit, train in the gym and share her training on social media."
"Related reports: Russell Wilson closed the Seattle Art Museum and had an eye opening date night with Sheila siala. Her husband Russell Wilson welcomed their first child, Siena, in April."
"Kim Kardashian West was also present, with platinum hair and a black latex dress."
The "goodies" singer showed off her elegant appearance on instagram, sharing several photos of the evening and a video of her own fashion show



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now it's finally her turn, and America is hers for the taking.”
“Claire's taking over Washington with no holds barred, and there's no telling where she'll go or what she'll do without Frank by her side.”
“And of course, while acknowledging the allegations against him, some fans are disappointed that Kevin Spacey won't return as Frank Underwood.”
“Audiences are so excited to call Claire their president and can't wait to see what kind of twisty plans the mastermind has up her sleeve.”
“Wednesday's special Fourth of July teaser got fans even more riled up.”
“In it, busy chaos ensues in the White House, as Claire, posted up in the Oval Office, calmly stands from her chair and tells the audience, "We're just getting started."”
“But fans were already terrified and thrilled back in March, when the first Season 6 teaser trailer was released.”
“In June, the first House of Cards Season 6 photos were released by Netflix, and the stills teased Claire's (Robin Wright) fierce determination.”
“After the message comes a blank screen with the hashtag #MyTurn.”
“Variety reported that newly-surfaced allegations against Spacey, which are from 1996 to 2013, were being investigated and confirmed by police.”


"Now it's her turn. America will be her world."
"Claire will take over Washington without hindrance. Without frank, she will never know where to go."
"Of course, while admitting the charges against him, some fans are disappointed that Kevin Spacey will not return as Frank Underwood
"The audience are excited to call Claire their president and can't wait to see what kind of twists and turns the mastermind has."
"The July 4 special on Wednesday made fans even more angry."
In the film, the White House is in chaos. Claire is sent to the Oval Office of the White House. She calmly stands on her chair and tells the audience, "we're just beginning."
"But as early as March, when the season 6 Trailer was released, fans were already scared and excited."
"In June, Netflix released the first photo of season 6 of house of cards, which mocks Claire's determination."
"When the message is sent, a blank screen with the label" myturn "will appear."
Police are investigating and confirming new charges against spacey from 1996 to 2013, variety reported



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'Cheryl... is more in love than ever and Matthew absolutely reciprocates the same feelings,' the source added.”
“News Monday.”
“They are super happy,' a source recently told E!”
“'Cheryl and Matthew are very serious.”
“They first dated in 2007Their 'second time around' relationship certainly seems to be hotting up judging from their romantic getaway.”
“...to Instagram Tuesday Romantic getaway The Dancing With The Stars pro also shared this image of herself relaxing against an ocean backdrop Second time s a charm The dancer and the former Boy Meets World star are reported to be serious second time around...”
“Cheryl and Matthew first started dating in 2007 after meeting on the set of the ABC reality dance competition and broke up after about a year Fun times Adventure of a lifetime Cheryl wrote alongside a photo of the couple in swimsuits underneath a splashing tropical waterfall that she posted...”
“News reported back in February that the two were back together.”
“E!”
“Beach vibe: Cheryl Burke, 33, and Matthew Lawrence, 37, have rekindled their romance and are enjoying a vacation in the Caribbean, sharing their happiness with fans via social media'Sunday Funday,' she captioned a selfie in which she's seen leaning in towards her beau while wearing a skimpy bikini.”


"Cheryl... "He loves him more than ever and Matthew will definitely repay the same sentiment," the source added
"Monday news."
A source recently told e
"Cheryl and Matthew are serious."
"Their first date in 2007, from their romantic run away, their 'second date' relationship seems to be heating up."
“… For instagram's romantic trip on Tuesday, dancing with stars professionals also shared pictures of relaxing in the ocean for the second time, which is a kind of charm. It is reported that the dancer and the former boy are serious about meeting the world star for the second time... "
"Cheryl and Matthew met on the stage of the ABC reality show dance competition in 2007 and started dating. After a year of ups and downs, they broke up. In a photo she posted, Cheryl wrote, "the couple are playing under the tropical waterfall in their swimsuits..."
"As early as February, there was news that they were reunited."
“E！”
"Beach atmosphere: Cheryl Burke, 33, and Matthew Lawrence, 37, rekindled their romance, spending their holiday in the Caribbean, sharing their happiness with fans through the social media 'Sunday fund'," she wrote in a self portrait, seeing herself wearing a tight bikini and leaning against her boyfriend



**Something goes wrong**
“You can get Chrissy Teigen’s new cookbook Cravings: Hungry For More on Amazon for $17.99!”
“This banana bread is unlike any other kind of banana bread I’ve made.”
“Teigen writes, “You will think you only need five because it looks like enough, but it will not be enough.” It’s true.”
“First of all, you definitely do need six bananas, so don’t cheap out and only get five.”
“I fought against the deep, deep urge to throw in the tiniest dash of cinnamon, but ultimately followed the recipe exactly the way Teigen intended it to be followed.”
““You guys, Chrissy’s banana bread doesn’t call for cinnamon and I’m nervous,” I wrote in my So Yummy editorial group chat.”
“It called for the aforementioned six brown bananas, vanilla instant pudding mix, shredded coconut, dark chocolate chunks, and no spices.”
“Usually I stick to the classic recipes (bananas, flour, cinnamon, some sugar, blah, blah), so when I read through Teigen’s recipe, I was rattled.”
“And, fun fact, I’ve made a lot of banana bread.”
“Which I decided to make on Yom Kippur, no less (meaning: I couldn’t actually eat it until sundown, torture!).”


You can buy Chris tegan's new recipe, desire: desire for more, for $17.99 on Amazon
"This banana bread is different from any other banana bread I make."
"You think you only need five because it looks like it's enough, but it's not enough," tegan wrote It's true
"First of all, you definitely need six bananas, so don't be cheap, just buy five."
"I strongly opposed that strong desire and didn't want to add a little cinnamon, but I did it according to tegan's intention."
"You guys, Chris's banana bread doesn't need cinnamon, and I'm nervous," I wrote in my delicious editorial group chat
"The six Brown bananas mentioned above, vanilla instant pudding, coconut shreds, dark chocolate chips, no spices."
"Usually I stick to classic recipes (bananas, flour, cinnamon, some sugar, etc.), so when I read through tegan's recipes, I'm nervous."
"And, interestingly, I made a lot of banana bread."
"This is what I decided to do on Yom Kippur. It's not bad at all."



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Bravo]”
“Let us know in the comments below.”
“Teresa has been visiting her husband, Joe, on a weekly basis, yet sources claim that she’s already moved on to another man.”
“According to Us Magazine, Teresa’s prison visits have gotten less frequent over the past month.”
“While the couple’s kids continue to talk to their dad on the phone, Teresa has started dating a businessman from New Jersey and hasn’t seen Joe in months.”
“In fact, Teresa’s former friend, Kim DePaola, claims that she’s been dating the man for almost half a year.”
““They’ve been pretty cozy I’m going to say in the last five months,” she stated.”
“While Teresa is getting a little side action while her husband is in prison, DePaola doesn’t think she’s doing anything wrong.”
“After all, Joe has allegedly cheated on Teresa on multiple occasions, though they have both denied it.”
““I think Teresa has every right to go out and find somebody else.”


"[wonderful picture]"
"Please let us know in the comments below."
"Theresa visits her husband Joe every week, but there's news that she's already living with another man."
"According to American magazine, Theresa's prison visits have decreased in the past month."
"When the couple's children continue to talk to their father on the phone, Theresa has started dating a businessman from New Jersey and hasn't seen Joe for months."
"In fact, Theresa's former friend Kim dePaola claims that she has been dating this man for nearly half a year."
"What I'm going to say is that they've been quite comfortable in the last five months," she said
"When Theresa got some side effects while her husband was in prison, Deborah didn't think she had done anything wrong."
"After all, Joe cheated Teresa many times, but they all denied it."
"I think Theresa has every right to go out and find someone else."



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
“Although the gorgeous duo’s love appears to be stronger than ever this holiday, there’s still been controversy over their big age difference.”
“Sofia Richie took to Instagram to post an adorable pic and send a sweet Valentine’s Day message to her beau Scott Disick.”
“See it here!”
“Sofia Richie, 19, posted a sweeter than candy Instagram message to Scott Disick, 34, on Feb. 14 for Valentine’s Day and it was absolutely romantic!”
“The post included a cozy black and white pic of Sofia sitting on Scott’s lap while the two looked stylish in shades.”
““Happy Valentines babe ,” Sofia captioned the photo.”
“The couple have seemed to be going strong since they started dating last year and this loving gesture from Sofia just further proves that!”
“With Sofia being 15 years younger than Scott, the pair have had to endure a lot of scrutiny from the public, including Kendall Jenner, 22, Scott’s ex Kourtney Kardashian‘s sister.”
“Happy Valentines babe  A post shared by Sofia Richie (@sofiarichie) on Feb 14, 2018 at 3:20pm PSTHollywoodLifers, what do you think about Sofia’s sweet message to Scott for Valentine’s Day?”


"Let us know!"
"Although the love of this gorgeous couple seems to be stronger than ever in this festival, there is still controversy about the size of their age gap."
"Sofia Richie posted a lovely picture on instagram and sent a sweet Valentine's Day message to her boyfriend Scott disc."
"Look here!"
Sophia Ritchie, 19, sent a message sweeter than candy to Scott Disick, 34, on instagram on February 14, Valentine's day. It's absolutely romantic
"There is a comfortable black-and-white photo in the post. Sophia is sitting on Scott's lap, and the color of the two looks very fashionable."
"Happy Valentine's day, baby," Sofia wrote under the title of the photo
"It seems that the couple have been very strong since they started dating last year, and Sophia's attitude of love just proves that!"
"Because Sophia is 15 years younger than Scott, they have to endure a lot of public scrutiny, including Kendall Jenner, 22, and Scott's sister, former Courtney Kardashian."
"Happy Valentine's day baby" Sofia Richie (@ sofiarichie) shared a post in Hollywood lifers at 3:20 pm on February 14, 2018. What do you think of Sofia's sweet message to Scott on Valentine's day



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Here's a reminder of their relationship so far:11 December 2017: The rumour mill rolls into action when the former 1D singer wishes Hailee a happy 21st birthday, calling her one of his best friends and "the loveliest person on the planet", which is quite a claim.”
“He signs off the adorable picture of them from the American Music Awards in November with: "Love ya hails".”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“2 January 2018: Niall and Hailee reportedly go to see the West End production of the musical Hamilton in London.”
“21 January 2018 Hailee is asked directly about the Niall rumours by US Weekly and she gives them a kind of vague answer saying I feel so lucky that my fans care enough about me to know what I m doing every second of every day but I think that...”
“...sometimes it s hard for people in general to realise that there are boundaries to a person s life and personal life...”
“She added that she is a "very private person" too which is fair enough.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"This is a reminder of their relationship, so date: December 11, 2017: Happy 21st birthday to the former 1D singer Zhu Haili, calling her one of Haili's best friends and" the most lovely person on earth ", which is a very convincing statement
He signed their lovely picture at the American Music Awards in November: "love, cheer"
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"January 2, 2018: it is reported that Neil and Haley went to London to watch the west end performance of the musical Hamilton."
"On January 21, 2018, Hailee was directly asked by American weekly about Niall rumors. She gave them a vague answer. She said that I feel very lucky. My fans care about me enough to know what I am doing every second of every day, but I think..."
“…… Sometimes it's hard for people to realize that there is a boundary between one's life and one's life... "
She added that she was also a "very private person," which is fair



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED: Selena Gomez’s Second Coach Collection Includes Clothing (and Yes, We’re Excited)”
“You’re like the dad!”We’d take it as a compliment.”
“She said, “Courtney would be Monica, I would be Rachel, Raquel would be Phoebe, you [Kennedy] would be Ross.”
“So, naturally, Gomez assigned roles to her squad before confirming that she is, in fact, a Rachel.”
“After discussing her two best friends—Raquelle Stevens and Courtney Barry—host Jason Kennedy prompted the actress to reveal which Friends character she relates to most.”
“News, where she opened up about her personal life in a rapid fire round of questions.”
“Selena Gomez recently sat down for an interview with E!”
“It appears we aren’t the only ones who take Friends very seriously.”


"Related: Selena Gomez's second coaching line includes clothing (yes, we're excited)"
"You're like Dad! "We think it's a compliment."
She said, "Courtney is Monica, I'm Rachel, Lacker is Phoebe, and you (Kennedy) are Ross."
"So, before confirming that he is Rachel, Gomez naturally assigned a role to his team."
"After discussing her two best friends, Raquel Stevens and Courtney Barry, the host Jason Kennedy urged the actress to reveal her favorite friend role."
"News, she made her personal life public in a round of quick questions."
"Serena Gomez recently sat down and accepted the E!"
"It seems that we are not the only one who takes our friends very seriously."



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The series, which was first developed at The CW, has already been picked up for a 10-episode second season.”
“Chilling Adventures of Sabrina releases its first 10-episode season Oct. 26 on Netflix.”
“The rest of the cast includes Miranda Otto, Lucy Davis, Ross Lynch, Michelle Gomez, Chance Perdomo, Jaz Sinclair, Richard Coyle, Tati Gabrielle, Adeline Rudolph, Abigail Cowen, Lachlan Watson, Bronson Pinchot and Gavin Leatherwood.”
“In the role of Sabrina, the Mad Men grad will star as an empowered young woman who is just beginning her dark education as a sorceress, even as she tries to maintain a normal life as a sophomore at Baxter High.”
“The drama hails from Warner Bros. Television-based Berlanti Productions.”
“The series comes from Riverdale mastermind Roberto Aguirre-Sacasa, who executive produces alongside Riverdale collaborators Greg Berlanti, Sarah Schechter, Archie Comics CEO Jon Goldwater and Lee Toland Krieger.”
“Tonally in the vein of Rosemary’s Baby and The Exorcist, the adaptation finds Sabrina wrestling to reconcile her dual nature — half-witch, half-mortal — while standing against the evil forces that threaten her, her family and the daylight world humans inhabit.”
“Sabrina imagines the origin and adventures of Sabrina the Teenage Witch as a dark coming-of-age story that traffics in horror, the occult and, of course, witchcraft.”
“The second of two photos shared exclusively by The Hollywood Reporter, below, shows a scene from the dark baptism of Sabrina.”
“Star Kiernan Shipka makes her debut as Sabrina Spellman in the first photos from Chilling Adventures of Sabrina, an expansion of the world of The CW's Riverdale.”


"This series was first developed in CW TV station, and now it has taken on the second season of 10 episodes."
Sabrina thriller will release its first season of 10 episodes on Netflix on October 26
The rest of the cast included Miranda Otto, Lucy Davis, Ross Lynch, Michelle Gomez, chance Perdomo, Jaz Sinclair, Richard Coyle, Richard Coyle, y, y, y and so on.
"In Sabrina's role, the mad man graduate will play a powerful young woman who has just begun her dark education as a wizard, despite her efforts to maintain a normal life as a sophomore at Baxter high school."
"It's from berlanti productions on Warner Bros."
"The series comes from Riverdale's curator, Roberto Aguirre sacasa, who is working with Riverdale's collaborators, Greg berlanti, Sarah Schechter, Jon Goldwater, chief executive of Archie comics, and Lee Toland Krieger."
In the tune of Rosemary's child and Exorcist, Sabrina tries to reconcile her dual nature, half Witch and half human, while confronting the evil forces that threaten her, her family and the solar world in which human beings live
"Sabrina imagines the origin and adventure of Sabrina as a dark Adult Story about terror, mystery and, of course, witchcraft."
"The following is the second of two exclusive photos shared by Hollywood reporters, showing Sabrina's dark baptism."
In the first photo of Sabrina adventures, Kirnan shipka makes her debut as Sabrina Spearman, an extension of CW Riverdale's world



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Alberto E. Rodriguez/Getty ImagesImage zoom Credit: Alberto E. Rodriguez/Getty ImagesWonder Woman also stars Chris Pine, Connie Nielsen, Robin Wright, Danny Huston, David Thewlis, Elena Anaya, and Lucy Davis.”
“I had so much fun at the premiere,” Carter tweeted on Friday.”
“These do not influence editorial content, though Meredith may earn commissions for products purchased via affiliate links.”
“Wonder Woman type MovieThe Hollywood premiere of Wonder Woman on Thursday got a double dose of Diana Prince.”
“Gal Gadot, who plays the titular heroine in Patty Jenkins’ film, joined original Wonder Woman actress Lynda Carter on the red carpet.”
“Carter, who starred on the beloved TV series in the 1970s, previously teamed up with Gadot at the United Nations last year, when Wonder Woman was named an honorary ambassador for the empowerment of women and girls.”
“(The U.N. ultimately dropped that campaign two months later, after the initiative was met with criticism.)”
““In some magical and mystical way, there lies within each of us Wonder Woman,” Carter said at the time.”
““She is real.”
“She lives and she breathes.”


"Image zooming credit: Alberto E. Rodriguez / Getty Images Image Zooming credit: Alberto E. Rodriguez / Getty Images wonder also stars Chris pine, Connie Nelson, Robin Wright, Denny Houston, David SELIS, Elena Anaya and Lucy Davis."
"I had a good time at the premiere," Carter tweeted on Friday
"These don't affect editing content, although Meredith may earn a commission on products purchased through affiliate links."
"The Wonder Woman movie" Wonder Woman "premiered in Hollywood on Thursday, doubling Diana Prince's share."
Gail gadote, who plays the unsubstantial heroine in Patty Jenkins' film, walks down the red carpet with the original goddess Linda Carter
"Carter starred in a popular TV series in the 1970s and worked with gadote at the United Nations last year when wonder woman was appointed honorary ambassador for empowering women and girls."
(two months later, the United Nations finally abandoned the campaign because the initiative was criticized.)
Carter said at the time: "in some magical and mysterious way, there is a magical woman in each of us."
"She's real."
"She's alive, she's breathing."



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Also on display in the trailer are short glimpses of villain Snoke, a battle between Finn (John Boyega) and Captain Phasma (Gwendoline Christie) and an ominous new line from Luke: "This is not going to go the way you think."”
“It was the first time fans have seen Luke inside Han Solo's famous smuggling starship since 1980's The Empire Strikes Back.”
“The latest trailer featured Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill) once again stepping aboard the Millennium Falcon.”
“During Wednesday night's (Nov 1) World Series Game 7 between the Dodgers and Astros, a new spot was unveiled for Star Wars: The Last Jedi.”
“The Force is growing stronger.”
“The film opens Dec. 15.”


The trailer also shows a glimpse of the villain snooker, a battle between Finn (John boyga) and captain fasma (Gwendolyn Christie), and an ominous new word from Luke: "it won't be like you think."
"This is the first time that fans have seen Luke in Han Solo's famous stowaway starship since the Empire Strikes Back in 1980."
"In the latest trailer, Luke Skywalker (Mark Hamill) is once again aboard the Falcon."
"On Wednesday night (November 1), in Game 7 of the Dodgers Astro Boy world series, a new location for Star Wars was unveiled: the last Jedi."
"The army is getting stronger and stronger."
"The film will be released on December 15."



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contact us at letters@time.com.”
“Please attempt to sign up again.”
“Sources inside NBC tell The Hollywood Reporter that the network is looking for a writer to bring back the beloved series, which ran in syndication from 1995 to 2001.”
“The show’s original executive producers, Robert Tapert and Sam Raimi, are apparently already on board.”
“It’s unclear whether the original star, Lucy Lawless (who is married to Tapert), would appear in the new version, though it seems there is a desire inside the network to have her involved in some way.”
“The project is considered a “modern reboot” and insiders say there’s hope to launch it for the 2016 season.”
“[The Hollywood Reporter]Get The Brief.”
“Sign up to receive the top stories you need to know right now.”
“Please enter a valid email address.”
“* The request timed out and you did not successfully sign up.”


"Contact us letters@time.com 。”
"Please try to register again."
"Sources inside NBC told Hollywood Reporter that the station was looking for a writer to bring back the beloved series, which was broadcast jointly from 1995 to 2001."
"The original executive producers of the show, Robert Tappert and Sam lemy, have obviously joined in."
"It's not clear whether the original Star Lucy lawless (married to Tapert) will appear in the new version, but the Internet seems to want her to be involved in some way."
"This project is considered to be a 'modern restart', and insiders say it is expected to be launched in the 2016 season."
"(Hollywood Reporter) got the briefing."
"Sign up now to receive the top stories you need to know."
Please enter a valid email address
"* the request timed out. You did not register successfully."



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Getty ImagesIn 2016, the 'Bad Liar' singer cancelled 34 remaining dates on her Revival world tour to seek treatment at a Tennessee facility to help her with anxiety, panic attacks and depression.”
“E!”
“News has confirmed the 25-year-old recently completed a two-week treatment programme for depression and anxiety.”
“'She had a difficult year, especially towards the end, and she decided she wanted to spend some time focusing on herself,' a source told the news outlet.”
“'It was all about wellness and her health.'”
“Getty ImagesSelena reportedly sought professional help in New York City, months after she unfollowed her mother, Mandy Teefey, on Instagram following rumours the pair had argued over her rekindled romance with Justin.”
“News reports Bieber was aware of Gomez's decision to seek treatment and fully supported her decision.”
“'She wanted to get back to a healthy place,' a source added.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Getty Imagein 2016, the 'bad liar' singer canceled the remaining 34 dates on her Renaissance world tour and went to an institution in Tennessee to seek treatment to help her relieve anxiety, panic attacks and depression."
“E！”
"It has been confirmed that the 25-year-old recently completed a two-week treatment plan for depression and anxiety."
"She had a difficult year, especially towards the end, and she decided to spend some time focusing on herself," one source told the news media
"It's all about health and her health."
Lena is reported to be seeking professional help in New York City after breaking up with her mother, Mandy Tiffany, on instagram a few months ago after rumors of a dispute over her renewed relationship with Justin
"The news reports that Bieber is aware of Gomez's decision to seek treatment and fully supports her decision."
"She wants to go back to a healthy place," one source added



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See more cute pics of the couple through the years below.”
“I’m proud to be by your side x.”Hadid also included more photos of her with Malik.”
““Cheers to YOUR YEAR my @zayn – happiest happiest birthday & 25th year of life !!”
““Love this man more than I could ever put into words, & am inspired by his drive to be and do better everyday,” Hadid wrote on Instagram, alongside a Boomerang video of her and Zayn nuzzling.”
“He and the 22-year-old model have been dating for more than two years.”
“The pop star celebrated his 25th birthday on Friday and got a sweet tribute from his girlfriend, Gigi Hadid.”
“Happy birthday, Zayn Malik!”


"You'll see more lovely pictures of the couple in the years to come."
"I'm proud to be with you." Hadid also attached more photos of her and Malik
"To your year, my @ zayn - the happiest birthday & the 25th year of your life!"
"I love this man more than I can express in words, and I'm inspired by his motivation to do better every day," Hadid wrote on instagram
"He's been dating a 22-year-old model for more than two years."
The pop star celebrated his 25th birthday on Friday and received a sweet compliment from his girlfriend, Gigi Hadid
"Happy birthday, Zane Malik!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Williams told McEnroe to “respect me and my privacy as I’m trying to have a baby”.”
“The cover was released the same day John McEnroe said he would not apologize for saying Williams would be ranked around No 700 in the world if she played in the men’s game.”
““I’m waiting to find out but would love to hear your thoughts,” she said.”
“...pic.twitter.com/Nnq4VKCu8N — Serena Williams (@serenawilliams) June 27, 2017Williams shared an image of the Vanity Fair cover on Tuesday morning and invited people to guess whether she was having a boy or girl.”
“I'm waiting to find out but would love to hear your thoughts.”
“Question- what do u guys think boy or girl?”
“Check out my Vanity Fair Cover.”
“The article accompanying the Vanity Fair photo tells the story of their relationship.”
“This is happening sooner than later, and it’s going by so fast.”She is having the baby with her fiance, the Reddit co-founder Alexis Ohanian.”
““This is kind of how I am right now.”


Williams told McEnroe "respect me and my privacy because I'm trying to have a child."
"On the same day as the cover was released, John McEnroe said that if Williams played in the men's game, he would not apologize for Williams being ranked 700th in the world."
"I'm waiting to find out, but I'd love to hear what you think," she said
“... pic.twitter.com/Nnq4VKCu8N -Serena Williams (@ Serena Williams) on the morning of Tuesday, June 27, 2017, Williams shared a photo of the cover of vanity fair and invited people to guess whether she had a boy or a girl. "
"I'm waiting to find out, but I'd love to hear what you think."
"Question - what do you think of boys and girls?"
"Look at my vanity fair cover."
"The article accompanying the vanity fair photo tells about their relationship."
She had a baby with her fiance, Alexis Ohanian, co-founder of reddit
"That's what I am now."



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“READ MORE FROM CSN: Kirk Cousins reflects on sacrifices of military members...”
“Messages left for a Jupiter police spokeswoman were not immediately returned.”
“No other details were immediately available.”
“He has been charged under a Driving Under the Influence statute.”
“He was released just before 11 a.m. on his own recognizance.”
“Here's Tiger Woods' mugshot after his arrest on DUI charge pic.twitter.com/d6f8CpOIc5 — Bradd Jaffy (@BraddJaffy) May 29, 2017Jail records show Woods had been arrested by police in Jupiter.”
“The Palm Beach County Sheriff's Office says on its website that Woods was booked into a county jail around 7 a.m. on Monday.”
“JUPITER, Fla. — Police say golf great Tiger Woods has been arrested on a DUI charge in Florida.”


"Read CSN more: cousin Kirk reflects on military sacrifice..."
"There was no immediate response to a message to a police spokesman for Jupiter."
"There are no other details yet."
"He has been charged with driving under the influence act."
"He was released on his own recognizance before 11 a.m."
This is a picture of Tiger Woods after he was arrested for drunk driving pic.twitter.com/d6f8CpOIc5 -Brad jaffy (@ braddjaffy) prison records on May 29, 2017 show that Woods was arrested by police in Jupiter
"The palm beach sheriff's office said on its website that Woods was put in county jail around 7 a.m. on Monday."
Police in Jupiter, Florida say golfer Tiger Woods has been arrested in Florida for drunk driving



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s becoming harder and harder!””
“It’s really hard to get everyone together these days.”
“We’re all going to be together and I cannot wait.”
““I’m going to cook the biggest meal with everything I know how to cook.”
“He just came out, like, Sir.”And, with the twins set to celebrate their first Christmas, Knowles-Lawson is preparing for a big family gathering with a massive meal.”
““He carries himself like that.”
“Rumi was named for their “favorite poet,” the 13th-century Persian, while their son Sir’s name came from sheer confidence: “Sir was like, man, come out the gate,” Jay-Z said on Rap Radar.”
“They are just adorable!”Beyoncé and JAY-Z welcomed the twins back in June with the rapper explaining the meaning of their names during an interview with Rap Radar.”
“Jay sometimes which is so cute and the girl she s just so happy all the time and so sweet...”
“This is my first experience around twins and they re so different and their personalities and they are wonderful She also joked that little Sir has the perfect mean mug The boy has a stare like a mean mug like...”


"It's getting harder and harder!"
"It's really hard to get people together now."
"We're all going to be together. I can't wait."
"I'm going to cook the most delicious meal with all my cooking skills."
"He just came out, like, sir." Besides, the twins are going to celebrate their first Christmas, and Knowles Lawson is preparing a big family party and a big dinner
"He's carrying himself like this."
Rumi's name comes from their "favorite poet," the 13th century Persian, while their son Sir's name comes from sheer self-confidence: "Sir is like, man, coming out of the gate," Jay-Z said on the rap radar
"How lovely they are! "Beyonce and Jay-Z explained the meaning of their names in an interview with rap radar in June and welcomed the twins back."
"Jay Chou is so lovely sometimes. Girls are always so happy and sweet..."
"This is my first time with twins. They are very different and have a good personality. She also joked that the little man had a perfect cup, and the boy had a look like the cup. "



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“11.”
““When is Deblasio gonna put an end to these senseless shorty fires burning on the dance floor?”From: S2E4 – ‘Kimmy Kidnaps Gretchen!’Who says it: LillianWhat it means: This throwaway line from Kimmy’s landlord is of course a reference to the lyrics of Sean Kingston ‘Fire Burning’.”
““Let me explain how the internet works.”
“4.”
“It was recently highlighted at the end of season 3 in a throwaway line made by Kimmy’s new boss Zach (who’s basically Back To The Future‘s Marty McFly, by the way).”
““This is a real apartment”From: VariousWho says it: VariousWhat it means: If you’re not paying attention you’ll probably miss the running joke that the house shared by Kimmy and Titus is actually a tugboat turned on its end.”
“3.”
“...third season of Kimmy Titus talks about his ex boyfriend D Fwan because Burgess played both characters...”
“D Fwan broke up with me Advertisement From S3E6 Kimmy Is a Feminist Who says it Titus Andromedon What it means Tituss Burgess Kimmy s Titus was briefly in 30 Rock as a reality TV star called D Fwan so it s weird for 30 Rock fans when in the...”
“2.”


“11.”
"When will debracio be able to end these meaningless fires of dwarfs burning on the dance floor?"? "From: s2e4 -" Kimmy kidnapped Gretchen! "Who said it: Lillian's words mean that the nonsense of Kimmy's landlord is, of course, quoting Sean Kingston's lyrics" on fire. "
"Let me explain how the Internet works."
“4.”
"That's what Kim's new boss, Zach, recently stressed at the end of the third season (who, by the way, is basically back to the future of Marty macpherey)
"This is a real apartment" from: variety who said: variety it means: if you don't pay attention, you may miss a popular joke that the house Kimmy and Titus share is actually a tugboat turned over
“3.”
“…… Kimmie Titus talked about his ex boyfriend D. fowan in season 3, because Burgess played these two roles... "
"D fwan and I broke up. Kimmy is a feminist in s3e6. He said it's Titus andromedon. What does that mean? Titus Burgess Kimmy's Titus was a reality TV star named D fwan in 30 Rock, so 30 rock fans are here
“2.”



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Meanwhile, Diane battles with a new partner at the firm, Liz Reddick-Lawrence (Audra McDonald); Maia becomes tougher after her parents’ scandal puts her on trial; and Lucca is brought back into Colin’s (Justin Bartha) orbit.””
“After a copycat murder, the firm begins to look at its own clients suspiciously.”
“Amidst the insanity, Diane (Baranski), Lucca (Cush Jumbo), Maia (Rose Leslie) and the rest of the law firm find themselves under psychological assault when a client at another firm kills his lawyer for overcharging.”
“Here’s the official tease for season 2 from the streaming service: “The world is going insane, and the Chicago murder rate is on the rise.”
“The streaming service announced today that The Good Fight — the spin-off of The Good Wife that stars Baranski — will return for a new, 13-episode season on March 4.”
“Fortunately, CBS All Access is ready to help.”


"At the same time, Diane has a dispute with Liz Reddick Lawrence (Audra MacDonald), the new partner of the company; Maya is strengthened after her parents' scandal makes her stand trial; Luca is brought back to Colin's track (Justin Bassa)
"After a copycat murder, the company began to treat its customers suspiciously."
In the case of insanity, when a client of another law firm killed his lawyer for overcharging, Diane (baransky), Luca (Kush jumbo), Maya (Rose Leslie) and others in the law firm found themselves under psychological attack
Here's the official quip of the second season of streaming services: "the world is going crazy, and Chicago's murder rate is rising."
"The streaming service announced today that" belligerence "will air a new season of 13 episodes on March 4, a by-product of" good wife "starring balansky
"Fortunately, CBS all access is ready to help."



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...is at it for a mere sixty nine from Bloomingdale s...”
“In the event you re able to stroll down the aisle in all white just like the customized Chanel gown Margot Robbie wore you ll be able to rating an analogous embellished look which additionally exposes some leg whereas it...”
“Information fashion correspondent Zanna Roberts Rassi broke down Sunday night time’s greatest seems—and find out how to get them for much less, within the video above.”
“Fortunately, Marie Claire senior style editor and E!”
“We’ll be speaking concerning the standout fashion moments for years, with many re-creating the seems for their very own particular occasions…sans Hollywood finances.”


“… It's only $69 from Bloomingdale... "
"If you can walk down the aisle in all white, just like Margot Robbie's Chanel dress, you'll see a similar decoration, which exposes some extra legs, and it..."
"In the video above, Zanna Roberts Rassi, an information fashion reporter, analyzes in detail the best shows of Sunday night times and finds out how to buy them at a lower price."
"Fortunately, Mary Claire senior style editor and Mary Claire!"
"We're going to talk about the most eye-catching fashion moment in years when many people have redesigned their clothes for their own specific occasions There's no Hollywood financial situation. "



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments section below.”
“What did you think of the season 19 finale?”
“Big Brother season 19 brought a slew of blindsides, backstabbing and betrayal, and now it's time to see who won it all.”
“All season Paul Abrahamian was the frontrunner as he ruled the game and played puppet master to a house full of followers.”
“So, did the season 18 runner-up pull out a win his second time around?”
“The answer is: no.”
“The finale saw Paul sit in the final three with Christmas Abbott and Josh Martinez.”
“And Josh came out victorious in one of the most "volatile" seasons of the show, as host Julie Chen described it.”
“It was a shock to some that the Miami native walked away this season with a lot more than just meatballs, but one thing that wasn't a shock was how angry the jury felt towards Paul.”
“In the jury segment that was full of bitter members it was one of the most entertaining moments of the summer with a face-off between fan-favorite Mark and the one deemed as a piece of furniture by fans, Matt.”


"Please make a sound in the comments section below."
"What do you think of the end of season 19?"
"Big brother's season 19 has brought a series of blind spots, back stabbing and betrayals, and now it's time to see who won them all."
"Paul Abrahamian has been a leader all season, dominating the game, playing the puppet master in a house full of followers."
"So, is the 18th season runner up the second time?"
"The answer is: No."
"In the final, Paul joined Christmas Abbott and Josh Martinez in the final three
As host Julie Chen described it, Josh won the most "unstable" season of the show
"To some people's surprise, the Miami native left this season with more than meatballs, but one thing that didn't shock was the jury's anger at Paul
"In the judging session full of bitter members, this is one of the most interesting moments of this summer, with mark, the fan's favorite, versus Matt, who is regarded as furniture by fans."



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Clearly, Family Vacation has only scratched the surface of the wild Ronnie/Jen drama, and we will most definitely be seeing more in the coming weeks.”
“The breakdowns started happening when the two were apart: text messages from Jen were apparently so cruel to Ronnie that he got into a drunken fight in a bar bathroom and then broke down into tears at the house.”
“...and Jen on social media...”
“Ronnie Magro-Ortiz and his on-off girlfriend Jen Harley's rollercoaster relationship drama has, without a doubt, been the buzziest thing going on with the Jersey Shore Family Vacation cast since the end of Season 1 and throughout the months leading up to this new season.”
“Their antics have been incredibly confusing and hard to follow for many fans.”
“Thankfully, the Season 2 premiere of Family Vacation addresses the couple's massive social media blow-up right away.”
“Throughout the first season of Jersey Shore Family Vacation, Ronnie and Jen's drama also took the center stage, as Ronnie questioned his relationship with Jen while she was in her final months of pregnancy with his child.”
“But the two saved their biggest fight for off the cameras.”
“Partway through Season 1 airing, Ronnie and Jen shocked fans by launching into a particularly vicious fight publicly on their Instagram accounts.”
“The slew of insults and accusations between the couple was even more jarring since it happened only days after Jen had given birth to her and Ronnie's newborn child, Ariana Sky.”


"Obviously, family vacations only touch the surface of Ronnie / Jennifer's wild play, and we're sure to see more in the coming weeks."
"The breakup started when they were apart: Jennie's text messages were obviously cruel to Ronnie, he was drunk and fighting in the bar bathroom, and then he cried at home."
“… Hezhen is on social media... "
"There's no doubt that Ronnie Magro Ortiz's roller coaster romance with his off and on girlfriend, Jen Harley, is one of the liveliest for the Jersey coast family holiday show since the end of season one and the first few months of the season."
"Their antics are incredibly confusing and incomprehensible to many fans."
"Thankfully, the premiere of season 2 of family vacation immediately solved the couple's huge explosion on social media."
"In the first season of the Jersey coast family holiday, Ronnie and Jan's plays also took center stage, because Ronnie questioned his relationship with Jan when he was with his children in the last few months of his pregnancy."
"But the two saved their biggest fight."
"In the middle of the first season, Ronnie and Jennifer had a particularly vicious fight on instagram accounts, which shocked fans."
"The series of insults and accusations between the couple are even more harsh, because it happened a few days after jangang gave birth to Ariana Skye, the newborn of her and Ronnie."



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“She kept her eyes glued to the stage, watching the whole scene intently.”
“And while there were plenty of on-screen highlights, there were also lots of unseen moments.”
“Luckily, ET was inside the annual event, which was sponsored by FIJI Water, to bring you some of the best off-camera gems from the night.”
“Here they are:Apparently it’s not 5 o’clock somewhere.”
“Stars went from the red carpet to a cocktail reception before the awards show began.”
“But with the bar not opening until 5 p.m., several people were turned away, including Nick Jonas.”
“Mary J. Blige’s birthday!”
“The soulful singer rang in her 47th birthday at the show, and was spotted snacking on some Oreos at her table.”
“A reporter ordered her a birthday cake, but it tragically didn’t arrive until after she’d left the venue.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"She kept her eyes on the stage and was absorbed in the whole scene."
"Although there are many wonderful scenes on the screen, there are also many invisible moments."
"Fortunately, et participated in the annual event sponsored by Fijian water company and brought you some of the best camera gems of the night."
"They're here, obviously. It's not five o'clock
"Before the awards ceremony, the stars walked from the red carpet to the cocktail party."
"But because the bar didn't open until 5 p.m., several people were turned away, including Nick Jonas."
"Mary Blackie's birthday!"
"The affectionate singer sounded on the show on her 47th birthday when she was found eating Oreo on the table."
"A reporter ordered her a birthday cake, but unfortunately it didn't arrive until she left the meeting."



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“They snapped a photo with Carl XVI Gustaf and Queen Silvia, their daughter Crown Princess Victoria (the heir to the throne) and her husband, Prince Daniel, Duke of Västergötland.”
“About fifteen members of the Swedish royal court are expected to be present at the lunch, according to Kensington Palace.”
“Getty ImagesMiddleton dressed simply in a forest green turtleneck dress, black tights and pumps, but her stylish Swedish counterpart, Princess Victoria, went for something more lavish—a pink dress covered in rose patterns with sheer sleeves and a pussy-bow neckline.”
“The Queen wore a royal blue skirt suit, and the King and two Princes were also sharply dressed.”
“Like William and Kate, Princess Victoria and Prince Daniel are parents to two young children, five-year-old Princess Estelle and one-year-old Prince Oscar.”
“(You might recall the family of four's adorably snowy Christmas card.)”
“The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge, however, are expecting another baby in April.”
“Though this may be the two couples' first official photo together, it might not be their first time meeting.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"They were photographed with Carl XVI, Gustav and queen Sylvia, their daughter, crown prince Victoria (heir to the throne) and her husband, Prince Daniel, Duke of wollstrand."
According to Kensington Palace, about 15 Swedish Royal family members are expected to attend the lunch
"Getty Images Middleton simply wore a forest green high collar dress, black tights and high heels, but her fashionable Swedish colleague Princess Victoria chose a more luxurious dress - a pink dress covered with rose patterns, thin sleeves and a sissy neckline."
The queen was dressed in a royal blue dress, and the king and the two princes were well dressed
"Like William and Kate, Princess Victoria and Prince Daniel are parents of two children, one is five-year-old Princess Estelle, the other is one year old prince Oscar."
"You may remember the lovely white Christmas card of a family of four."
"However, the Duchess of Cambridge conceived another child in April."
"Although this may be the first time the couple have taken a formal group photo, it may not be the first time they have met."



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s Faces Places.”
“As the actor says, just sound it out—it’s phonetic.”
“Hear Jon Burlingame introduce him 20 seconds into the clip below.”
“AdvertisementAlexandre DesplatComposer, The Shape of WaterAlex is pronounced AL-ig-ZAHN-druh en français, while the T on Desplat is silent, leaving only dess-PLAH.”
“...goes by STOOL bahrg...”
“Kumail Nanjiani kumailn March 24 2017 Advertisement If you re still not sure here s David Letterman introducing his late night debut Advertisement Advertisement Advertisement Michael Stuhlbarg Actor Call Me by Your Name and The Shape of Water The actor who appeared in two of 2017 s most acclaimed films...”
“Sound it out.”
“Exactly.”
“Pro-tip: my name is pronounced exactly how it's spelled.”
“Here she is walking Ellen DeGeneres through how to pronounce her name:AdvertisementAdvertisementAdvertisementKumail NanjianiCo-screenwriter and star, The Big SickYou’re probably already pronouncing this one right.”


"It's a good place."
"As the actor said, just say it, it's Pinyin."
"Listen to Jon Burlingham introduce him in the following clip for 20 seconds."
"Advertisement Alexander de Platte composer, water Alex's shape is pronounced as Al Ig Zahn druh en Fran à AIS, while the T in de Platte is silent, leaving only de Platte."
“… Get off the stool... "
"Kumail nanjiani kumailn March 24, 2017 ad if you're not sure, here's David Letterman's introduction to his late night debut ad. actor Michael stuhlbarg calls me your name and the shape of water. Actors appear in two of the most popular movies of 2017..."
"Listen clearly."
"That's right."
"Professional tip: the pronunciation and spelling of my name are exactly the same."
"She's teaching Ellen DeGeneres how to pronounce a name: advertiser Kumar nanjaniko, screenwriter star, you may have read that right."



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“The smiles I saw yesterday made my heart smile!”
“The superstars graciously spent their Friday with child patients and their families at Seattle Children's Hospital -- and took to Instagram to share all the sweet pics.”
“"Was A Dream Come True!”
“Singing Christmas Carols with my girl @KellyRowland to the RockStar Patients of @SeattleChildrens.”
“@WhyNotYouFDN #StrongAgainstCancer," Ciara captioned a slideshow of her and Rowland rocking out with some of the kids.”
“Ciara and Rowland, both sporting Santa hats with their names on it and matching white sweatshirts, clearly had a great time bringing much-needed smiles to the hospital's patients.”
“"What a sweet time cutting the ribbon with Princess Pascuala, handing out Kindles and #deliveringsmiles with @Amazon!”
“@SeattleChildrens @WhyNotYouFDN," Ciara captioned another pic, before sharing a special video of herself and Rowland singing "Jingle Bells" for a patient named Erin.”
“"Thank you so much to @ciara & @seattlechildrens For having me!”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"The smile I saw yesterday made my heart smile!"
"The superstars spent their Friday with children's patients and their families at Seattle Children's Hospital and shared all the sweet photos on instagram."
"The dream has come true!"
"Sing Christmas carols with my daughter @ Kelly Rowland for the rock star patients of @ seattlechildren."
"Why not you FDN? Strong anti cancer," Sheila uses subtitles to describe her and Roland going out with some children in the slide
"Both Sheila and Roland are wearing christmas hats with their names printed on them and white sweatshirts. Obviously, they are very happy to bring much-needed smiles to the patients in the hospital."
"It's a sweet time to cut the ribbon with Princess Pascal and distribute kindles and delivering smiles with @ Amazon!"
“@ SeattleChildrens@WhyNotYouFDN Before sharing a special video of herself and Roland singing "Jingle Bells" for a patient named Irene, Sheila subtitled another picture
"Thank you very much@ ciara&@seattlechildrens Invite me



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Nicole will as per her words, most probably be seen as a judge in UK version of X factor as well.”
“Furthermore, E!”
“News did just that!”
“Nicole Scherzinger has somewhat come clean about the rumors of acting in the “Wicked” movie but she has still managed to zip her lips on the rumors of her coming back to X Factor UK.”
“Let us get into the details!”
“As fans have been anticipating Nicole Scherzinger’s appearance in the movie Wicked and the X Factor UK, E!”
“News grabbed this question and presented it to Nicole when they had the opportunity to do so at the 2017 Billboard Music Awards.”
“When asked if she is doing something new in music, Nicole revealed that she is “always in the studio” and that she has “got some really exciting collaborations coming up”.”
“E!”
“News reporter, Sibley Scoles went on to ask whether Nicole Scherzinger would be coming back to the X factor UK as per the internet rumors.”


"Nicole will, according to her words, most likely be seen as a judge in the UK version of the X factor as well."
"Besides, e!"
"That's the news!"
"Nicole Scherzinger has confessed to the rumor that she will play in the film evil, but she still refuses to comment on the rumor that she will return to the UK."
"Let's get to the details!"
"Fans have been looking forward to Nicole Scherzinger's role in the film" evil and the X element of England, "E
"The news seized on the issue and when they had the opportunity to do so at the Billboard Music Awards 2017, they presented it to Nicole."
When asked if there is any new progress in music, Nicole revealed that she "has been in the studio all the time" and that she "has some very exciting collaborations about to start"
“E！”
"Journalist Sibley Scholes then asked if Nicole shelzinger would return to the X factor UK according to Internet rumors."



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Congratulations to the happy couple!”
“Best of luck!"”
“On Sunday, May 27, 2018, the 54-year-old model took to Instagram to announce that she and husband Mattia Dessi are expecting their first child together.”
“However, for the Danish-Italian actress, the couple's little bundle of joy will be baby no.”
“5.”
“"Family getting larger," Nielsen captioned a photo of herself showing off her baby bump, complete with a red heart emoji and the hashtags, "#me #family #brigittenielsen #babybump."”
“On Wednesday, May 30, she shared a similar snapshot, writing, "Happy time positive vibes #happyness #positivevibes."”
“A post shared by Brigitte Nielsen (@realbrigittenielsen) on May 27, 2018 at 1:03pm PDTNielsen and Dessi, a 39-year-old Italian model, tied the knot in 2006 — marking the reality TV star's fifth marriage.”
“As People noted, she is already mom to four sons from her previous marriages: Julian Winding, 34, Killian Gastineau, 28, Douglas Meyer, 25, and Raoul Meyer Jr., 23.”
“"The children have kept me going," Nielsen told Hello!”


"Congratulations to the happy couple
"Good luck!"
"On Sunday, May 27, 2018, the 54 year old model announced on instagram that she and her husband Mattia dessi were looking forward to their first child together."
"For the Danish Italian actress, however, one of the couple's joys will be" baby no "
“5.”
"The family is getting bigger and bigger," Nelson added a red heart-shaped emoticon and label to a picture of himself showing off his small lump, "my family" brigitteneiesen "babybump"
On Wednesday, May 30, she shared a similar snapshot, which read, "happy times, positive atmosphere, happy times, positive atmosphere."
"Brigitte Nielsen (@ realbrigittenielsen) said in a post at 1:03 p.m. on May 27, 2018 that she married 39 year old Italian model dessi in 2006, marking the fifth marriage of the reality TV star."
"As they say, she is the mother of four sons: Julian winding, 34, Killian gastino, 28, Douglas Meyer, 25, and Raoul Meyer, 23."
"The kids keep me going," Nelson said to harrow



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We are praising God for this beautiful gift and ask that you join us in praying for a safe and healthy pregnancy.””
““Now, the journey has taken an exciting turn: we are expecting our first child!” they continued.”
“Truly, the Lord’s mercies are new every morning!” the couple wrote on their website.”
“We both looked forward to the joys of marriage but neither one of us fully understood just how amazing the start of this journey would be.”
““The past fourteen months have been the best of our lives as we have had the wonderful privilege of beginning our journey through life together in marriage.”
“Jinger (Duggar) Vuolo and her husband Jeremy Vuolo announced in early January that they are expecting their first child, due in July.”


"We praise God for this beautiful gift. Please join us in praying for a safe and healthy pregnancy."
"Now, there is an exciting turn in the journey: we are looking forward to our first child!"! "They went on."
"The love of the Lord is new every morning! "The couple wrote on their website."
"We all look forward to the happiness of marriage, but none of us fully understand how wonderful the beginning of this journey will be."
"The past 14 months have been the best time of our lives, because we were fortunate enough to start our journey together in our marriage."
Ginger wallow and her husband Jeremy wallow announced in early January that they would have their first child in July



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sometimes they really do take the best of us far too soon.”FROM PEN: Hear Why TI Decided To Bring His Hit Reality Show To an End...”
“One Direction, formed on The X Factor in 2010, went on hiatus in 2016 shortly after founding member Zayn Malik left the group to pursue his own solo career.”
“The pair documented the partial reunion on their Instagram Stories.”
“They were in the midwest for the ZPL Birthday Bash, which also featured Flo Rida, Fifth Harmony, James Arthur and Aaron Carter.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Look who I found,” Payne teases in selfie mode before twisting his phone to reveal Horan, who also had his phone at the ready.”
““What’s up?” he asks his smiling bandmate in the post.”
““And we’re here with the horse show, as well,” Horan noted in his post, moving from “Payno” to show the horse track they were near.”
“Horan gets photo credit for the tousled hair selfie that came next.”
“And Payne and Horan’s solo careers are off to their own impressive start.”


"Sometimes they really take us to the best place too soon." PAM: listen to why I decided to end his popular reality show
"One direction was founded in 2010 and X factor, and closed in 2016 shortly after founder member zayn Malik left the group to pursue his own career."
"The two recorded part of their reunion in the instagram story."
"They went to ZPL's birthday party in the Midwest, along with Flo Rida, fifth harmonic, James Arthur and Aaron Carter."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Let's see who I've found," says Penn in selfie mode, twisting his cell phone to reveal Holland, whose cell phone is ready
"What's the matter? "He asked his band mate who was smiling at the post office."
"We're here for the equestrian show, too," Holland said in his post, starting with "penno" to show off the raceway around them
"Holland won the photo honor for the next self portrait of disorderly hair."
"Penn and Holland have made an impressive start to their solo careers."



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Simone, who is arguably the most successful individual US female gymnast in the program's history, will no doubt be hoping to repeat the success of her teammates Gabby and Aly, who successful returned to their second Olympics in 2016, having already won gold in London in 2012.”
“Earlier this month, Simone and Ervin posted pictures of themselves posing with a group of friends at a Bryson Tiller concert in Houston, Texas, with neither choosing to tag their significant other in the post, no doubt keen to keep their relationship under wraps for a little longer.”
“The 20-year-old has confirmed a romance with fellow gymnast Stacey Ervin, taking to Instagram on Monday to post a sweet tribute to her new boyfriend.”
“Alongside an image of the couple sharing a tender embrace, Simone, who trains at the same gym as Stacey in Texas, posted the caption: 'Always smiling with you.'”
“Head over heels!”
“Simon Biles has confirmed her romance with fellow gymnast Stacey ErvinAwwww!”
“'Always smiling with you,' the 20-year-old Olympian captioned a photo of the cute couple staring at each other on a balconyAnd it seems Simone is not the only one ready to shout about the romance from the rooftops.”
“Ervin let slip the secret about their relationship a day before on his own account, after accompanying Simone to her induction into the Gymnastics Hall Of Fame.”
“'Words cannot express how incredibly proud I am of you, all you've accomplished and how well you carry yourself,' he wrote alongside a picture of the couple at the ceremony, smiling with their arms around each other.”
“'You make me feel like I am the luckiest man alive.”


"Simone can be said to be the most successful individual American female gymnast in the history of the event. She undoubtedly hopes to repeat the mistakes of her teammates Gaby and Ali, who successfully returned to the second Olympic Games in 2016 and won the gold medal in London in 2012."
"Earlier this month, Simone and Elvin posted photos of themselves with a group of friends at the Bryson tiller concert in Houston, Texas. Neither of them chose to mark their significant other in their posts. There is no doubt that they are eager to keep their relationship secret for some time."
"The 20-year-old has confirmed her relationship with gymnast Stacy Owen, and on Monday she posted a sweet tribute to her new boyfriend on instagram."
Simone and Stacy are training at the same gym in Texas. He posted a caption next to a photo: "always smile with you."
"Head to toe!"
Simon beers confirmed her love affair with gymnast Stacy elvino
The 20-year-old Olympian wrote in a photo of a lovely couple staring at each other on the balcony: "always smile with you, as if Simone is not the only one willing to shout romance on the roof."
"Elvin, after accompanying Simone into the gymnastic hall of fame, revealed the secret of their relationship the day before."
"Words can't express how proud I am of you, what you've achieved, and how you've performed," he wrote next to a group photo of the couple at the wedding, with arms embracing and a smile on their face
"You make me feel like I'm the luckiest person in the world."



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Oscar winner, 57, welcomed twins Alexander and Ella in June 2017 with his wife, Amal Clooney, whom he wed in September 2014.”
“That is certainly what happened to me this past year.”
“Stacy Keibler is pregnant and expecting her second child with her husband, Jared Pobre, Us Weekly can confirm.”
“The former WWE wrester, 38, and the businessman, 43, secretly tied the knot in March 2014.”
“They welcomed their first child, daughter Ava Grace, now 3, that August.”
“Three months after giving birth to their daughter, Keibler, who dated actor George Clooney from 2011 to 2013, revealed she never thought about marriage or parenthood until she started a relationship with her now-husband.”
““Life can be unpredictable.”
“You feel one way, and then … boom!” Keibler wrote on her lifestyle blog in December 2014.”
““You need to entirely change your perspective.”
“Until I started dating Jared, the idea of being married and having a family was never on my radar.”


"The 57 year old Oscar winner and his wife, Amar Clooney, welcomed twins Alexander and Ella in June 2017, and he married his wife in September 2014."
"In the past year, I did encounter this situation."
American weekly confirmed that Stacy Kebler is pregnant and that she and her husband Jared bobley are pregnant with a second child
"The 38 year old former WWE wrestler and 43 year old businessman married secretly in March 2014."
"That August, they had their first child, now three-year-old daughter EVA grace."
"Three months after giving birth to her daughter, Kebler dated actor George Clooney from 2011 to 2013. She revealed that she didn't think about marriage or parenting until she started dating her current husband."
"Life is unpredictable."
"You have a feeling, and then Bang! "Cable wrote on his lifestyle blog in December 2014."
"You need to completely change your point of view."
"Before I started dating Jared, the idea of getting married and having a family never came to my mind."



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Reporting by EMMA TYLER, ANDREA LAVINTHAL and MARY GREENKim & Kanye’s Relationship: From Flirtation to Family...”
“Multiply all that by roughly 200 guests and the hotel price tag could be more than half a million dollars.”
“Once on the ground a fleet of 45 to 50 cars and vans shuttled them to and from the Florence airport.”
“Private TransportationIn order to get their guests from pre-wedding festivities in Paris to the main event in Florence, the Wests chartered two private jets.”
“Kardashian s favorite song Young and Beautiful and the subsequent guided tour of Versailles...”
“With prices up to 190 a plate that dinner alone comes in at nearly 4 100 probably much much less than the cost of the next day s rehearsal dinner which included a performance by Lana Del Rey Kanye is rumored to have paid her a pretty penny to sing...”
“Pre-Wedding SpreeAmong the wedding activities list was a private bachelorette dinner for the bride and her closest girlfriends at Hôtel Costes, home of one of Paris’ top restaurants.”
“That’s not to mention the family’s luxe Villa San Michele accommodations in Florence, which cost at least $1,800 a night per room.”
“Both offer rooms for about $885 a night.”
“As Kardashian family friend Malika Haqq told PEOPLE after the wedding, “Kanye really went all out there with his love.” No kidding!”


"The relationship between Emma Taylor, Andrea lavinthal, Mary greenkin and Kanye: from flirting to family..."
"Multiply all this by about 200 guests, and the list price of the hotel could be more than $500000."
"Once on the ground, there are 45 to 50 cars and vans shuttling back and forth at Florence Airport."
Private transportation the West rented two private planes to take their guests from the pre wedding ceremony in Paris to the main event in Florence
"Kardashian's favorite song" young and beautiful "and the subsequent tour guide of Versailles..."
"The price of a plate of rice is as high as 190 pounds, and the dinner alone will cost nearly 4100 pounds, which may be much less than the cost of rehearsing dinner the next day. It is said that Lana Drey Kanye's performance is included, and she spent a lot of money to sing..."
One of the list of Pre Wedding carnivals is a private singles dinner for the bride and her closest girlfriend at h ô Tel Costes, home to a top restaurant in Paris
"That's not counting the family's luxury villa in Florence, the St. Michel Hotel, which costs at least $1800 per room per night."
"Both hotels offer rooms for around $885 a night."
As Marika Huck, a friend of the Kardashian family, told people after the wedding, "Kanye really goes all out with his love."! "



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““(I had to) kind of replace Luke with Kendall Jenner… So that’s kind of how that evolved.””
“...million times and they had a list of the models in those scenes that they wanted with the outfits they wanted...”
“Rood says The editors went through some of the story books that I had done and picked out some of their favourite iconic scenes from the Star Wars films with backgrounds everybody felt familiar with that you ve seen a...”
“Article content continuedKendall was inspired by A New Hope for her photo, while the Hadids and Kaia went back to the dark side for The Empire Strikes Back.”


(I had to) replace Luke with Kendall Jenner So that's the process of evolution. "
“… Millions of times, they have a list of models in those scenes, and they want the clothes they want... "
"Rood said that the editors went through some of my storybooks and selected some of their favorite iconic scenes from Star Wars movies. The background of these scenes is very familiar to everyone, and you've seen them..."
"The article continues. Kendall was inspired by new hopes for her photos, while Hadid and Kaya went back to the dark side to fight back



**Something goes wrong**
“The Hubbards posed shirtless as they gazed down at Hayley’s baby bump, while in another photo Tyler bent down to kiss his smiling wife’s stomach, which was exposed by a black turtleneck crop top.”
“I’ve seen it since the first time I met her.”And as they counted down the days until they would meet their baby girl, the pair posed for a series of gorgeous pregnancy photos.”
“The Florida Georgia Line singer, 30, and his wife Hayley welcomed their first child on Saturday, Dec. 23, his rep confirms to PEOPLE exclusively.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Daughter Olivia Rose Hubbard was born in Nashville at 4:56 p.m., weighing 7 lbs., 13 oz.”
“She measured 19¼ inches long.”
““We’re so overwhelmed with joy and already more in love than we could have ever imagined with this little angel that God has given us,” the proud new dad tells PEOPLE.”
“He adds Olivia is the best Christmas gift we could have ever asked for Image zoom Credit Nathan Chapman Image zoom Tyler Olivia Rose and Hayley Hubbard Credit Nathan Chapman The couple exclusively revealed their baby news to PEOPLE back in June and dished on some of the things they...”
“...were looking forward to with their new addition...”
““There’s a lot that we’re going to get to learn,” Tyler said.”


"Mr. and Mrs. Hubbard are naked, staring down at Haley's lump, while in another photo, Tyler bends down to kiss his smiling wife's stomach, which is revealed by a black turtleneck jacket."
"I've seen her since I first saw her." As they counted down the days when they would see the baby girl, they put out a series of beautiful pregnancy photos
"The 30-year-old Florida Georgia frontline singer and his wife Hayley have their first child on Saturday, December 23, and his agent confirmed exclusively to people."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Daughter Olivia rose Hubbard was born in Nashville at 4:56 p.m., weighing 7 pounds and 13 ounces."
"She's 19 / 4."
The proud new dad told people: "we are ecstatic, and we love this little angel more than we can imagine."
"He added that Olivia is the best Christmas present we can ask for, thanks to Nathan Chapman, Taylor Olivia Ross and Haley Hubbard. Nathan Chapman, the couple, revealed their treasure news exclusively in June and introduced something about them..."
“… We are looking forward to their new addition... "
"We're going to learn a lot," Taylor said



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Read original story Christina Milian to Replace the Late Naya Rivera in Starz’s ‘Step Up’ TV Series At TheWrap...”
“Terrence Green Rigo Eric Graise King and Kendra Oyesanya Poppy and previously announced Tricia Helfer Erin who joins the cast in a series regular role...”
“Rivera played the character in the former YouTube series’ first two seasons, and was set to continue on with the project when it was picked up at Starz for a third.”
“Following Rivera’s tragic death at the age of 33 last July in a drowning accident, an individual with knowledge said the team decided to recast the role with the support of the cast, producers and Rivera’s family.”
“Showrunners considered a wide variety of factors, including the highly serialized nature of the show and the fact that Collette is so central to the storytelling before making the decision.”
“Also Read: 'Step Up' Season 3 Production Schedule 'Had Not Yet Been Determined' Prior to Pandemic “Naya’s death was a terrible loss to our world that we will, frankly, never stop mourning,” “Step Up” series creator and executive producer Holly Sorensen said.”
““It was almost impossible to consider there could be someone so graceful and loving who could both help us honor our loss, while also bringing a deep reservoir of talent to our show, in so many areas.”
“Christina is an exceptional human and a dazzling performer and we are so happy she has joined our family.” Millian added, “I am so excited to join the ‘Step Up’ family.”
“I know I have massive shoes to fill.”
“Naya was incredible.”


"Read the original story of Christina Milian replacing the late najavela in the staz 'enhanced' TV series in the wrap..."
"Terence green, regor, Eric, grace king and Kendra oyesanya boby, as well as Tricia helver Irene, who announced that they would join the cast, will play a series of regular roles..."
"Rivera played that role in the first two seasons of the former YouTube series and is ready to continue the project when season three hits Starz."
"Last July, Rivera died in a drowning accident at the age of 33. With the support of the actors, producers and Rivera's family, the team decided to reshape the role," a person familiar with the matter said
"The host considered a variety of factors, including the highly serialized nature of the show and the fact that klaette talked about the story before making a decision."
"Also read: 'accelerating the' third season production schedule 'has yet to be determined' before the pandemic 'Naya's death is a terrible loss to our world, and frankly we will never stop mourning,'" said Holly Sorensen, creator and executive producer of the 'accelerating' series
"It's almost impossible to think of such an elegant and loving person who can help us remember the lost honor and bring so many talents to our performance."
"Christina is an outstanding person, a dazzling performer, and we are very happy that she has joined our family." Milian added, "I'm happy to join the 'upgrade' family."
"I know I have a lot of shoes to wear."
"Naya is incredible."



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s gonna be worth the wait.””
““I think it’s going to be a fantastic season,” Holland said at TCA.”
“(Previous seasons of the supernatural thriller respectively dropped in July 2016 and October 2017.)”
“And so they really want to take the time to get it right.”Netflix earlier this month teased the delayed third season via a cheeky promo/local-style commercial for Hawkins’ new Starcourt Mall, won’t arrive until “next summer” aka summer of 2019.”
“They want to deliver something bigger and better than what they did last year.”
“[Exec producers] The Duffer brothers and Shawn Levy have worked really hard, and they understand the stakes are high.”
“...summer press tour, “It’s a handcrafted show.”
“Explaining the reason for the delay, Netflix’s VP or original content, Cindy Holland, told reporters Sunday at the Television Critics Assoc.”
“It’s official: Stranger Things eight-episode third season will not bow until Summer 2019.”


"It's worth the wait."
"I think it's going to be a wonderful season," Holland said at the TCA
(the previous seasons of supernatural thriller went offline in July 2016 and October 2017 respectively.)
"So they really want to get things done." Earlier this month, Netflix, through a brazen Promo / starcourt mall local style ad, joked that the delayed third season would not come until "next summer" (also known as the summer of 2019)
"They want to offer bigger and better products than last year."
"The Duffy brothers and Shawn levy work very hard, and they understand the risks."
“… Summer press tour, "it's a handmade show
Cindy Holland, vice president of Netflix, explained the delay to reporters at television criticism Assoc on Sunday
"This is official news: the third season of the eighth episode of strange things won't be released until the summer of 2019."



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I still have a lot of work to do on myself, a lot to prove to myself, before I’m ready for something like that.”Murphy and Unglert began dating on the ABC series and the Bachelorette alum gave her a key to his place during the finale.”
“Love is earned.”
“The Bachelor Winter Games star broke her silence following her split from Dean Unglert in a lengthy Instagram post on Sunday, April 8.”
“It s a bit strange to feel the need to post about this but I don t think I can honestly resume my normal programming without giving you an explanation and maybe that s the wrong word but I just wanted to thank y all for the love and respect...”
“...you ve shown me over the past few days she wrote...”
““I spent 5 years away from Bachelor Nation as I lived abroad and traveled for work.”
“I came back to Winter Games because I’ve seen this franchise work miracles before.”
“Through The Bachelor and my journey around the world, I have made deep connections, true meaningful intimate relationships with many walks of life.”
“I know it’s imperative to find someone who chooses us and acknowledges our many layers, who can be open and vulnerable, and most importantly, who is ready.”
“To meet someone and be met.”


"Before I get ready, I have a lot of work to do, a lot of things to prove to myself." Murphy and anglett start dating on ABC, and the single alumni gives her a key to his place in the final episode
"Love is won."
On Sunday, April 8, the bachelor Winter Olympic star broke her silence after breaking up with Dean engelt in a long blog post on instagram
"It's a bit strange, I think it's necessary to publish this article, but I don't think I can honestly restore my normal programming without giving you an explanation. Maybe this is a wrong word, but I just want to thank you for your love and respect..."
“…… In the past few days, you showed me what she wrote.... "
"I left the bachelor country for five years because I worked and traveled abroad."
"I came back to the Winter Olympics because I've seen this team work miracles before."
"By being single and traveling around the world, I have built deep connections with all walks of life, truly meaningful intimacy."
"I know it's very necessary to find a person who chooses us and recognizes us. He can be open and vulnerable, and most importantly, he is ready."
"Meet someone and be met."



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Click to expand...”
“This is probably the last thing I needed to see right now, even though I know it’s true.”
“Ughhhh....I’ve never seen this before.”
“This dog has literally been my shadow for most of my adult life, and has followed me from living in the U.S. to the U.K. He’s definitely like a best friend in a way.”
“I don’t know what I’m gonna do when the day I need to put him down ever comes.”
“...it’s really worrying me.”
“He’s been staring at walls and walking around disoriented and not eating much, etc.”
“Last week he hurt his leg and they put him on meds, but his behavior has been very off.”
“My 10 year chihuahua (adopted him when he was 4, first dog/pet ever) has been having some problems lately, and I just keep thinking in the back of my mind how he’s getting older.”
“I’m extremely sensitive to this right now.”


Click expand
"It's probably the last thing I want to see right now, even though I know it's true."
"Well I've never seen this before. "
"This dog has been my shadow for most of my adult life, and he must be my best friend to some extent, following me from America to England."
"I don't know what to do when the day comes when I'm going to put him down."
“… I'm really worried. "
"He's been staring at the wall, walking around, losing his way, not eating much, and so on."
"He hurt his leg last week and the doctor gave him medicine, but his behavior has been very abnormal."
"My 10-year-old Chihuahua (the first dog / Pet he adopted when he was 4) has had some problems recently, and I've been thinking about how he got old."
"I'm very sensitive about it now."



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She also went a step further and deleted all of the previously shared photos.”
“The lip-kit maven kept her pregnancy news under wraps until the birth announcement post on social media three days after the baby’s arrival.”
“Kylie Jenner isn’t going to let the first year of 4-month-old daughter Stormi pass her by without planning for the best 1st birthday bash Calabasas has ever seen.”
“The 20-year-old Keeping Up With the Kardashians star revealed her plans for the celebration — or lack thereof — with followers in a series of Snapchat videos on Wednesday, June 27.”
““Stormi is gonna be 5 months this weekend, which really is tripping me,” she began the first Snap.”
“That means we re halfway to a year almost and I m already thinking about her first birthday and how it s going to be epic OK She continued to reveal that she had already decided on a theme but...”
“...sisters Kim and Kourtney Kardashian used it for their daughters joint birthday parties earlier in June...”
““I was going to do super magical unicorn theme, but North and Penelope beat me to it, so I have to think of something else.”Jenner welcomed her first child with boyfriend Travis Scott on February 1.”
““I understand you’re used to me bringing you along on all my journeys.”
“I’m not sharing photos of my girl right now,” Jenner responded.”


"She went a step further and deleted all the photos she had shared before."
"Until the birth announcement on social media three days after the baby was born, the mask Maven kept the news of her pregnancy secret."
"Kelly Jenner won't let her four month old daughter, Tommy, slip away from her at the age of one, instead of planning for the best one-year birthday party in Calabasas' history."
On Wednesday, June 27, the 20-year-old Kardashian star revealed in a series of snapchat videos that her celebration plans - or no plans - are fans' attention
"Tommy's going to be five months this weekend, which really puzzles me," she began her first snapshot
"It means we're nearly half a year old, I'm already thinking about her first birthday, and it's going to be an epic. Well, she goes on to reveal that she has decided on a theme, but..."
“…… Earlier in June, Kim and Courtney Kardashian sisters used it at their daughter's joint birthday party... "
On February 1, Jenna and her boyfriend Travis Scott welcomed her first child
"I know you're used to taking you with me every time I travel."
"I don't share my daughter's photos right now," Jenner replied



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED: Vin Diesel and the 'Fast & Furious' Franchise Honored With Generation Award at MTV Movie & TV Awards...”
“...road January 2018”
“The show will recreate some crowd favorite stunts from the eight film franchise so much so that you ll feel the heat from flaming nitrous charged exhausts and wonder how d they do that as scene after scene unfolds The Fast Furious Live global tour is set to hit the...”
“WATCH: Watch Vin Diesel Explode at Charlize Theron's Comments That He Kisses Like 'a Dead Fish'According to the Fast & Furious Live website, this show is sure to be unlike anything you’ve ever seen.”
“"It's amazing how many studios there are in New York City now."”
“"I'm in the middle of shooting it right now," he added.”
“But it'll be a way for you to kind of see the action firsthand."”
“I think it's first gonna be a show at the O2 Arena in London that's gonna go all over the world and we're really excited about it.”
“"So now, I am in New York, believe it or not, and we are filming something that is going to be pretty state-of-the-art, something no one's ever seen before, which is a live show.”
“"As you know, my work with Fast & Furious never ends, which I'm grateful for because of you all," the 50-year-old actor said.”


"Related reports: wendiser and the 'fast and angry' franchise won the MTV film and Television Awards for the generation Award..."
“… Road "January 2018"
"The show will recreate the eight favorite stunts of the movie series, so that you will feel the heat of burning nitrous oxide emissions and want to know how they do it, because scene after scene, the fast and angry global live tour will hit..."
"Observation: seeing that van diesel is popular in Charlize Theron's comments, he kisses like a" dead fish. ". According to the website of fast and passionate live, this program is definitely different from any program you've ever seen. "
"It's amazing that there are so many studios in New York now."
"I'm filming right now," he added
"But it will be a way for you to see action directly."
"I think it's going to be the first performance at the O2 Arena in London and it's going to spread all over the world and we're very excited about that."
"So now, I'm in New York, and believe it or not, we're making a pretty advanced film that no one has seen before. It's a live show."
The 50 year old actor said: "you know, my collaboration with" fast and angry "never ended, and I'm very grateful to you."



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When you try things that you want to try you will just have better experiences from that.”
“When you let go of that and you focus on what you can do to better yourself, you will end up having a better result.”
“"I think I am really lucky because I have a lot of cool opportunities and I'm able to kind of take advantage of everything that is around me," said Rippon, who has also become a spokesman for DayQuil and NyQuil Severe with VapoCOOL.”
“But that past is written.”
“He was also the first openly gay U.S. male skater to compete at an Olympics.”
“The 29-year-old proved to be a trailblazer, becoming the first openly gay U.S. man to medal at a Winter Games.”
“Booking the bronze medalist for Dancing with the Stars, scores of interviews and even a recent gig on Will & Grace.”
“Rippon's agent might be one of the busiest in the business.”
“It kinda brings me back to those moments when I first started skating and why I fell in love with skating in the first place."”
“It's my personal time now.”


"When you try what you want to try, you have a better experience."
"When you put that down and focus on what you can do to improve yourself, you'll get better results in the end."
"I think I'm really lucky because I have a lot of cool opportunities and I can take advantage of everything around me," said Rippon, who also became a spokesperson for daikir and nikkir cool
"But the past is written."
"He is also the first American male skater to participate in the Olympic Games openly."
The 29 year old proved to be a pioneer, becoming the first openly gay American man to win a medal at the Winter Olympics
"I got a lot of interviews for dancing with stars, and even won a bronze medal for a recent performance in will and grace."
"Rippon's agent is probably one of the busiest people in the business."
"It reminds me of the moments when I first started skating and why I fell in love with skating in the first place."
"It's my personal time now."



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Angels in Chains” drops worldwide on June 23.”
““When I first heard the sad news of his passing, I was nine months pregnant with my son Monty and I was full of emotions,” Horner explains.”
““Angels in Chains” is her new single and it’s a loving tribute to George Michael.”
“The former Spice Girl wrote the single in loving memory of her late friend and the profits from the single will go to Child Line, Michael’s charity of choice.”
““Angels in Chains” has a special release date too.”
“It drops on June 23, just two days before Michael’s 54th birthday.”
“The heartfelt ballad references several of Michael’s songs (and his fans won’t miss these references).”
“Although it was written with the music legend in mind, it will heal the heart of anyone grieving a significant loss.”
““I didn’t know quite what to do with my feelings so I put it in a song, which became ‘Angels in Chains.”
“This is our way of saying goodbye to our friend and music idol, and I hope George’s fans enjoy this as much as we have making it,” she says.”


"Angel of chains" will be broadcast around the world on June 23
"When I first heard the sad news of his death, I was pregnant with my son Monty for nine months, and I was full of emotion," Horner explained
Angel on the chain is her new single, a tribute to George Michael's love
The former Spice Girl wrote the single in memory of her late friend. The proceeds of the single will go to Michael's charity child line
Angel of chains also has a special release date
June 23, just two days before Michael's 54th birthday
"This heartfelt ballad quotes several of Michael's songs (which his fans won't miss)
"Although this book is written in the form of a musical legend, it will heal the hearts of all those who grieve over the great loss."
"I don't know how to deal with my feelings, so I put it in a song and became an angel on the chain."
"It's a way for us to say goodbye to our friends and music idols, and I hope George's fans will enjoy it as much as we do," she said



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News:”
“...on SNL Weekend Update Summer Edition E”
“Our legacy is the country that we risked our lives to create and that is why this great nation has given us an honor greater than any statue a three day weekend in February during which all Americans get 50 percent off on mattresses Tina Fey Makes a Surprise Appearance...”
““In the end, we don’t need statues to commemorate us,“ they declared.”
“Both shut down comparisons to Robert E. Lee, but acknowledged that they’d owned slaves and it was wrong.”
“A six-foot-four black man.“ Fallon and Meyers appeared as George Washington and Thomas Jefferson, respectively.”
““Part of me hopes these neo-Nazis do try it and get the ham salad kicked out of them by a bunch of drag queens, because you know what a drag queen still is?”
““There’s nine more alt-right rallies planned around the country this Saturday, including one in New York City in Washington Square Park,“ she noted.”
“Fey, who graduated from the University of Virginia, spoke out against the deadly white supremacist rally that took place in Charlottesville, Virginia, last weekend.”
“Former Saturday Night Live stars Tina Fey, Jimmy Fallon and Seth Meyers all made a return to the news desk on Thursday’s episode of the show’’s Weekend Update: Summer Edition.”


News:
“… About SNL weekend update Summer Edition "e"
"Our legacy is the nation we risked our lives to build, and that's why this great nation has given us more honor than any statue - on a three-day weekend in February, all Americans can enjoy a 50% discount on mattresses, and Tina Fei unexpectedly appeared..."
"In the end, we don't need statues to commemorate us," they declared
"Both refused to compare with Robert E. Lee, but it was wrong to admit that they had slaves."
"A six foot four inch black man." Fallon and Meyers play George Washington and Thomas Jefferson, respectively
"Part of me wants these Neo Nazis to really try and kick the ham salad out of them, because do you know what a drag queen is?"
"There are also nine far right rallies planned across the United States this Saturday, one of which is in New York City, in Washington Square Park," she said
Fay, who graduated from the University of Virginia, publicly opposed the deadly white supremacist rally in Charlottesville, Virginia, last weekend
Former Saturday night live stars Tina Fey, Jimmy Fallon and Seth Meyers all returned to the news on Thursday's weekend update: Summer Edition



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“The famed human rights lawyer welcomed her first children, Ella and Alexander, two days ago, and according to her father-in-law Nick Clooney, she's doing a fantastic job.”
“"George will be an absolutely wonderful father.”
“Amal will be—and already is—a magnificent mother!"”
“...he told Good Morning Britain, according to E!”
“News.”
“"I'm constantly amazed by her.”
“She is an incredible woman."”
“Getty ImagesThe new grandfather also threw in a joke about his son.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"The famous human rights lawyer welcomed her first children, Ella and Alexander, two days ago. According to her father-in-law, Nick Clooney, she did very well."
"George will be a great father."
"Amar will and has been a great mother!"
“… He told good morning England, according to e! "
"News."
"I'm always surprised for her."
"She's a great woman."
"Getty Images, the new grandfather also told a joke about his son."



**Something goes wrong**
“This vampire drip cocktail from Half-Baked Harvest is one perfect option.”
“Plan a get-together with a few friends, make a fire, then tell ghost stories in the dark.”
“There are tons of options out there, from skeleton shirts to scary movie tees to sassy sayings, like this one from ASOS.”
“...involved or just for fun because most things are really cute...”
“2 Wear Halloween Inspired Clothing ASOS ASOS Design Curve Halloween Resting Witch Face Shirt 19 ASOS Even if you don t like wearing a costume you can still wear Halloween themed clothing so that you feel like you re still...”
“Either way, they'll be delicious, fun to make, and spooky in the best way.”
“There are elaborate options, like these monster mash cookies from Half-Baked Harvest, or more simple things (like slice and bake cookie dough from the grocery store!).”
“1 Make Creepy Treats Half-Baked Harvest One fun way to show everyone how much you love Halloween without wearing a costume is to make some fun and spooky Halloween-themed treats.”
“...the below activities to have fun this October 31, and all of the days leading up to it.”
“So, if you're not a fan of Halloween costumes, try doing some of (or all of!)”


"This half baked harvest vampire drop cocktail is a perfect choice."
"Plan a party with a few friends, make a fire, and then tell ghost stories in the dark."
"There are a lot of choices, from skull shirts to horror movie T-shirts to fashionable aphorisms, like Aso's words."
“… Participate or just for fun, because most things are cute... "
"2 wear inspiration costume ASOs ASOs design curve rest witch face shirt 19 ASOs even if you don't like to wear costume, you can still wear the theme costume of Halloween to make you feel that you still..."
"Either way, they're delicious, they're fun to make, and they're creepy in the best way."
"There's a lot of sophisticated options, like these half baked harvest monster mud biscuits, or something simpler (like cutting biscuits from the grocery store and baking dry dough!)."
"I make some creepy food, half cooked harvest, an interesting way to show you how much you love Halloween without clothes, that is to make some interesting and terrible food with the theme of Halloween."
“… The following activities will make you have a good time on and before October 31 this year. "
"So if you don't like Halloween costumes, try making some (or all!)"



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We’re on the same team,” she said to Aubree.”
“She decorated the house in pink things, but she and her daughter had to be super sneaky at the party store so news wouldn’t get out that she was pregnant.”
“He said there are a lot of things he would have done differently if he went back to the start of his relationship with Briana.”
“He then went on Kailyn’s podcast to talk about his split Briana and his relationship with his ex.”
““You’re always right,” he told her and apparently apologized.”
“She was the first person he told when he planned on breaking up with her.”
“Kailyn and Javi Stir the PotTo make matters worse, Javi decided it would be a good idea to involve Kailyn in everything about his breakup.”
“We smell trouble!”
““Javi’s going to be butthurt when he sees who’s taking care of us,” she said to her friend, but didn’t seem to care too much.”
“Dre to help them...”


"We're on the same team," she told Aubrey
"She decorated the house in pink, but she and her daughter had to be very sneaky in the party shop so that there was no news of her pregnancy."
"He said he would do a lot of different things if he went back to the beginning of his relationship with Briana."
"Then he talked on kailyn's podcast about Briana, who he broke up with, and his relationship with his predecessor."
"You're always right," he told her, apparently apologizing
"She was the first to tell her when he was going to break up with her."
"Kailyn and Javi mixed up with Porto to make things worse, and Javi decided that it was a good idea to let kailyn participate in all the things he broke up with."
"We smell trouble!"
"Javier will be very sad when he sees who is taking care of us," she told her friends, but didn't seem to care much
"Help them..."



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s a part of my whole…life, about giving back and I think it’s really important that I continue to do this while I’m on tour.””
““I want to do this because one, it was such an incredible experience the last time we did this on tour” said Lovato.”
“Lovato, who has been open about her own mental health battles is co-owner of the Los Angles based wellness center.”
“The singer stopped by Good Morning America to make the announcement, the concerts will include inspirational speeches and group therapy and wellness workshops by CAST Centers to promote dialogue about mental health.”
“Demi Lovato confirmed that her upcoming Tell Me You Love Me Tour will be giving fans access to free therapy at all of her shows.”


"This is my whole Part of life, about giving back, I think it's really important to continue to do that during the tour. "
"I wanted to do it because the last time we did it on tour, it was an incredible experience," Lovato said
Lovato, a co owner of the Los Angeles health center, has always been open to her mental health struggle
"The singer made a statement in Good Morning America that the concert will include inspirational speeches, group therapy and a health seminar at the actor center to promote dialogue on mental health."
"Demi Lovato confirmed that her upcoming" tell me you love me "tour will provide fans with the opportunity to receive free treatment in all her shows."



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Several men and women have spoken out about their experiences with sexual harassment and sexual assault in Hollywood since the New York Times and the New Yorker published articles detailing a pattern of alleged abuse by famed producer Harvey Weinstein.”
“Learn more about Time’s Up, an organization of women in entertainment combating sexual harassment and inequality, on its website.”
“...of sexual harassment and assault she allegedly sustained at the hands of a director...”
“Souza, 32, told CNN en Español Tuesday that she was raped by a director early in her career.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Speaking to Carmen Aristegui, Souza, who now stars as Laurel Castillo in ABC’s How to Get Away with Murder, said she was assaulted by the director while filming on location in her native Mexico.”
“She declined to name the director.”
“The actress said she had been separated from fellow castmates as she was staying at a separate hotel where only she and the director had rooms.”
“She claims he then started to drop by at odd hours.”
““He knocked at my door saying he wanted to go over some scenes and I thought it’s 2 a.m., it’s not appropriate and it’s something that shouldn’t be happening,” she said.”


"Since the New York Times and the new Yorker published articles detailing the pattern of alleged abuse by the famous producer Harvey Weinstein, several men and women have made public their experiences of sexual harassment and abuse in Hollywood."
"Please learn more about time's up, an organization of women in the entertainment industry, on its website to combat sexual harassment and inequality."
“…… She was accused of sexual harassment and assault at the hands of a director... "
Suza, 32, told CNN's Spanish channel on Tuesday that she was raped by a director early in her career
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Suza, who now plays laurel Castillo in ABC's how to escape murder, said in an interview with Carmen aristegui that she was attacked by the director while filming on location in her hometown of Mexico
"She declined to give the director's name."
"The actress said she was separated from the other actors because she stayed in a separate hotel and only had rooms for her and the director."
"She said he started visiting at singularity later."
"He knocked on my door and said he wanted to see some scenes. I don't think it's 2 a.m. right now. It shouldn't have happened," she said



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See more in the video below.”
“Kourtney is currently in Cannes, France, living it up with sister Kendall Jenner, and her rumored boyfriend, Younes Bendjima.”
“The 32-year-old reality star pulls a prank on sister Kourtney Kardashian in a new promo for Sunday's Keeping Up With the Kardashians.”
“RELATED: Khloe Kardashian Blows Kisses With North West and Penelope Disick in Cute Video"What I've been finding that's been escalating and escalating and escalating is how f**king annoying Kourtney is with just doing anything," Khloe tells her mom, Kris Jenner, in the clip.”
“"I've watched her spend three days picking a paint color as if it's her full-time job," Kris says, prompting Khloe to take action.”
“"I know she's meeting us here, so I'm going to pretend that you and I are driving and we're not here yet," Khloe reveals.”
“"I'm just going to be like, 'Wait, hold on, we changed our mind we're going somewhere else.'"”
“"Oh, this is giving me life!"”
“Kris laughs.”
“"This is amazing!"”


"Please see more in the video below."
"Courtney is currently living in Cannes, France, with her sister Kendall Jenner and her rumored boyfriend eunes bengima."
"The 32 year old reality star played a prank on sister Courtney Kardashian in a new promo for" keep up with Kardashian "on Sunday
"Related story: Kardashian blows kisses with northwest and Penelope Disick in a lovely video." what I find escalating is how annoying Courtney is to do anything, "Kardashian tells her mother, Chris Jenner, in the video
"I've watched her spend three days choosing paint colors as if it was her full-time job," Chris said, prompting Khloe to take action
"I know she's going to meet us here, so I'm going to pretend that you and I are driving, and we're not here yet," Crowe revealed
"I'd say, 'wait, wait, we've changed our mind, we're going somewhere else.'"
"Oh, it gives me life!"
"Chris laughed."
"Great!"



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Jennifer Aniston Pampers Herself at Salon -- and Appears to be a Little Bit BlonderJennifer Aniston Goes Casual Chic at First Carpet Appearance Since Justin Theroux SplitJustin Theroux Makes First Red Carpet Appearance Since Jennifer Aniston Split at Met GalaRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Here's more on how Aniston and Theroux are spending their time following their shocking split:Jennifer Aniston Spotted in NYC for First Time Since Justin Theroux Split This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”
“Last month, the two both showed up to the first birthday celebration of Kimmel and McNearney's son, Billy, but an eyewitness told ET that it is not known if the exes crossed paths.”
“As for Theroux, 46, he's been spotted out and about in New York City.”
“The actress has attended several soirees for her famous friends, including Gwyneth Paltrow's engagement party and a birthday bash for Jimmy Kimmel's wife, Molly McNearney.”
“BackgridBackgridBackgridAniston and Theroux have been anything but homebodies since their breakup.”
“Per usual, the A-list star's hairstyle was on point.”
“Both the 60-year-old daytime talk show host and the 53-year-old Friends actress sported all-black outfits, and Aniston also appeared to be wearing a dark-colored blouse.”
“The gals all showed up to the restaurant in separate vehicles, and while Aniston kept a low profile while entering and exiting the eatery, Cox and DeGeneres smiled for photographers.”


"Embedded code restart" content: Jennifer Aniston pampers herself in the salon - she looks a bit blonde. When she first appears on the carpet, she becomes casual and unrestrained, because Justin serrux appears on the red carpet for the first time after breaking up with Jennifer Aniston at the Metropolitan Museum of Art.... "
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Here's more about how Aniston and Cyrus spent their time in their shocking Breakup: Jennifer Aniston found this video unavailable in New York for the first time since Justin Theroux split up because we couldn't load the sponsor's message."
"Last month, both attended the first birthday celebration of Kimmel's and McNeil's son Billy, but an eyewitness told et they didn't know if their ex girlfriend ever met."
"As for seru, 46, he's been found all over New York City."
The actress attended several parties for her famous friends, including Gwyneth Paltrow's engagement party and Jimmy Kimmel's wife Molly McNeil's birthday party
"Since the breakup, Beck Aniston and Cyrus have never been family members again."
"By convention, the first-line star's hairstyle is to the point."
"Both the 60 year old daytime talk show host and the 53 year old friends actress are dressed in all black, and Aniston seems to be wearing a dark top as well."
"The girls came to the restaurant in their cars. Although Aniston kept a low profile when she came in and out of the restaurant, Cox and DeGeneres were smiling at the photographer."



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"I was sitting in the church with mixed emotions."”
“The only photos to capture the royal and the Everything I Do I Do It For You singer together were taken at the Expo 86 Theatre in Vancouver in May 1986 during Princess Diana s tour of Canada with Prince...”
“Enter Andy Cohen, who had the 58-year-old rocker on Watch What Happens Live on Tuesday (June 26), broaching the subject head on.”
“"There are many rumours that you and Princess Diana were once romantically involved," the host asked.”
“"Her butler said that he used to sneak you into Kensington Palace.”
“How would you characterize your relationship with Princess Diana?"”
“The "Summer of '69" singer was quick to clear the air.”
“First of all, "she didn't sneak me in, I would just roll up."”
“But more seriously, he insisted that the pair was just "great friends."”
“When Andy pushed further with the prospect of them being "friends with benefits", Bryan said: "She was just... we were good friends."”


"I was sitting in a church with mixed feelings."
In May 1986, when Princess Diana and the crown prince toured Canada, they took the only photo that could capture the royal family and "everything I do for you" at the theatre of Expo 86 in Vancouver
Andy Cohen showed the 58 year old rock singer live on Tuesday
"There are a lot of rumors that you and Princess Diana had a romantic relationship," the host asked
"Her housekeeper says that he often sneaks you into Kensington Palace."
"How do you describe your relationship with Princess Diana?"
The singer of summer '69 soon cleared up the matter
"First of all," she didn't sneak me in, I just rolled it up. “
But more seriously, he insisted that the two were just "great friends"
When Andy goes on to say that they are "good friends," Brian says, "she just... We are good friends



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“NBC’s “Taken” and ABC’s “Quantico” and “Once Upon a Time” have also parted ways with veteran cast members in the lead up to the coming season.”
“The “Hawaii Five-0” changes represent the latest in a series of cast overhauls at returning broadcast dramas.”
“Mahalo and a hui hou…”Kim and Park have both been cast members on “Hawaii Five-O” alongside O’Loughlin and Caan since CBS premiered a rebooted version of the classic television cop show in 2010.”
“They’ve helped us build an exciting new Hawaii Five-0, and we wish them all the best and much success in their next chapters.”
“...of our 168 episodes...”
“They will always be ohana to us we will miss them and we wish them both all the best A CBS spokesperson said in a statement We are so appreciative of Daniel and Grace s enormous talents professional excellence and the aloha spirit they brought to each and every one...”
“She was the consummate collaborator, helping build her character from day 1.”
“Grace’s presence gave ‘Hawaii Five-0’ a beauty and serenity to each episode.”
““Needless to say, Daniel has been an instrumental part of the success of ‘Hawaii Five-0’ over the past 7 seasons and it has personally been a privilege to know him.”
““I will never forget meeting Daniel while still writing the pilot and being certain there was no other actor who I’d want to play Chin Ho Kelly,” said executive producer Peter Lenkov.”


"NBC's" take "and ABC's" Quantico "and" once upon a time "are also going their separate ways with senior actors in the preparations for the next season."
The change of "Hawaii 5-0" represents the latest progress in a series of reforms of the returning radio and TV actors. "
"Mahalo and ahuihou..." Since CBS premiered the relaunched classic TV police show in 2010, Kim and park Geun hye have been actors in "Hawaii Five O," working side by side with olaflin and Kahn
"They helped us build an exciting new Hawaii 5-0, and we wish them all the best and greater success in the future."
“… In our 168 episode
"They will always be ohana to us, we will miss them, and we wish them all the best," a CBS spokesman said in a statement. We are very grateful to Daniel and grace for their great talent, professional excellence, and the aloha spirit they bring to everyone... "
"She was the perfect collaborator and helped shape her character from day one."
"The appearance of grace makes every episode of Hawaii 5-0 full of beauty and serenity."
"Needless to say, in the past seven seasons, Daniel has been an important part of the success of Hawaii 5-0. It's my personal honor to know him."
Executive producer Peter lenkov said: "I'll never forget meeting Daniel when I was writing pilot, and I'm sure no other actor will let me play chin ho Kelly."



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just before Team USA marched out into the PyeongChang Olympic Stadium, Rippon was shown planting a kiss on Nagasu’s cheek in a Snapchat video.”
“The two have become fan-favorites at the Games, with Nagasu drawing kudos from figure skating icons, and Rippon striking internet fame.”
“Doing it all with one of your best friends!”
“From Rooftop Burgers to Olympic Roommates: All About Adam Rippon and Mirai Nagasu's Sweet FriendshipWhat’s better than winning a medal at an Olympic Games?”
“Doing it with one of your best friends!”
“Figure skaters Adam Rippon and Mirai Nagasu led the U.S. team to bronze at the 2018 Winter Olympics, and the win is extra special for the longtime skating buds.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We’re roommates here, staying at the Olympic Village,” Rippon, 28, told NBC Olympics.”
““We gave each other a hug and I said, ‘You know, Mirai, we’re here!”
“We did it!’ ”Nagasu, 24, made history on Monday when she became the very first American female to land a triple axel at the Olympics.”


"Just before the U.S. team entered the Pingchang Olympic Stadium, in a snapchat video, Rippon kisses NAGase on the cheek."
"These two players have become fans' favorites at the Olympic Games, NAGase has won the honor from figure skating idol, and Ripon is famous on the Internet."
"Do it all with your best friend!"
"From rooftop hamburger to Olympic roommate: what's better about Adam rippen and Miley NAGase's sweet friendship than winning medals at the Olympics?"
"Do it with your best friend!"
"In the 2018 Winter Olympics, figure skaters Adam Rippon and Miley NAGase led the U.S. team to the bronze medal, which is a special victory for long-term skaters."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"We are roommates here and live in the Olympic Village," Rippon, 28, told NBC
"We hugged and I said," you know what, Miley, we're here! "
"We did it! On Monday, 24-year-old Changshu made history, becoming the first American woman to make a three-axis appearance at the Olympics



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Being an alpha is sometimes a pain in the (butt).””
““Vin and I had a few discussions, including an important face-to-face in my trailer,” Johnson told Rolling Stone.”
“(Photo by Rich Fury/Getty Images)Rogen to Ryan: 'I hate what you're doing to the country'McCartney shares inspiration for 'Let It Be'Kit Harington and Rose Leslie at Rayne Church, Kirkton of Rayne in Aberdeenshire, after their wedding.”
“NEW YORK, NY - DECEMBER 08: Ed Sheeran performs at the Z100's Jingle Ball 2017 on December 8, 2017 in New York City.”
“(Photo by Mike Coppola/Getty Images)title: Kel Mitchell  on Instagram: "Uh oh!”
“The boys are in the building!”
“Fun time shooting Double Dare today with the bro!”
“...make sure you watch the premiere tonight on duration 00 00 00 site Instagram author null published Wed Dec 31 1969 19 00 00 GMT 0500 Eastern Standard Time intervention no description null US actress Scarlett Johansson poses on the red carpet for the European premiere of the film Avengers...”
“Age of Ultron in London on April 21 2015”
“AFP PHOTO / JUSTIN TALLIS (Photo credit should read JUSTIN TALLIS/AFP/Getty Images)HOLLYWOOD, CA - JUNE 07: Honoree George Clooney attends the American Film Institute's 46th Life Achievement Award Gala Tribute to George Clooney at Dolby Theatre on June 7, 2018 in Hollywood, California.”


"Being an alpha is sometimes a painful thing."
"Wen and I had several discussions, including an important face-to-face conversation in the trailer," Johnson told rolling stone
(Photo by rich fury / Getty Images) Logan said to Ryan, "I hate what you do to the country." McCartney shared his inspiration for "let it be" after the wedding of kit Harington and rose Leslie at Rayne Church in lane, Aberdeen
"New York, New York - December 8, 2017: in New York City, ed Sheeran performed at Z100's tinkle ball 2017 on December 8, 2017."
(Photo by Mike Coppola / Getty) Title: Kyle Mitchell said on instagram: "Oh!"
"The children are in the building!"
"I had a good time with my brother today!"
“… Make sure you watch the premiere tonight, 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00 00
"The age of ULTRON in London on April 21, 2015"
"AFP Photo / Justin Tallis (photo source should be Justin Tallis / AFP / Getty Images) Hollywood, California June 7: June 7, 2018, Hollywood, California, winner George Clooney pays tribute to George Clooney at the 46th annual life achievement awards of the American Film Academy."



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That short-lived relationship followed Taylor's split from Scottish DJ Calvin Harris in June 2016 after 15 months together.”
“The stunning singer went make-up free for her swim in the ocean, tying back her blonde hair in a ponytail.”
“Strapping on some snorkels, goggles and flippers, they messed around in the water, making sure not to leave one another's side.”
“The duo could be seen cosying up in the water, the Blank Space hitmaker hugging the handsome actor from behind and planting sweet kisses on his shoulder.”
“...swimming side by side as Taylor enjoyed a break from her highly successful Reputation tour...”
“The Look What You Made Me Do hitmaker showed off a very toned figure with a tiny waistline and toned legs as she flashed a pair of designer sunglasses that framed her face perfectly They frolicked around in the sea for a while taking turns floating on their backs and...”
“The design is named The Jane.”
“Cute look: Swift had on a cute blue-and-white striped bikini by company Sold & Striped that had ties on the briefs.”
“Joe showcased his own toned torso in a pair of navy white striped swim shorts, with both carrying a snorkel and flippers.”
“Island life: The power couple has been at the beach destination for several days already and they seem to have deep tans as a resultThe pair spent Independence Day with one another, dipping in and out of the crystal clear waters.”


"This short-lived relationship came after Taylor and Scottish DJ Calvin Harris broke up in June 2016, 15 months after they were together."
The charming singer has free make-up and a ponytail of blonde hair while swimming in the sea
"They strap on some diving tubes, goggles and fins and mess around in the water to make sure they don't leave each other."
"We can see the two people making out in the water. The hitter in the blank area hugs the handsome actor from behind and puts a sweet kiss on his shoulder."
“… Taylor enjoyed a break on her very successful reputation tour, swimming side by side... "
"What you asked me to do, hitmaker showed a very strong figure, with a small waist and strong legs. She showed a pair of designer sunglasses to set off her face perfectly. They played in the sea for a while, floating on their backs in turn, and then..."
"The name of the design is Jane."
"Lovely look: Swift is wearing a lovely blue and white striped bikini with a tie on his underwear."
"Joe showed off his body in a navy blue and white striped trunks, both with snorkel and fins."
Life on the island: the couple have been at the beach destination for several days, and they seem to be tan. So the couple spent independence day together, swimming in the crystal clear water



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He’s always helping out and is very hands on.”Photo credit: Instagram/ Kendra Wilkinson-Baskett...”
“My show was a comedy and light hearted [until] sad times happened then we had to change my show from comedy to drama.”
“The couple, who star on the reality show Kendra On Top, posed for photos with their two children, son Hank, 8, and daughter Alijah, 4, before a Monster Jam event, reports E!”
“News.”
“The couple were all smiles in pictures.”
“Kendra also posted a video of herself laughing while taking a ride in one of the monster trucks.”
“Last week, Kendra confirmed she and Hank, a former NFL player, are having marital woes by responding to a tabloid report about them faking their problems to keep their WE tv show going.”
“"1.”
“How do u fake marital problems?”
“Makes absolutely no sense," Wilkinson wrote.”


"He's always helpful, and he's very hands-on." Photo source: instagram / Kendra Wilkinson basketball
"My show was comedy, and the light and happy (until) sad time happened, and then we had to change my show from comedy to drama."
"The couple, who starred at the top of the reality show Kendra, posed with their two children, son hank, 8, and daughter aria, 4, before a Monster Jam event, reported:" E! "
"News."
"The couple in the picture laughed."
"Kendra also released a video showing herself laughing in a monster truck."
"Last week, Kendra confirmed her marital problems with hank, a former NFL player, in response to a tabloid report that they pretended to have problems to maintain their we TV show
“"1.”
"How do you pretend to have marital problems?"
"Meaningless," Wilkinson wrote



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We Call It Family.””
“After all these years, I still have her best interests at heart,” Abraham continued.”
“Saying horrible things about your own child after I m the only one who has ever strived to overlook her demons she fights daily against this brings sadness to our family and I wish her all the best for the sake of my health safety I wish her all the...”
““I always wish my mother the best as I attended her wedding supporting her.”
“RELATED VIDEO Farrah Abraham Brands Teen Mom OG Costars Trash Moms in Twitter Rant Abraham said her therapists have come to the conclusion my mother is jealous of her...”
“I started therepy sic in my past at the age of 14 due to my mother and I not getting along as our family therapist sided with me about my safety and my life choices that my mother has never been supportive or caring to help guide her own children...”
““Clinically & honestly, none of my TV show therapists & personal therapist have all said I’m balanced.”
“Image zoom Farrah Abraham and her mother Debra DanielsenThe star admits she does have her struggles but denied suffering from what her mother suggested.”
“...she was sad to hear my own mother would say these untrue things about her own child It s evil and alarming...”
“Image zoom Debra Danielsen (second from left) at her wedding with friends and daughter and Farrah Abraham (far right).”


"We call it family."
"After all these years, I still have her best interests in mind," Abraham continued
"After I was the only one who tried to ignore the demons of her children, I said some terrible words about her children. She fought against these demons every day, which brought sorrow to our family. For my health and safety, I wish her all the best, I wish her all the best..."
"When I go to my mother's wedding and support her, I always wish her all the best."
"Related video Farrah Abraham brands teenage mom og starring garbage mom yells on twitter that Abraham says her therapist has come to the conclusion that my mom is jealous of her..."
"I started the therapy SiC when I was 14 years old, because my mother and I didn't get along well, because our family therapist was on my side, talking about my safety and my life choices, and my mother never supported or cared about her, helping to guide her own children..."
"Clinically, to be honest, neither my TV program therapist nor my personal therapist said I was balanced."
"The image of Abraham and her mother Debra danielsant" the star admits that she did struggle, but denies the pain her mother implied
“… She was sad to hear that my mother would say these untrue things to her own children, which is evil and worrying... "
"Zoom in and out Deborah Danielson (second from left) is at the wedding with friends and daughter and Farah Abraham (first from right)



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The film also stars Dangal fame Zaira Wasim and Farhan Akhtar in pivotal roles.”
“...which is a Shonali Bose directorial...”
“(Photo credit: priyankanetwork/Instagram) Priyanka Chopra and Nick Jonas spending quality time together.”
“(Photo credit: priyankanetwork/Instagram)Priyanka Chopra and Nick Jonas are giving some serious couple goals to their fans.”
“After the two were spotted post the American singer’s performance at a concert, Nick and Priyanka were seen together on a dinner date.”
“The two were twinning and of course, Priyanka was nailing the style game.”
“A day ago, Priyanka shared a photo of herself with Nick tagging him as “Bae.” The photo went viral over social media.”
“The couple, who got engaged in August this year in Mumbai, are rumoured to be tying the knot by end of the year.”
“However, as per Elle.com, a source informed that Priyanka and Nick might not get married this year.”
“Priyanka Chopra was all smiles for the shutterbugs.”


"The film also starred in key roles of Dangal's famous zaira Wasim and Farhan ahtar."
“… This is a shawnery Bose Director... "
"(photo source: Priyanka network / instagram) Priyanka Chopra and Nick Jonas have a great time together."
"(photo source: Priyanka network / instagram) Priyanka Chopra and Nick Jonas are delivering some serious couple goals to their fans."
Nick and Priyanka had dinner together after the American singer's performance at the concert was discovered
"The two are paired and, of course, Priyanka is a nail style game."
"A day ago, Priyanka shared a picture of himself with Nick, who labeled him" BAE. ". This picture is going crazy on social media. "
"The couple got engaged in Mumbai in August, and it is said that they will get married at the end of the year."
"However, according to Elle.com According to the website, Priyanka and Nick may not get married this year
"Priyanka Chopra is happy with the insects in the blinds."



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out more from the RHOC trip to Iceland, below.”
“So every three months, I go into for a while until they know that it's not coming back."”
“But what fans may not realize is that The Real Housewives of Orange County fitness guru learned about the skin cancer diagnosis after an interesting incident that took place during that unforgettable group trip to Iceland during Season 12.”
“"I go to the dermatologist a lot and I had had this mark on the side of my butt for a long time.”
“And I didn't think anything of it.”
“I didn't even think to show it to her 'cause it was just a little freckle," she recently told The Daily Dish.”
“"And we were in Iceland last year filming and I was getting a massage.”
“And the girl that was giving a massage said, 'You know, you might need to have that checked.'”
“And I'm like, 'Really, yeah, OK.' I even went home and a couple months went by and I was in the dermatologist for something [else]."”
“While there, Tamra had the dermatologist give it a look when she "was literally out the door" and that's when the doctor made the call to biopsy the mark.”


"Please find out more about RhoC's visit to Iceland below."
"So every three months, I go in for a while until they know they won't come back."
"But what fans may not realize is that during the unforgettable group trip to Iceland in season 12, an interesting thing happened. The Real Housewives of Orange County fitness masters were informed of the diagnosis of skin cancer."
"I often go to see a dermatologist, and I have this mark on the side of my buttock for a long time."
"I didn't think of it at all."
"I didn't even want to show her because it was just a little freckle," she recently told daily menu
"Last year we were filming in Iceland and I was massaging."
"The massage girl said," you know, you might need to check. "
"I said," really, yes, OK. " I even went home. A few months later, I found another job in dermatology
"When she was there, Tamra had a look at her dermatologist, and she was" almost out of the door "when the doctor called her and asked her to have a biopsy of the wound."



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“!”
“Tentunya sih tidak bisa, karena kemenangan yang didapatkan dengan cara tersebut adalah salah satu hal keberuntungan yang sekarang sudah mendarah daging untuk permainan togel.”
“Namun sebelumnya anda memulai permainan togel online, kami ingin menyarankan anda untuk mencari bandar togel terpercaya terlebih dahulu.”
“Pastinya sudah bisa untuk sekarang ini, karena dijaman yang sudah canggih dan modern seperti ini semuanya sudah bisa diakses hanya menggunakan smartphone dan internet.”
“Apakah Togel Sudah Bisa Dimainkan Secara Online ?”
“Nah untuk cara menggunakan rumus perhitungan togel bisa anda lakukan secara langsung, dengan melihat gambar dibawah ini :Nah dengan gambar yang kami berikan diatas, semoga bermanfaat bagi para pemain togel agar tidak terlalu percaya dengan hal yang sering membuat anda menjadi kalah.”
“Tapi untuk mendapatkan hasil kemenangan togel yang sngat besar anda bisa mengubah rumus perhitungan yang pasti dan terbukti.”
“Kalau memang bisa sudah banyak orang yang bertanya terus dengan makhluk gaib atau dari mimpi tanpa perlu bekerja sama sekali.”
“Contohnya saja bila, anda mengikuti 3 cara diatas kemungkinan kemenangan sangat minim dan mustahil untuk dilakukan.”
“Namun kalau dipikir-pikir kembali, apakah permainan togel bisa dimenangkan dengan cara seperti itu ?”


“!”
“Tentunya sih tidak bisa，karena kemenangan yang didapatakan dengan cara tersebut adalah salah satu hal keberuntungan yang sekarang sudah mendarah daging untuk permainan togel。”
“Namun sebelumnya anda memulai permainan togel online，kami ingin menyarankan anda untuk mencari bandar togel terpercaya terlebih dahulu。”
“Pastinya sudah bisa untuk sekarang ini，karena dijaman yang sudah canggih dan modern seperti ini semuanya sudah bisa diakses hanya menggunakan dan internet。”
"Apakah togel Sudah bisa dimainkan secara online?"
"No one is allowed to use this method: no one is allowed to use this method, and no one is allowed to use this method."
"We can solve this problem in a way."
“Kalau memang bisa sudah banyak orang yang bertanya terus dengan makhluk gaib atau dari mimpi tanpa perlu bekerja sama sekali。”
“Contohnya saja bila，anda mengikuti 3 cara diatas kemungkinan kemenangan sangat minim dan mustahil untuk dilakukan。”
“Namun kalau dipikir pikir kembali，apakah permainan togel bisa dimenangkan dengan cara seperti itu？”



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Chapter IX 29m A family emergency draws Sam home, where she wrestles with feelings of guilt and stumbles across a piece of Winchester history.”
“9.”
“1.”
“Chapter I 32m In the wake of the town hall protest, Sam finds herself at the center of an alt-right backlash and goes to war with a social media troll.”
“2.”
“Chapter II 30m Still haunted by flashbacks to the house party, Reggie bounces from therapy to Bible study to drinking as he seeks an outlet for his pent-up emotions.”
“3.”
“Chapter III 29m While party-hopping on Pride Night, Lionel struggles to make small talk with strangers and decipher mixed signals from Silvio.”
“4.”
“Chapter IV 30m With her political capital on the rise, Coco sets her sights on a new role.”


"Chapter 9 29m a family emergency takes Sam home, where she struggles with guilt and stumbles upon a piece of Winchester history."
“9.”
“1.”
"Chapter 1 32 meters after the city hall protest, Sam finds himself at the center of the far right rebound and fights a social media troll."
“2.”
"Chapter two 30 meters still lingers in the memories of family gatherings. Reggie is looking for a way out for his repressed emotions from psychotherapy to Bible study to drinking."
“3.”
"Chapter 3 29m night of pride, Lionel jumps around the party, trying to chat with strangers and decipher the mixed signals from Silvio."
“4.”
"Chapter 4 30 million with the rise of political capital, cocoa has set its sights on a new role."



Number  120
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In a December 2013 interview with the Associated Press, Bode also said that he and his brother were very close.”
“Please be gentle w christin cooper, it was crazy emotional and not all her fault,” he tweeted.”
“However, it’s not the first time Bode experienced an unexpected loss.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In April 2013, his brother Chelone “Chilly” Miller died of an apparent seizure, stemming from a 2005 motorcycle accident that placed him in coma for 11 days.”
“He was 29.”
“His death came five years before the death of the Olympic skier’s beloved daughter.”
““We are beyond devastated.”
“Our baby girl, Emmy, passed away yesterday.”
“Never in a million years did we think we would experience a pain like this,” the 40-year-old Olympic alpine skier said on Instagram Monday.”


"In an interview with the associated press in December 2013, Bode also said that he and his brother are very close."
"Please be gentle, Christine Cooper," he tweeted. "It's crazy. It's not all her fault."
"But it's not the first time that bode has suffered unexpected losses."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"In April 2013, his brother, chelone" chili "Miller, died of apparent epilepsy due to a motorcycle accident in 2005 that left him in a coma for 11 days."
"He was 29."
"He died five years before the daughter of the Olympic skier."
"We've completely collapsed."
"Our baby girl Amy died yesterday."
"For millions of years, we never thought we would experience such pain," the 40 year old Olympic alpine skier said on instagram on Monday



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...right off this planet to personally see to it that Carrie would never be alone...”
“I decided then that I d better develop something else if I wasn t going to be pretty maybe I could be funny or smart Per the Mail Todd writes that in another example of intense love and dedication his mother wanted to die with Carrie Debbie Reynolds willed herself...”
“In the book, and in her interviews, the late writer and actress spoke of a three-month-long affair she’d had with Harrison Ford on the set of Star Wars, when she was 19 and he was a 33-year-old married father of two.”
“In his new book, My Girls: A Lifetime with Carrie and Debbie, Todd Fisher, Carrie’s younger brother, writes that his sister regretted telling the story of her Star Wars tryst.”
“In November 2016, Carrie told People, “It was so intense.”
“It was Han and Leia during the week, and Carrie and Harrison during the weekend.” Per the Daily Mail, Todd writes that his mother, Debbie Reynolds, had no idea about the affair before Carrie shared it with the world, and her disapproval made Carrie regret sharing it.”
““You’re right.”
“I shouldn’t have told that story,” Carrie later told their mother, according to Todd.”
“Carrie and Reynolds, who died one day apart at the end of 2016, had a complicated relationship, as anyone who’s seen Postcards from the Edge will understand.”
“Todd writes that also in the last few months of 2016, Carrie was angry at her mother for trying to plan a lavish 60th birthday party for her.”


“… On this planet, make sure Carrie is never alone... "
"At that time, I decided that if I didn't want to be beautiful, I'd better develop something else, maybe I could be funny or smart," Todd wrote in an email. In another example of strong love and dedication, his mother wanted to die with Kelly Debbie Reynolds, and she would do the same... "
"In the book and in interviews, the late writer and actress talks about her three-month relationship with Harrison Ford, a 33 year old married father of two, on the set of star wars, when she was 19 years old."
"In his new book, my girl: a life with Carrie and Debbie, Carrie's brother Todd Fisher writes that his sister regrets telling her star wars tryst story."
"In November 2016, Carrie told people," it's too tight. "
According to the daily mail, Todd's mother, Debbie Reynolds, had no idea of the relationship before Carrie shared it with the world, and her disagreement made Carrie regret sharing it
"You're right."
"I shouldn't have told that story," said Todd, who later told their mother
"Carrie and Reynolds died one day at the end of 2016. Their relationship is very complicated. Anyone who has seen a postcard from the edge will understand."
"And in the last months of 2016, Todd wrote, Carrie was angry at her mother's attempt to plan a lavish 60th birthday party for her."



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...carpet...”
“A direct political statement about the Catholic Church s stance on homosexuality along with an homage to the superhero metaphor the actress used in her Emmy acceptance speech earlier this year the cape made a big splash on the red...”
“The out screenwriter for shows like Master of None and The Chi showed up to the yearly event wearing a simple suit, along with a long, flowing rainbow flag cape.”
“As it turns out, actress and producer Lena Waithe was able to please both groups.”
“...that the event would be using religious imagery as a theme...”
“When it was announced that this year s theme for the annual Met Gala would be Heavenly Bodies Fashion and the Catholic Imagination some were excited to see what red carpet attendees would come up with while others were upset...”


“… Carpet... "
"A direct political statement about the Catholic Church's position on homosexuality, and a tribute to the superhero metaphor used by the actress in her Emmy award-winning speech earlier this year, the Cape caused a big stir in red..."
The writers of anonymous and the wise attended the annual event in simple suits and elegant rainbow flags
"It turns out that actress and producer Lena waith can please both groups."
“… The event will use religious imagery as the theme... "
"When it was announced that the theme of this year's annual metropolitan party would be celestial fashion and Catholic imagination, some people were excited to see what the red carpet participants would come up with, while others were upset..."



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It’s a small price to pay for the extraordinary life that I live.””
““I was in a relationship 13 years, 13 real years, not 5 years, not 7 years — 13 years,” he said.”
“Jesse Williams and Minka Kelly are dating, a source confirms to PEOPLE.”
““They’re having a good time together,” adds the source of the pair, who are currently working on a video game together.”
“The news comes three months after Grey’s Anatomy star Williams officially split from wife Aryn Drake-Lee.”
“Williams filed for divorce on April 11, according to documents obtained by PEOPLE.”
“The actor first met Drake-Lee, a real estate broker, while working as a schoolteacher in New York.”
“The pair wed in September 2012 after more than five years of dating.”
“Williams and Drake-Lee are currently in court regarding the custody agreement over their two young children: daughter Sadie, 3, and son Maceo, who was born in 2015.”
“Williams, 35, addressed the split — and rumors of infidelity — in JAY-Z‘s short film Footnotes for 4:44, a visual accompaniment to the rapper’s new album, which was released Monday, according to E!”


"The price for my extraordinary life is small."
"I've been in love for 13 years, real 13 years, not five years, not seven years - 13 years," he said
A source confirmed to people that Jesse Williams and Minka Kelly are dating
"They're having a good time together," their source added, adding that they're currently working on a video game together
"The news came three months after Gray's anatomy star Williams officially broke up with his wife, Arlene Drake Lee."
"According to the documents available to people, Williams filed for divorce on April 11."
The actor first met Drake Lee, a real estate agent, when he was a teacher in New York
"They have been in love for more than five years and got married in September 2012."
"Williams and Drake Lee are currently in court on custody agreements for two young children: Sadie, a three-year-old daughter, and Marcio, a son born in 2015."
According to e! "



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was the first time I told @ericfuckingandre that I loved him (and very much not the last)," she captioned a series of photos of her and Andre in the hospital.”
“Chance the Rapper apparently assumed it was all part of one of Andre's signature elaborate pranks, and texted Dawson to ask if the relationship was real.”
“Us Weekly was the first to report the news, citing an unnamed source who said, "It just ran its course.”
“He was never something serious."”
“The Eric Andre Show creator and The Defenders actress went public with their relationship on Valentine's Day, when each posted about the other on social media.”
“Dawson posted two photos of her and Andre on Instagram.”
“"Wishing you all a 'Michael Bolton's Big Sexy Valentine's Day'!”
“#HappyValentinesDay #Valentines" she captioned one in which they pose with Michael Bolton.”
“"Happy Valentines Day my love!”
“#MyCuddlyValentine #Valentines" she wrote alongside the other, in which she and Andre stand in the typical "prom pose" next to a koala.”


"This is the first time I've told @ ericsfuckingandre that I love him (not the last)," she wrote in a series of photos of her and Andre in the hospital
"The rapper probably thought it was part of one of Andre's signature pranks and texted Dawson to see if the relationship was real."
Us weekly took the lead in reporting the news, quoting an unnamed source as saying, "it's just going to take its course."
"He was never serious."
"The creator of Eric Andre's show and the actress of the guardian made their love story public on Valentine's day, and both posted news about each other on social media."
"Dawson posted two photos of her and Andre on instagram."
"Have a 'Michael Bolton's sexy Valentine's Day'!"
"Happy Valentine's day, Happy Valentine's day," she wrote in the title of a letter, taking pictures with Michael Bolton
"Happy Valentine's day, dear!"
"My cuddly Valentine ා Valentine" she wrote in another letter that she and Andre stood next to the koala in a typical "dance posture."



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“If not, then hopefully some other movies.””
““Will Smith might have something to say about that but they didn’t ask him [to host], they asked me.”
“With that news I could finally live.”The pressure is on for DeVine to top last year’s co-hosts Kevin Hart and Dwayne Johnson, but he says that he’s up for the challenge.”
“Finally.”
““They’re like, ‘Oh no, did he just die?’ But I didn’t die — I started living.”
““I was a little hungover and I was in the back of the bus and they’re like, ‘We got big news!’ And they told me and I literally went — gasp!” he said.”
“It’s him, but I’m doing the best with what I have.”From Coinage: See Where 6 Stars Were Before They Were FamousWhile on his tour bus for his stand-up comedy shows, DeVine shares he got the call asking him to be host.”
“So who’s the bigger star?”
““I feel like I am the biggest movie and television star together as one,” he said of being chosen to host.”
““That’s the only way.”As for his favorite nominees, DeVine is rooting for his home teams.”


"If not, then hopefully some other films."
"Will Smith may have something to say, but they didn't invite him (the host), they invited me."
"With this news, I can live at last." Divan was under a lot of pressure to win last year's United hosts Kevin Hart and Dwyane Johnson, but he said he was ready for the challenge
"At last."
"They're going to say, 'oh no, did he just die? "But I didn't die - I started to live."
"I had a bit of a hangover and sat in the back of the car and they said," we have big news! "They told me, I'm really going - gasp! "He said
"It's him, but I've tried my best." From Mint: where are the six stars before they become famous, when he watches his stand up comedy show on the tour bus, Devon shares the invitation he received and the call to be the host
"So who are the big stars?"
"I feel like I'm the biggest movie and TV star together as one," he said, being chosen to host
"That's the only way." As for his favorite nominees, divan supports his home team



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Grateful for this guy + the adventures we get to go on!” Gonzales wrote in the caption.”
“I’ve never known such happiness and it’s awesome!” Lutz captioned a shot of the two getting close.”
“The Twilight star is engaged to his girlfriend Brittany Gonzales, the actor confirmed on a recent appearance on Steve.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“When host Steve Harvey referred to Gonzales as Lutz s fiance the actor 32 gave a quick yup before going on to add that she is the light of my life Image zoom Credit Brittany Gonzales Instagram While the two keep private about their relationship they often gush about each...”
“...other on their respective Instagram profiles...”
“Lutz gave Gonzales a shout out back in May.”
““Thank you God, for the best Gift ever!”
“The actor also opened up about Gonzales coming into his life with a heartfelt caption on a photo of the two holding hands.”
“She is my best friend and the best teammate to shine brighter with.”Gonzales, a TV host and model, recently snapped a pic of the pair after a romantic helicopter ride.”


"Thanks to this guy + we're going to continue the adventure! "Gonzalez wrote in the title."
"I've never seen such happiness. It's wonderful! "Lutz used subtitles to describe the scene of two people approaching."
Brittany Gonzalez, the star of twilight, confirmed his engagement to his girlfriend when she appeared on Steve recently
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"When host Steve Harvey mentioned that Gonzalez was Lutz's fiance, the 32 year old actor quickly said" yes ", and then added that she was the light of my life. This photo comes from Brittany Gonzalez's instagram. Although they kept their relationship secret, they often talked about each other endlessly..."
“… Others on their respective instagram profiles... "
"Lutz yelled at Gonzalez in May."
"Thank God for the best present!"
"The actor also made it public that Gonzalez had come into his life and had a sincere explanation in a picture of two people holding hands."
"She's my best friend, shining with my best teammates." Gonzalez, a TV host and model, recently photographed them after a romantic helicopter trip



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementThis article was originally published on 19 March 2018”
“The industry adapts and finds ways of working around whatever the issues is at the time.”Ordeal by Innocence will now be shown on BBC1 this Easter.”
“AdvertisementOrdeal by Innocence was dropped from the BBC Christmas schedules after allegations of sexual assault were made against actor Westwick in November last year.”
“Westwick strenuously denies the allegations.”
“Producers Mammoth Screen decided to reshoot parts of the series with another actor, 30-year-old English star Christian Cooke.”
“Now director Sandra Goldbacher and producer Damien Timmer have explained in a new interview with Radio Times why the decision was made.”
““Hundreds and hundreds of people’s work would have just gone,” director Goldbacher says in the new issue of Radio Times, “or been indefinitely delayed.”
“Which would have been devastating for everyone.”Goldbacher adds that she was encouraged by the example of director Ridley Scott, who recast and reshot Hollywood movie All the Money in the World with Christopher Plummer following allegations made against original star Kevin Spacey.”
““I felt encouraged by Ridley Scott having done it.”
“It was like a sort of talisman for us all: he’s done it, so we can do it,” she said.”


"This article was originally published on March 19, 2018"
"The industry adapts and finds solutions." This Easter BBC1 will broadcast "innocent torture"
"The innocence ad was removed from the BBC's Christmas list after the sexual assault charges against actor Westwick were filed in November last year."
"Westwick strongly denies the charges."
The producers of mammoth screen decided to remake part of the series with another actor, 30-year-old British star Christian cook
"Now director Sandra Goldbach and producer Damien Timmer explain the reasons for the decision in a recent interview with the radio times."
Director Goldbach said in a new issue of the radio times: "the work of hundreds and thousands of people may be finished or postponed indefinitely."
"It's devastating for everyone," Goldbach added, inspired by the example of director Ridley Scott, who recast and remake the Hollywood movie all the money in the world with Christopher Plummer after accusing the original Star Kevin Spacey
"I'm encouraged by Radley Scott doing this."
"It's like a talisman for all of us: he did it, so we can do it," she said



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Submit...”
“Free CP Newsletters Join over 250,000 others to get the top stories curated daily, plus special offers!”
“...back together after they had a flirty exchange of posts on social media...”
“Evans, famously known for portraying Marvel superhero Captain America, shared a post about "Mash" on Twitter that ended up starting a flirty exchange with ex Slate.”
“"The theme song to 'Mash' stresses me out.”
“The Pavlovian response is that it's time to go to bed and I probably haven't done my homework," Evans said on his post.”
“Slate came up with a playful response and said, "'Probably haven't'????”
“Cmon, Christopher.”
“Have you done your homework or haven't you?”
“It's 7pm and you've had the whoooole weekend.”


nan


Empty follow up sentence
“Most importantly, my stressors haven't subsided with family and this year has been crazy and I need some time off from all of it."”
“"I'll see you soon looking amazing and ready to play all my new songs LIVE.”
“4 weeks later, I will be releasing my first single from my new album, LOVE," he wrote in a since deleted post.”
“In time for Halloween, a new version of 'I Want Candy.'”
“I would also like to announce that I am releasing a gift to you on Oct. 27.”
“"My loved ones, I would like to tell all of you that I will be disappearing for a while to work on myself.”
“Before going in for treatment the first time Carter promised fans that he'd have new music for them soon.”
“...police...”
“The next month was difficult for the star as he suffered a broken nose and injuries to his arms and legs in a bad car crash in early September and was the subject of a series of welfare visits from...”
“Back in August, Carter came out as bisexual through a heartfelt note on Twitter, weeks after his arrest for DUI and possession of marijuana.”


"The most important thing is that my pressure has not subsided with the arrival of my family. This year, I've gone crazy and I need to stay away from it for a while."
"I'll see you soon. You look great. You're ready to play all my new songs live."
"In four weeks, I will release the first single of my new album, love," he wrote in a deleted post
"In order to catch up with Halloween, the new version of" I want candy. "
"I would also like to announce that I will send you a gift on October 27."
"My family, I want to tell you that I will disappear for a while and work for myself."
"Before the treatment, Carter assured his fans for the first time that he would soon prepare new music for them."
“… The police
"The next month will be hard for the star because he broke his nose and injured his arm and leg in a serious car accident in early September. It's from A series of welfare visits. "
"As early as August, a few weeks after Carter was arrested for drunk driving and possession of marijuana, he appeared as bisexual through a heartfelt message on twitter."



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s a good song!”
“Let us consider the (admittedly scant) evidence:1.”
“They are inseparableAccording to French magazine Madame Figaro, fans frequently report seeing Muñoz in Dion’s company.”
“3.”
“In Marseille, they performed a seductive, handsy dance to Dion’s chanson “Le Ballet.” Is this proof that where there’s smoulder there’s fire, or does she just feel safer getting sexy on stage with a man who will vogue with her at fashion shows?”
“They work very closely togetherDion seems to be giving Muñoz more to do in her show.”
“...the Rodarte lace dress with the floral embroidery when she s holding a banana 2”
“They admire each other s work Muñoz told Vogue that he s always loved her music For Dion s part when she first saw his fashion illustrations she was so impressed she started crying He told Vogue that his favourite illustration that he has ever done is of Dion in...”
“Does this mean that Dion is going the way of such diva contemporaries as Madonna, Jennifer Lopez and Mariah Carey, and letting her dance troupe double as her own personal harem?”
“2017 is the year of CélineAs they say in Dion-ese, a new day has come.”


"It's a good song!"
"Let's consider the (admittedly rare) evidence: 1."
According to French magazine Madame Figaro, their relationship is inseparable, and fans often report seeing Mu NIOS in Dion's company
“3.”
In Marseilles, they performed an attractive and beautiful dance for Dion's ballet. Does this prove that where there is smoldering, there is fire, or does she just think it's safer to be sexy on stage with a man who is popular with her on a fashion show? "
"Their cooperation is very close. Dion seems to have given Mu NIOS more opportunities to perform."
“… When she was holding banana 2, rhodate lace embroidered dress
"They appreciate each other's works. Munios told vogue that when she saw Dion's fashion illustration for the first time, he always liked Dion's music. She was deeply moved and began to cry. He told vogue that his favorite illustration is Dion in... "
"Does that mean Dion is going to follow the path of Madonna, Jennifer Lopez and Maria Kelly as contemporary female singers, and let her dance company serve as her own harem at the same time?"
"2017 is the year of selenas, and they say in Dion that a new day has arrived."



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Mr Paul has now released a second apology after the first he offered on Twitter yesterday was criticised, including by Game of Thrones actress Sophie Turner, who called it "self-praising".”
“One UK mother, whose husband took his own life, has called on the YouTuber to meet with families affected by suicide after her 13-year-old son saw the video.”
“Since then he has faced mounting criticism including from celebrities and parents for sharing the footage with his young following.”
“Mr Paul later deleted the video, but not before it had been viewed more than six million times.”
“Japanese Suicide Forest The video published on Monday showed footage of the body of a man as well as close ups of his hands after Mr Paul and his film crew stumbled across it in the Aokigahara forest...”
“More than 50 000 people have signed a Change org petition calling for the 22 year old s channel which has 15 million subscribers to be deleted after he published a video titled We found a dead body in the...”
“YouTuber Logan Paul has said he is “ashamed” and doesn’t “expect to be forgiven” amid a growing backlash over a video he posted showing a dead body in a Japanese forest known for frequent suicides.”


"After being criticized for his first apology on twitter yesterday, including" game of Thrones "actress Sophie Turner, Paul has now released a second apology, which he calls" self praise. "
"A British mother's husband committed suicide and after her 13-year-old son saw the video, she called on YouTube to meet with families affected by the suicide."
"Since then, he has been increasingly criticized for sharing videos with young followers, including celebrities and parents."
"Paul later deleted the video, but before it was viewed more than six million times."
"The video released by suicide forest in Japan on Monday shows Paul and his crew accidentally discovering the body of a man and a close-up of his hand in the aokanhara forest..."
"More than 50000 people signed a petition from the organization for change calling for the deletion of the 22-year-old channel s, because he published a paragraph entitled" we are "A body was found in the video, which has 15 million users."
"YouTube Logan Paul once said he felt" ashamed "and did not" expect to be forgiven "because a video he released showed that there was a corpse in a forest famous for frequent suicide in Japan, causing more and more rebound."



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, it’s unclear how long the this romance lasted, as they’ve since broken up.”
“The two celebs took their romance public on Instagram.”
“However, it’s confirmed that the breakup rumours aren’t true.”
“...month old child...”
“...photography by steve granitz contributor getty November 2011 Jelena is over apparently Rumours that Gomez has dumped the Canadian pop star begin to surface after a Bieber fan claimed she had sex with him backstage at a show in October 2010 and that he is the father of her 4”
“Oh, young love.”
“...photography by Kevin Mazur/Contributor/GettyMay 2011: Billboard Music AwardsJelena looked happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards.”
“Aren’t they adorable?”
“Photography by Jon Kopaloff/FilmMagicFebruary 2011: Jelena steps out on red carpet at the Vanity Fair Oscars partyYup, they finally made our dreams a reality by walking the red carpet together for the first time, thus confirming their young love.”
“But it wasn’t until January 2011 that the pop stars confirmed their romance, namely by partaking in major PDA while on vacation together in St. Lucia.”


"However, it's not clear how long the relationship lasted, because they have broken up."
"The two celebrities made their relationship public on instagram."
"However, it has been confirmed that the rumor of breaking up is not true."
“… One month old... "
“… Photography contributed by Steve granitz Getty in November 2011, jelina was apparently rumored that Gomez dumped a Canadian pop star and began to surface after a Bieber fan claimed that she had sex with him backstage on a show in October 2010 and that he was the father of her four children
"Oh, young love."
“… Photographer Kevin mazul / writer / Getty Mae 2011: Billboard Music Awards: Jenna looks happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards. "
"Aren't they cute?"
"Jon kopaloff photo / filmmagic February 2011: Jelena stepped on the red carpet of the vanity fair Oscar Party. They walked on the red carpet together for the first time and finally realized our dream, thus proving their young love."
"But it wasn't until January 2011 that the two pop stars confirmed their romance by taking part in a big PDA while on holiday in Saint Lucia."



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I have two others also: a broken heart on one hand and a full heart on the other.””
“I was not thinking clearly.”The host also inquired about the 22-year-old’s choice of phrase: the word “meow.”“It was literally the first thing that came to my mind,” she explained.”
“I was not thinking clearly," Kendall Jenner told Ellen DeGeneres of her inkKendall Jenner Explains Why She Got Her 'Meow' Lip Tattoo: 'I Was Drunk!'”
“Kendall Jenner is taking a cue from Jamie Foxx and blaming it on the alcohol.”
“Ellen DeGeneres grilled Jenner when the reality star appeared on her talk show, asking her about her discreet tattoos.”
“Turns out, she wasn’t exactly clearheaded while deciding to get inked on her inner lip back in July 2016.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Before carefully exposing the hidden tattoo (Jenner took pains not smudge her statement lipstick), the model told DeGeneres, “I was drunk!”
““I don’t know, just my drunk thoughts.”Despite DeGeneres’ hesitation, Jenner noted that the location of her tattoo minimalized the pain.”
“...face she said...”


"I have two more: heartbreak on the one hand and contentment on the other."
"I didn't think about it." The host also asked the 22-year-old for her words: "meow meow.". "It was the first thing I thought of," she explained
"I don't know," Kendall Jenner told Ellen DeGeneres of her handwriting. Kendall Jenner explained why she had the "meow meow" lip tattoo: "I'm drunk!"
"Kendall Jenner took the hint from Jamie Fox and blamed it on alcohol."
"When the reality star appeared on Jenner's talk show, Alan DeGeneres asked Jenner about her cautious tattoo."
"It turns out that she was not clear headed when she decided to ink her inner lip in July 2016."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Before carefully uncovering the invisible tattoo (Jenner painstakingly applied lipstick), the model told DeGeneres," I'm drunk! "
"I don't know, it's just my drunken thoughts." Despite DeGeneres's hesitation, Jenna noticed that the location of her tattoo minimized the pain
“… She said



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Rippon says, “I feel very in the family.””
““She had her hand up to her face … then I looked close and I was like, ‘Oh s—,’ ” he says.”
“...me and she was like You have to be in the wedding recalls Rippon 28”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“At first, he chalked it up to Johnson’s excitement about the engagement.”
““But then she brought it up again and confirmed she was being serious,” he tells PEOPLE.”
“Of course he said yes.”
““I’m super honored,” he says.”
“Rippon says Johnson’s call came out of the blue (he’d actually forgotten she was still on vacation) and when he answered, he wondered: Was everything okay?”
“(The ring, designed by Chmerkovskiy and Jacob Arabo, features a rectangular cushion-cut diamond with a diamond halo and a pavé diamond band.)”


"I feel like I get on well with my family," Rippon said
"She raised her hand to her face Then I looked closer and I said, "Oh, s - '," he said
"She and I are like you have to go to the wedding on the 28th"
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"At first, he attributed it to Johnson's excitement about engagement."
"But then she brought it up again and confirmed that she was serious," he told people
"Of course he did."
"I'm very honored," he said
Rippon said Johnson's call came out of the blue (he actually forgot she was on holiday), and when he answered the phone, he thought, "is everything ok?"
"(designed by chimmelkovsky and Jacob arabo, this ring features rectangular cushions with diamond rings, cut diamonds and Pave Diamond bands.)



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Bikini fun: The mom of three looked absolutely amazing in her bold green bikiniHard at work: Even though she was busy filming a commercial, Jessie couldn't have looked any happier...”
“They welcomed son Eric Jr. on September 1, 2015.”
“The country star, 30, was bikini season ready in a tiny green bathing suit as she filmed a commercial at Miami Beach on Monday.”
“Even though she was hard at work shooting scenes for the advert, Jessie still made time for her number one role as mom.”
“Life's a beach!”
“Jessie James Decker was bikini season ready in a tiny jade green bathing suit as she filmed a commercial at Miami Beach on MondayThe songstress couldn't have smiled any wider as she played with her daughter Vivianne Rose, four, by the waves.”
“Gleefully lifting her little girl high into the air, Jessie looked every inch the doting mom as she showered her daughter with affection.”
“And little Vivianne was over the moon spending some quality time with her mother.”
“The Flip My Hair songstress was having the time of her life working while enjoying some fun in the sun.”
“Doting mom: The songstress couldn't have smiled any wider as she played with her daughter Vivianne Rose by the wavesThat's her girl!”


"Bikini fun: this mother of three looks absolutely amazing in her bold green bikini: Jesse looks happy even though she's busy shooting advertisements..."
"On September 1, 2015, they welcomed their son, Eric the little."
"The 30-year-old country star wore a little green swimsuit as he was filming an ad on Miami Beach on Monday, preparing for the bikini season."
"Even though Jesse worked hard to set the scene for the ad, she took the time to play her number one mom."
"Life is like a beach!"
"Jessie James Decker was in a little jade green swimsuit while filming an ad on Miami Beach on Monday, preparing for the bikini season. The singer couldn't laugh more freely when she was playing with her four-year-old daughter vivianne rose by the waves. "
Jesse cheerfully lifted her little daughter into the air and poured love into her daughter like a doting mother
"Vivian had a good time with her mother."
"My hair turns over and the female singer works while enjoying the fun in the sun."
"Doting mother: when the female singer and her daughter Vivian rose are playing by the waves, she can't laugh more happily. That's her daughter!"



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She keeps insisting, and he finally caves, making her promise not to tell anyone.”
“While Terence claims he’s worked very hard to harness his fear, Megan doesn’t think so, as he never honestly answered her question.”
“He may be a douche, but he is right, as Megan tells Shaun she can’t keep faking her way through their sessions; Terence is too sharp.”
“He believes there’s something else at the core of her stress.”
“Terence can tell Megan’s bullshitting him, not buying her response about how she finds it difficult to get out of bed in the morning, just lying there and waiting to be judged.”
“At the beginning of “The Sessions” the pair start their work together and things get off to an ambiguous start, only to be made more precarious when Terence wants to accelerate their work.”
“...good friendSo Megan and Terence’s sessions didn’t go exactly how I thought they would.”
“So without further ado, let’s dive in.”
“Viewers were also “treated” to the reappearance of Hope, who may or may not be coming back.”
“It was just one ineffective twist and turn after another.”


"She insisted, and he finally gave in and made her promise not to tell anyone."
"Although Terence claims that he worked very hard to overcome fear, Megan doesn't think so because he never answered her questions honestly."
"He may be a fool, but he's right, as Megan told Sean, she can't keep putting on airs during their treatment; Terence is too sharp."
"He thinks the core of her stress is something else."
"Terrence can tell Megan that she's talking nonsense about him, doesn't believe her reaction to the difficulty of getting up in the morning, just lies there waiting for the trial."
"At the beginning of the meeting, when the two started working together, things began to become ambiguous, but when Terence wanted to speed up the work, the situation became more unstable."
“…… Good friend, so Megan and Terence's treatment didn't go as I thought
"So stop meddling and let's get started."
"Audiences are also" treated "for the reappearance of hope. They may or may not come back."
"It's just one ineffective turn after another."



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Fans—hopefully ones with better taste—can vote for their dream inductees at the Rock Hall’s website now.”
“Bon Jovi was the favorite of that year’s fan ballot tally by a long shot (Radiohead came in 12th).”
“The members of last year’s Rock Hall class were Nina Simone, The Cars, Bon Jovi, The Moody Blues, and Dire Straits.”
“That potential list includes Outkast, Beck, Snoop Dogg, Jeff Buckley, Fugees, the Roots, and (finally, folks) Dave Matthews Band.”
“No artists that became eligible for the first time this year were nominated.”
“& Rakim, and others.”
“Several notable nominees from last year are not present on this year’s list, including Kate Bush, Nine Inch Nails, the Smiths, the Replacements, Depeche Mode, Eric B.”
“Of these, LL Cool J and Kraftwerk have been nominated the most times previously, with this being their fifth and fourth nominations, respectively.”
“The list of previously included nominees includes Radiohead, Rage Against the Machine, Janet Jackson, LL Cool J, The Cure, Kraftwerk, Rufus & Chaka Khan, MC5, and the Zombies.”
“The acts being nominated for the first time this year are Devo, Roxy Music, Stevie Nicks, Todd Rundgren, John Prine, and Def Leppard.”


"Fans hope that those with better taste can now vote on the website of the rock and roll hall for their dream winner."
"Bonjovi was well ahead in the fan vote that year (Radiohead ranked 12th)
"Last year, Nina Simona, car, bonjovi, blue blues and terrible predicament were the members of the rock concert hall."
"This potential list includes ocaster, Beck, snoop dog, Jeff Barkley, forges, gen, and (finally, folks) Dave Matthews."
"None of the artists who were nominated for the first time this year were nominated."
&Rakim and others
"Last year, several well-known nominees didn't appear on this year's list, including Kate bush, nine inch nail, Mr. and Mrs. Smith, successor, depage Mulder, Eric B
"Among them, LL Cool J and kraftwerk have received the most nominations before, which is their fifth and fourth nominations respectively."
"Previous nominations include Radiohead, rage against the machine, Janet Jackson, LL Cool J, the cure, kraftwerk, Rufus & Chaka Khan, MC5 and zombies."
This year's first nominees include devo, Roxy Music, Stevie Knicks, Todd Lundgren, John Prinn and Dave Leppard



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’ve realized that I need to start having confidence in my relationship with John and that he accepts me for all my faults,” she told the camera.”
“...said she did feel bad she didn t tell Cena...”
“Her family were not happy, especially Colace, who wondered why Bella didn’t think she could come to her.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“It’s crazy ’cause John doesn’t even know and here we talk about marriage and we never bring it up.”Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
““I tried to forget about it but now it’s starting to come up, and I figured you guys have to hear from me before you hear from anyone else.”
““Even when I started walking down the aisle, I knew this was a huge mistake and how can I get out of it and I couldn’t,” she recalled.”
“We drove to Vegas, did it.”The union was something Bella regretted from the beginning.”
““Basically we got married by Elvis.”
“And got divorced at 23, to my high school sweetheart,” Bella said.”


"I realized that I needed to start to have confidence in my relationship with John, who accepted all my shortcomings," she told the camera
“… She said she was really sad that she didn't tell Senna... "
"Her family are not happy, especially koras, and she wants to know why Bella thinks she can't come to her."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"It's crazy because John doesn't even know that we talk about marriage here, but we never mention it." Want to know the latest news about people? "
"I tried to forget about it, but now it's starting to appear, and I think you have to hear from me first, and then from others."
"Even if I started walking down the aisle, I knew it was a huge mistake and how I could get rid of it, I couldn't," she recalled
"We drove to Vegas and did it." Bella felt sorry for the union from the beginning
"Basically we were married by Elvis."
"When I was 23, I divorced my high school sweetheart," Bella said



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out what we mean, below.”
“ Let’s hang in NYC Xo @amas @enews @bradgoreski A post shared by Ramona Singer (@ramonasinger) on Nov 19, 2017 at 4:28pm PSTUntil then, Lea might have to settle on weighing in on Housewives drama instead of participating in it.”
“Good luck tonight @leamichele!”
“We mean, can you blame her?”
“It was an offer that left Lea "shaking" all over.”
“She also suggested that Lea hang with her and her Big Apple crew and perhaps make a cameo on RHONY at some point.”
“But that wasn't all.”
“But, you see, Ramona did want something in return — to have Lea sing "Happy Birthday" to her since she had just celebrated two days earlier.”
“The gift was enough to freak Lea out in the best way possible.”
“News and it was then that they presented her with a video message filmed especially for her by The Real Housewives of New York City pal.”


"Look at what we mean below."
"Let's be in New York Xo@amas@enews@bradgoreski Before hanging a post shared by Ramona singer (@ ramanasinger) at 4:28 p.m. on November 19, 2017, Lea may have to consider participating in the housewife's drama rather than participating in it. "
"Good luck tonight @ leamichele!"
"We mean, can you blame her?"
"It's a proposal that makes Leah" shiver all over. "
"She also suggested that Leah, along with her and her big apple crew, might guest star in Ronnie at some point."
"But that's not all."
"But, you see, Ramona does want something in return - let Leia sing her a happy birthday, because she just celebrated it two days ago."
"This gift is enough to scare Leah in the best way."
"At that time, they gave her a video message specially shot for her by a real housewife friend in New York City."



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“FROM COINAGE: The Most Expensive TV Shows of All Time...”
“Pajkovic is a Danish actress who last appeared in 2015 film The Transporter Refueled, while Holbrook has also starred in Logan and will appear in the 2018 reboot of The Predator.”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“The pair was spotted out and about in Los Angeles recently, with Pajkovic sporting an obvious baby bump.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Actor Boyd Holbrook – best known as DEA agent Steve Murphy on Netflix series Narcos – is expecting a baby with girlfriend Tatiana Pajkovic.”
“Actor Boyd Holbrook – best known as DEA agent Steve Murphy on Netflix series Narcos – is expecting his first child with girlfriend Tatiana PajkovicBaby on the Way for Narcos Star Boyd Holbrook and Tatiana PajkovicBaby on board!”


"From coinage: the most expensive TV show of all time..."
"Paikovich is a Danish actress who last starred in the 2015 film" come on transporter ", while Holbrooke also starred in" Logan "and will be re released in" Predator "in 2018
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"The two were recently found in Los Angeles with a distinct baby lump on paikovic."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Actor Boyd Holbrook, the most famous DEA agent in the Netflix series, Steve Murphy, is pregnant with his girlfriend Tatiana pajkovic."
"Actor Boyd Holbrook - best known as Steve Murphy, an anti drug agent in Netflix's anti drug series - is preparing his first child for anti drug stars Boyd Holbrook and Tatiana pajkovic baby!"



Number  142
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He is inclined to cart, design, culture, and architecture and resides in Los Angeles with his wife and twin kids.”
“He is also a famous cast member on the Bravo TV’s reality series Million Dollar Listing.”
“He is the successful luxury real estate agent in various high profile venues like Beverly Hills and Holmby Hills.”
“The American businessman co-founded the real estate firm, The Altman Brothers in 2002, which has sold luxury properties worth $2.5 billion.”
“With the booming business, the real estate agent is recently blessed with twins.”
“How Does Matt Summons Net Worth?”
“Matt Altman has derived his vast net worth mainly as a real estate agent for various firms as well as a talent agent in leading company.”
“He is enjoying his lavish lifestyle by selling luxury properties to the millionaires and celebrities in Los Angeles, Beverly Hills, Holmby Hills, and Bel Air.”
“His real estate firm sold over $60 million in properties across the nation in 2011.”
“Along with his firm The Altman Brothers, he is also an active broker at Douglas Elliman Real Estate since February 2015.”


He loves wheelbarrows, design, culture and architecture, and lives in Los Angeles with his wife and twins
"He's also a famous actor on Bravo's reality show million dollars on the market."
"He is a successful luxury real estate agent in many well-known locations, such as Beverly Hills and holby hills."
The American businessman co founded real estate company Altman brothers in 2002, which has sold $2.5 billion worth of luxury properties
"With the boom in business, the real estate agency recently had twins."
"How does Matt get his net worth?"
"Matt Altman's huge net assets mainly come from real estate agents of many companies and talent agents of leading companies."
"He is enjoying a luxury lifestyle by selling luxury properties to millionaires and celebrities in Los Angeles, Beverly Hills, Holmby hills and bel air."
"In 2011, his real estate company sold more than $60 million of properties across the country."
"Since February 2015, together with his company, Altman brothers, he has been an active agent of Douglas Elliman real estate."



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“2016”
“The song is making headlines for blatantly calling out the Wolves singer but there s another track that is also hinting at his longtime girlfriend Bella Hadid whom he dated for over a year before calling things off in November...”
“...year due to lupus...”
“I said I didn t feel nothing baby but I lied I almost cut a piece of myself for your life Selena whom he dated for 10 months before splitting in October 2017 underwent an emergency kidney transplant that same...”
““We found each other / I helped you out of a broken place / You gave me comfort / But falling for you was my mistake,” The Weeknd sings.”
“In track “Call Out My Name,” the Grammy winner seemingly reflects on his split from Gomez and also hints he was going to be her kidney donor.”
“The Weeknd bared his soul on new EP My Dear Melancholy and is dropping all kinds of knowledgable insight on his breakups from Bella Hadid and Selena Gomez.”


“2016”
"This song made headlines because of its blatant clamour for wolves singers, but there is another song that also implies that he had been dating his girlfriend Bella Hadid for more than a year and then cancelled his engagement in November..."
Year of lupus
"I said I didn't feel much, baby, but I lied that I almost cut a piece of my own flesh for your life. Selena dated him for 10 months before she broke up in October 2017 and also received an emergency kidney transplant..."
"We found each other / I helped you out of a broken place / you comforted me / but it was my fault to fall in love with you," sang the weekend
"In the repertoire call my name, the Grammy winner seems to reflect on her breakup with Gomez and suggest that she will become her kidney donor."
"This weekend, he revealed his soul in his new album, my dear melancholy, and gave up all kinds of knowledge about his breakup from Bella Hadid and Selena Gomez."



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The time she totally annihilated Fox News.”
“Stop putting your stupid fucking purse and coat in the overhead compartment and keep it at your feet like everyone else you ASSHOLE — christine teigen (@chrissyteigen) November 19, 201312.”
“This sweary acceptance of the inevitable.”
“...fucking tired of having to download the newest flash player just make the fucking best flash player — christine teigen (@chrissyteigen) December 4, 20143.”
“Not to mention those Flash Player download requests.”
“Oh my god just fucking LATER — christine teigen (@chrissyteigen) January 22, 20162.”
“"Later" "later today or later tomorrow?"”
“"When do you want to update?"”
“Hate this macbook relationship.”
“The time she'd had just about enough of those Macbook update requests.”


"She wiped out Fox News that time."
"Stop putting your damn wallet and coat in the overhead compartment, put it at your feet, like everyone else, you asshole - Christina tigen (@ christyteigen) November 19, 2013."
"It's an acceptance of the inevitable."
“… I'm tired of downloading the latest Flash player, so I'll be the best fuckin 'flash player
"Not to mention those flash player download requests."
"Oh, my God, it's fuckin 'late - Christina tigen, January 22, 2016."
"Later" "later today or later tomorrow?" "
"When will it be updated? “””
"I hate this MacBook relationship."
"At that time, she was fed up with MacBook update requests."



**Something goes wrong**
“...giving this whole thing a rest for awhile.”
“...i love you guys!”
“...not everything i post has to do with thomas.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“2018 This content is imported from Twitter...”
“...no we are not broken up yes we are still together no we are not fighting we are madly in love and better than ever please stop speculating spreading rumors when you have absolutely no basis all smooth sailing over here thanks for checking innnnnn Dove Cameron DoveCameron June 11”
“PSA: THOMAS AND I ARE FINE.”
“...byeThis content is imported from Twitter.”
“...my life isn’t a reality show?”


“… Give the whole thing a break. "
“… I love you
“… Not everything I post is about Thomas
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from twitter..."
“… No, we didn't break up. Yes, we are still together. No, we don't fight. We love each other crazily. It's better than ever. Please stop guessing and spreading rumors. When you have no foundation at all, everything goes well. Here, thank you for checking the innnnnn pigeon and Cameron pigeon
"Thomas and I are fine."
“… Byethis content is imported from twitter. "
“… My life is not a reality show? "



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“R.I.P Chris -- we miss you.”
“We could keep going, but this classic SNL commercial should never be left off a list.”
“Bonus: Schmitts GayI know we said five, but Chris Farley is so amazing that it could hardly be limited.”
“Gap GirlsWatching Adam Sandler try to hold himself together when Farley belts out his infamous "Lay off me I'm starving" line is pure gold.”
“"No Yelling on the bus!!!"”
“Billy MadisonThe angry bus driver was one of the funniest parts in "Billy Madison."”
“ChippendalesThe famous sketch with Patrick Swayze will go down as one of Saturday Night Live's best, although many friends of Farley have said since his death they felt the sketch was painful for him.”
“LIVING IN A VAN DOWN BY THE RIVER!!!”
“Matt Foley: The Motivational SpeakerIf you've never heard of this famous Farley sketch, then there's a good chance you'll end up ...”
“Tommy Boy"Tommy Boy" brought us great lines like "fat guy in a little coat," and one of Farley's most memorable bits about being in sales.”


"R.I.P. Chris - we miss you."
"We can continue, but this classic SNL ad should not be excluded from the list."
"Good thing: Schmidt guy knows we said five, but Chris Farley is so amazing that he can't limit it."
"Gap girls watched Adam Sandler try to cheer up, while Farley uttered his infamous line," fire me, I'm starving. "It's pure gold."
"Don't yell in the car!"
"The angry bus driver Billy Madison is one of the most interesting parts of Billy Madison."
"The famous skit by chibendaris and Patrick Swayze will be one of the best skits in live on Saturday night, although many of Farley's friends say that since his death, they feel the skit is very painful for him."
"Living in a truck by the river!"
"Matt Foley: motivational speech if you've never heard of this famous Farley sketch, you'll probably end up with..."
"Tommy Boy" and "Tommy Boy" bring us lines like "fat man in a little coat", which is also one of Farley's most unforgettable sales experiences



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Stories:It Sure Looks Like Priyanka Chopra Made Her Relationship With Nick Jonas Instagram OfficialPSA: Priyanka Chopra and Nick Jonas Are Vacationing Together in India Right NowYour Fave Maybe-Couple Nick Jonas and Priyanka Chopra Went to a Wedding Together...”
“Nothing says "romance" like hanging out with Chord Overstreet and Wilmer Valderrama on a boat, am I right?”
“However, things really turned up a notch this past Memorial Day weekend, when they went to a baseball game, concert, and spent a day on a boat together.”
“Getty ImagesGetty ImagesRumors of Chopra and Jonas dating kicked off during the 2017 Met Gala last year.”
“The second is a paparazzi shot of them together in Mumbai.”
“Speaking of, there are a few cute pics from Jonas and Chopra's past week together: The first is from the night of Akash Ambani's pre-engagement party.”
“They cheer each other on at work, pose for pictures together, and hide from dozens of paparazzi—ya know, normal people stuff.”
“Chopra and Jonas are just like any other maybe-couple.”
“See, guys?”
“(Side note: I wonder what her favorite Nick song is?)”


"Related story: of course, it seems that the relationship between Priyanka Chopra and Nick Jonas is instagram of ficialPSA:Priyanka Chopra I'm on holiday in India with Nick Jonas. Your favorite couple Nick Jonas and Priyanka Chopra went to the wedding together... "
There's nothing more romantic than hanging out on a boat with hod overstrit and Wilmer waldrama, right? "
"However, on the Memorial Day weekend just past, they went to baseball games, concerts and spent a day on the boat together. Things really improved."
"Getty imagesgetty images the dating of jopra and Jonas started at last year's 2017 blind date party."
"The second is a paparazzi photo of them in Mumbai."
"Speaking of which, there are some lovely pictures of Jonas and Chopra together in the past week: the first one is the night of Akash Ambani's pre engagement party."
"They cheer each other up at work, pose for photos together, and hide dozens of paparazzi, you know, normal people's things."
"Jopra and Jonas are like other couples."
"See, guys?"
(sidenote: I want to know what her favorite Nick song is?)



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“With a little kid, that’s a lot of time.””
“This tour will take me away for four months.”
“I don’t want to spend my life on the road.”
““I have a granddaughter now I’d like to see as much as I can.”
“In December he admitted to Rolling Stone that the trek, done to honor the 40th anniversary of the Heartbreakers’ debut, would likely be “the last big one.”“We’re all on the backside of our 60s,” he continued.”
“Image zoom Credit: Angela Weiss/GettyLast Monday, Petty concluded his extensive recent tour—which kicked off on April—at the Hollywood Bowl.”
“The band scored a string of hits over several decades, including “American Girl,” “Free Falin’,” “Refugee” and “I Won’t Back Down.” He was also a member of the supergroup collective the Traveling Wilburys in the late ’80s alongside Bob Dylan, George Harrison, Roy Orbison and Jeff Lynne.”
“You are in my prayers.”Petty first burst onto the music scene in 1976 with his group, Tom Petty and the Heartbreakers.”
“Fellow music star Sheryl Crow tweeted her well wishes to Petty, saying “I love you so much.”
“Though his current condition is unknown, he was found in critical condition.”


"It's a long time with a child."
"This trip will take me away for four months."
"I don't want to spend my life on the road."
"I have a granddaughter now, and I want to see as many as I can."
Last December, he admitted to Rolling Stone magazine that "the long journey" to mark the 40th anniversary of the heartbreaker's premiere is likely to be "the last big movie.". "We are all in our 60s," he continued
Photo zooming credit: Angela Weiss / Getty last Monday, Patty ended his recent extensive tour, which began in April at the Hollywood Bowl
For decades, the band has won a series of hit songs, including "American girl," "free farIn," "refugee," and "I won't back down.". He is also a member of the super group travel to wilbury in the late 1980s, along with Bob Dylan, George Harrison, Roy obison and Jeff Lynn
"You are in my prayers." Patty first appeared on the music stage in 1976. His bands were Tom Patty and heartbreaker
Music star Cheryl Crowe tweeted her blessing to Patty, saying, "I love you so much."
"Although his current condition is unknown, he was found in critical condition."



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Can you imagine that?”
“And yet, the Globes did not love any of the songs in Poppins enough to nominate them in Best Original Song.”
“Even those who don’t particularly care for Green Book admit that, as the film’s real-life interracial road-trip buddies, Viggo Mortensen and Mahershala Ali have winning chemistry.”
“Green Book might not just be an acting play.”
“(Though Sam Elliott, fresh off a Best Supporting Actor win from the National Board of Review, was a notable snub.)”
“Both films earned nominations in Best Drama and Best Actor in a Drama, with Star also pulling in nods for Best Actress (Lady Gaga), Best Director, and Best Original Song (“Shallow”).”
“It worked!”
“This year, both A Star Is Born and Bohemian Rhapsody decided to take their chances in the Drama categories, figuring the added prestige boost was worth the risk of being snubbed in the harder field.”
“Even if they only feature diegetic music, films about rocks stars have generally preferred to run in the Musical/Comedy category at the Globes.”
“Bohemian Rhapsody and A Star Is Born’s drama gambits paid off.”


"Can you imagine?"
"However, people on earth don't like any of the songs in poppy enough to nominate them as the best original songs."
"Even those who don't particularly like the green paper admit that there is a deep relationship between Viggo Mortensen and mahsara Ali as partners of cross racial road travel in real life in the film."
"The green paper may not be just a show."
(although Sam Elliott, who has just won the best supporting actor award of the National Jury, has been obviously left out.)
Both films received nominations for best feature film and best actor in feature film. The stars also received nominations for Best Actress (Lady Gaga), best director and best original song (Shaw)
"It's a success!"
"This year, a star was born, a Bohemian Rhapsody decided to venture into the drama category, they thought it was worthwhile to increase their popularity and the risk of being left out in more difficult fields."
"Even if these films only feature diggerty music, movies about rock stars are generally more likely to be included in the music / comedy category at universal."
"Bohemian Rhapsody and star born drama games have paid off."



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“An unnamed Royal source says that William and Kate are trying to find the perfect balance between keeping them connected to their centuries-old royal heritage, and as much of a “normal” life as possible.”
“It is 21 years since she passed away but her legacy lives on through her boys Prince William and Prince Harry.”
“Princess Diana is “helping” Prince William and Kate Middleton raise their children – and here “helping” means “her parenting style informs William and Kate’s parenting style.”As E!”
“News reports, Prince William was surprisingly candid about the role his mother would play in his children’s lives if she were still around.”
““She’d be a nightmare grandmother, absolute nightmare.”There is no doubt, he said, that she would love her grandchildren to the Moon and back.”
“But William also said that she would spoil them rotten, much like your own grandmother likely did to you.”
““She’d come in probably at bath time, cause an amazing… scene, bubbles everywhere, bathwater all over the place, and then leave.”It may sound just like the normal parent/grandparent relationship to your ears.”
“But coming from the Royal Family, that type of thing is borderline shocking.”
“Back when Prince William and Prince Harry were young boys, Princess Diana’s parenting style was hands-on to an almost shocking degree.”
“Sure, she had nannies to do the “heavy lifting,” such as changing dirty diapers and such.”


An unnamed Royal source said William and Kate are trying to find the perfect balance between maintaining their ties with the royal family's Centennial heritage and living as many "normal" lives as possible
"It's 21 years since she died, but her legacy continues through her sons, Prince William and Prince Harry."
Princess Diana is "helping" Prince William and Kate Middleton to raise their children - here "helping" means "the way she raised children affects the way William and Kate raised children."! "
"In the news, Prince William was surprisingly candid about what role she would play in the children's lives if her mother were still around."
"She's going to be a nightmare grandmother, definitely a nightmare." He said there was no doubt that she would love her grandchildren to come back to the moon
"But William also said she would spoil them, just as your grandmother did to you."
"She may come in while she's in the shower, causing a startling The scene, the bubbles everywhere, the bath water everywhere, and then left. " It sounds like a normal parent / grandparent relationship in your ear
"But from the royal family, it's shocking."
"As early as when Prince William and Prince Harry were young, Princess Diana's parenting style was almost shocking."
"Of course, she has a nanny to do" heavy work ", such as changing dirty diapers and so on."



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We love you and we will never forget you."”
“...and all those still healing...”
“And following the show s opening a rendition of Amazing Grace performed by Eric Church followed by Darius Rucker and a slew of stars singing Hootie the Blowfish s Hold My Hand Paisley dedicated the show to all those lost...”
“Underwood tearfully gave the "in memoriam" performance, which ended with all 58 of the Route 91 victims' faces.”
“...that were most touching...”
“Though they mocked the president and a host of other political figures in their traditional monologue it was the stars tributes to the victims of the Route 91 Harvest Festival shooting and several other mass shootings that occured that fall...”


"We love you and will never forget you."
“… And those who are still recovering... "
"At the beginning of the performance, Eric church performed a song" magic grace ", followed by Darius rook and a group of singers sang" puffer's hooties hold my hand ", and Paisley dedicated the performance to all the dead people..."
Underwood tearfully performed the "memorial" performance. At the end of the performance, all the 58 victims on highway 91 had faces
“… The most touching
"Although they ridiculed the president and many other politicians in their traditional monologues, the stars paid tribute to the victims of the highway 91 harvest day shooting and several other mass shootings that fall..."



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'It's not admissible in court ...'Emily, a lawyer, said: 'Her behavior while on a girls' trip isn't relevant to how she treats her children or what kind of mom she is.”
“She then insisted that her ex had used it as part of their legal fight, saying: 'When you're going through an acrimonious divorce and potential custody issues you bring up behavior of your ex-spouse that is maybe not appropriate.”
“It's hard for me ... '' You were too!”
“He's dating.”
“You're like, ''David was dating three months after.”
“Together again: Gina KIrschenhelter, Kelly Dodd, Tamra, Andy Cohen, Shannon, Vicki Gunvalson and Emily Simpson gathered for the season 13 reunionTamra continued: 'You play victim a lot.”
“'I was sitting on the phone with the matchmaker caring about you, excited about getting you this date, and then I find out you had a boyfriend the whole time,' Gina complained.”
“Gina Kirschenheiter, 34, expressed her resentment that Shannon would allow her to miss time with her kids to instead find her a matchmaker.”
“While filming: Tamra Judge revealed that Shannon was dating a guy while filming season 13 of RHOC'I liked him, I really liked him, but he was a jerk to me,' Shannon insisted, making it clear they were no longer together.”
“Andy quickly asked.”


"This is unacceptable in court..." "What she does when a girl travels has nothing to do with how she treats her children or what kind of mother she is," lawyer Emily said
She went on to insist that her ex boyfriend had used this as part of their legal fight, saying: "it may not be appropriate for you to bring up your ex spouse's behavior when you experience intense divorce and potential custody issues."
"It's hard for me..." You too! "
"He's on a date."
"You said," David started dating in three months. "
"Together again: Gina kirschchert, Kylie Dodd, Tamra, Andy Cohen, Shannon, Vicky gonwason and Emily Simpson are together for season 13 reunion. Mara went on, "you often play the victim."
"I was on the phone with the matchmaker, caring about you, excited to date you, and then I found out you always had a boyfriend," Gina complained
"Gina kirschenheiter, 34, is unhappy that Shannon let her miss the time with her children and instead find a matchmaker for her."
"Filming: Tamra gage revealed that Shannon was dating a man when filming season 13 of RhoC." I like him, I really like him, but he's a jerk to me, "Shannon insisted, making it clear that they are no longer together
"Andy asked quickly



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Is There a Pre-Show?”
““iHeartRadio is a huge supporter of artists and music, so to get to be part of this celebration is a huge honor,” the deejay previously told iHeartRadio.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards will broadcast live from the Forum in Los Angeles on Sunday, March 11th at 8 p.m.”
“ET on TBS, TNT and truTVEverything You Need to Know About the 2018 iHeartRadio Music AwardsGet ready to pop off your couch and dance the night away right from your living room!”
“The iHeartRadio Music Awards celebrates the most popular artists and biggest hits over the past year as determined by listeners tuning into iHeartMedia radio stations nationwide and on iHeartRadio, iHeartMedia’s digital music platform.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“ET on TBS, TNT and truTV.”
“Here’s everything you need to know.”


"Is there a preview?"
"IHeartRadio is a huge supporter of artists and music, so it's a great honor to be able to participate in this celebration," the host told iHeartRadio earlier
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"The 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards will be broadcast live on the forum in Los Angeles at 8pm on Sunday, March 11."
"About TBS, TNT and truTV, everything you need to know about the 2018 iHeartRadio Music Awards, please be ready to jump off the sofa and dance in the night away from the living room!"
"The iHeartRadio music award is to celebrate the most popular artists and songs of the past year, which is decided by the audience listening to iheartmedia National Radio and iHeartRadio, iheartmedia's digital music platform."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Et on TBS, TNT and truTV."
"That's all you need to know."



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We used to preserve it out of necessity, now we preserve it as a pastime.”The month-long festival is the biggest in the Gulf and involves up 30,000 camels.”
“It has big lips, a big nose.’”After the ban was imposed, the chief judge of the show, Fawzan al-Madi, told Reuters: “The camel is a symbol of Saudi Arabia.”
““It makes the head more inflated so when the camel comes it’s like, ‘Oh, look at how big that head is.”
““They use Botox for the lips, the nose, the upper lips, the lower lips and even the jaw,” Ali al-Mazrouei, the son of an Emirati camel breeder, told the UAE daily the National.”
“Camels were also given Botox-type injections at his clinic, according to Saudi media.”
“This year, a dozen camels were banned after a vet was caught performing plastic surgery on them.”
“But there are strict rules against the use of drugs in the lips, or shaved or clipped body parts.”
“The key attributes in camel beauty are considered to be delicate ears and big nose.”
“This year’s event has been been mired in scandal after the lure of 20m Saudi riyals (£3.7m) in prize money for each category tempted some owners to cheat.”
“Saudi authorities have raised the profile of the King Abdulaziz camel festival by relocating it from the desert to the outskirts of the capital, Riyadh.”


"We used to protect it out of necessity, now we use it as a pastime." The month long Festival is the largest in the Gulf, with 30000 camels taking part
"It has big lips and a big nose." "The camel is a symbol of Saudi Arabia," Fazan Madi, the show's chief judge, told Reuters after the ban
"It makes the head bigger, so when the camel comes, it says," Oh, look how big that head is. "
"They use Botox on their lips, nose, upper lip, lower lip and even lower jaw," Ali mazrui, son of the UAE camel breeder, told the UAE's national daily
"According to Saudi media reports, camels also received Botox injections at his clinic."
"This year, a veterinarian was caught doing plastic surgery on camels, and a dozen camels were banned."
But there are strict rules against the use of drugs on lips, shaved or clipped body parts
"The key features of camel beauty are considered to be delicate ears and a big nose."
"This year's event is deeply scandalous because the prize of 20 million Saudi Riyals (3.7 million pounds) per category tempts some owners to cheat."
"The Saudi authorities moved King Abdelaziz camel festival from the desert to the outskirts of the capital, Riyadh, increasing its visibility."



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s probably just to humiliate me!””
“This featurette sees the male stars joking about their embarrassment, with Stellan Skarsgard - who plays the older Bill - saying: “I can’t sing, I can’t dance and I don’t know why they hired me for this.”
“In it, fans can see the making of Super Trouper; the big ensemble show-stopper that comes right at the end of the film.”
“As the release of the musical sequel on DVD and Blu-ray is confirmed for November 26, one of the featurettes has been teased early.”
“Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“Please see our Privacy Notice for details of your data protection rights.”
“We will use your email address only for sending you newsletters.”


"Maybe it's just humiliating me!"
"This special saw male stars joking about their embarrassment. Strayn scarsgarde, who plays Old Bill, said:" I can't sing, I can't dance, I don't know why they hired me to do this. "
In the film, fans can see the production process of "super Troupe"; this large ensemble just appears at the end of the film
"With the release of the musical sequel DVD and Blu ray on November 26, one of the specials has been teased ahead of time."
"Sign up now and don't miss the top Royal stories any more."
"For more information about your data protection rights, please refer to our privacy statement."
"We will only use your email address to send you a press release."



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But you know me, if I didn’t do things the way I did, I wouldn’t be me.””
“Usually parents want you to be married first and things like that.”
““Obviously it’s non-traditional.”
““Andrew is very adamant on making sure that I’m eating nothing but fruits, veggies, meats and organic foods,” she told Us last month, also admitting that she was “nervous” about revealing the baby news at first.”
““But we’re trying not to put too much pressure on a relationship.”Glennon has been very supportive during Portwood’s pregnancy so far.”
“...a way as well Portwood told Us of the lighting technician in August...”
“They would later make their red carpet debut in August at the MTV Video Music Awards in L A I think we just kind of fell into this groove really enjoying life with each other for a while so its kind of fun and it s kind of serious in...”
“! pic.twitter.com/gtspZGalgt — Amber Portwood (@AmberLPortwood) December 8, 2017The couple met when Portwood was filming Marriage Boot Camp with ex-fiancé Matt Baier.”
“Little baby Glennon is on his way!”
“The reality star is already mom of daughter Leah, 8, with ex-fiancé Gary Shirley.”


"But you know me, if I don't do things my way, I'm not me."
"Usually parents want you to get married first or something."
"It's obviously unconventional."
"Andrew is very determined to make sure that I only eat fruits, vegetables, meat and organic food," she told us last month, admitting that she was "nervous" at the beginning of the disclosure
"But we try not to put too much pressure on a relationship." So far, Glennon has been very supportive of Portwood during her pregnancy
"Portwood also told us about the lighting technician in August..."
"They're going to make their debut on the red carpet at the MTV Music Video Awards in Los Angeles in August. I think we're just a little bit stuck in this state. We really enjoy each other's lives for a while, so it's fun and a bit serious..."
“!  pic.twitter.com/gtspZGalgt -Amber Portwood (@ amberlportwood) on December 8, 2017, the couple met when Portwood and former fiance Matt Baier filmed marriage training camp
"Baby Glennon is on the way!"
"The reality star is the mother of her 8-year-old daughter Leah and ex fiance Gary Shirley."



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The film, which is currently in production, is said to be about two high-frequency traders who go against their former boss to makes millions in a deal concerning fiber-optic cables.”
“He rocked his normal blond locks on the sides — but a shiny bald head on top.”
“A post shared by Rex Danger (@rexdanger) on Oct 24, 2017 at 11:45am PDTSkarsgard looked nearly unrecognizable when he hit the red carpet at Louis Vuitton’s Volez, Voguez, Voyagez Exhibition in New Your City last month.”
“Moonrise.”
“The actor has presumably taken on a new look for the upcoming film as he recently debuted an odd new hairstyle.”
“Skarsgard is currently in Canada filming the movie The Hummingbird Project with co-stars Salma Hayek and Jesse Eisenberg.”
“He added the hashtag “#snitchesgetstitches.”Fans flooded the comments with wishes for a speedy recovery.”
“Their swift and heroic action saved my life,” he wrote.”
“#snitchesgetstitches A post shared by Rex Danger (@rexdanger) on Nov 23, 2017 at 9:53am PST“Today I give thanks to nurse Rosalie and doctor Taleb at the local hospital in Lachute, Quebec.”
“Their swift and heroic action saved my life.”


"The film, which is currently in production, is said to be about two high-frequency traders who make millions of dollars in cable trading against their former boss."
"He shook the sides of his normal blonde hair - but a shiny bald head at the top."
"Rex danger (@ rexdanger) posted a post at pdtskarsgard on October 24, 2017 at 11:45 a.m. last month's volez, voguez, voyagez exhibition in Louis Vuitton, which was hardly recognized on the red carpet of New York."
"Moonrise"
"The actor recently launched a strange new hairstyle for the first time, and it is estimated that he will have a new look in the upcoming film."
"Scarsgarde is currently working in Canada with Salma Hayek and Jesse Eisenberg on project hummingbird."
He added the label of "informant" and fans left messages, hoping to recover soon
"Their swift and heroic actions saved my life," he wrote
"Snitches gettitches Rex danger (@ rexdanger) posted a post at 9:53 AM Pacific Standard Time on November 23, 2017." today, I want to thank Rosalie, a nurse, and Taleb, a doctor at the local hospital in lakhout, Quebec. "
"Their swift and heroic action saved my life."



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And that is the whole story.””
“...her fellow cast members and reiterated that the decision to shake up the cast was a creative one...”
“It smacks of an old broken patriarchal notion that women must be pitted against each other and that one woman s success will be costly to others Vernoff goes on to note that front woman Pompeo has advocated passionately for...”
“That intimation “is wrong and hurtful and misguided,” Vernoff wrote.”
“...million per season for the next two years dictated the need to winnow the series ranks...”
“Hours after the news broke that Capshaw and Drew would be wrapping their respective runs as Arizona and April on ABC s top rated drama after Season 14 Vernoff tweeted her condemnation of speculation that Pompeo s new deal 10”
“Grey’s Anatomy showrunner Krista Vernoff is not here for your speculation that Ellen Pompeo’s recently trumpeted payday is to blame for the dismissal of longtime castmates Jessica Capshaw and Sarah Drew.”


"That's what happened."
“…… She and other members of the cast reiterated that the decision to reorganize the cast was very creative. "
"It's a bit like the old patriarchal idea that women have to compete with each other, and one woman's success will cost the other women," furnoff continued, noting that the heroine Pompeo had enthusiastically advocated
"This suggestion" is wrong, harmful and misleading, "vernoff wrote
"Over the next two years, a million dollars a quarter will determine the need to rank in the series..."
"Hours after the news that kapshaw and drew will end their respective performances in ABC's top 14 season TV series Arizona and April, furnoff tweeted to denounce speculation about Pompeo's new deal 10."
"Gray's anatomy presenter Krista furnoff is not here to speculate that Ellen Pompeo's recent promotion of payday is the culprit for the dismissal of longtime partners Jessica Capshaw and Sarah drew."



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related Stories:-Kris Jenner Basically Just Confirmed That Khloé Kardashian Gave Birth-Watch Khloé Kardashian Tell Her Entire Family She's Pregnant-Khloé Kardashian Producing a New Show About Killer Sisters Just Feels Right...”
“"At the end of the day, everybody wanna act like they date deacons and pastors and their relationship is perfect."”
“The good news came just days after news surfaced that Thompson, a Cleveland Cavaliers basketball player, was spotted kissing another woman while he was out at New York City rooftop bar.”
“The news went viral, and fans are finding creative ways to show their support.”
“Cardi B, however, has a message for all the fans and haters out there who have been making the relationship drama their primary business.”
“The rapper, who just revealed her own pregnancy and dropped her debut album, made an appearance on a radio show this week.”
“When the host asked for her thoughts on the rumors about Kardashian and Thompson, she dished out wisdom in her signature candid way.”
“"Do what your heart feel like doing," Cardi B said.”
“She also advised that the world let the couple handle things privately.”
“We just worked it out."”


"Related story: - Chris Jenner basically just confirmed that Carol Kardashian had a baby. It's good to watch Carol Kardashian tell her family she's pregnant. Carol Kardashian makes a new show about killer sisters..."
"At the end of the day, everyone wants to act like they're dating deacons and priests, and their relationship is perfect."
"The good news came a few days after Cleveland Cavaliers basketball player Thompson was found kissing another woman at a rooftop bar in New York City."
"The news is spreading wildly on the Internet, and fans are trying to show their support."
"However, caddy B has sent a message to all fans and detractors that they have always made love dramas their main business."
The rapper has just revealed that she is pregnant and has given up her debut album after appearing on a radio show this week
"When the host asked her what she thought of the rumors about Kardashian and Thompson, she spoke frankly about her insights."
"Do what you want to do in your heart," caddy said
"She also suggested that the world let the couple handle things in private."
"We just solved it."



Number  160
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...the joke particularly funny...”
“Is it Mr Robert DeNiro or is it the tall guy from True Blood DeNiro was nominated in the same category this year for his work in The Wizard of Lies and while Skarsgård probably meant the comment to be a self deprecating joke DeNiro didn t seem to find...”
“To add insult to injury, Skarsgård even manages to piss off veteran actor Robert DeNiro in the process, saying, “A lot of people have been talking about who the greatest male actor ever is.”
“You can watch his speech to see for yourself.”
“...for that actor to completely ignore the subject of abuse when he s acknowledged for the role...”
“While we certainly don t place any of Perry s actions onto the actor there is some cognitive dissonance in awarding a man for playing an abuser in a time when women are finally feeling emboldened enough to call out those who have abused them in real life and then...”
“Skarsgård plays Perry, an abusive husband in the HBO hit series, and in both his SAG Award acceptance speech and his acceptance speech for his Golden Globe he doesn’t mention domestic abuse once.”
“So it was a bit of a letdown to hear Alexander Skarsgård’s acceptance speech when he received his award for Outstanding Performance by a Male Actor in a Miniseries for his role in Big Little Lies.”
“And coming off the Women’s March just a couple days prior, we were all kind of riding that high of female empowerment in the face of adversity.”
“The 2018 SAG Awards were held last night, and though the focus on the #MeToo and #TimesUp movement wasn’t as acute as it was at the Golden Globes, the theme of righting wrongs in Hollywood was very much still there.”


“… This joke is very funny... "
"Is it Mr. Robert De Niro or the tall man in true blood? De Niro won the same category of nominations this year for his work in the wizard of lies, while scasgold's comment may be a self mocking joke. De Niro seems not to find out..."
"To make matters worse, scasgold even offended veteran actor Robert De Niro in the process." a lot of people have been talking about who is the greatest actor of all time, "he said
"You can see his speech in person."
“… When the actor was admitted to the role, he completely ignored the target of abuse... "
"Although we certainly won't blame the actors for any of Perry's actions, women finally feel brave enough to call out those who have abused them in real life, and then..." There is some cognitive dissonance in rewarding a man who plays the role of an abuser
"Scarsgarde plays an abusive husband Perry in the HBO hit drama. In his sag award speech and Golden Globe Award speech, he didn't mention domestic abuse once."
"So when Alexander scarsgarde won the actor's outstanding performance award in a mini play for his role in big lies and little lies, it was a bit disappointing to hear his acceptance speech."
"Just a few days ago, we just stepped out of the women's March. In adversity, we are all in control of the peak of women's empowerment."
"The 2018 sag awards ceremony was held last night. Although people's attention to the" metoo "and" timesup "movements is not as sharp as the Golden Globes, the theme of Hollywood correcting mistakes still exists."



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The “Minions” family of films has now grossed $3.528 billion worldwide, beating the five “Shrek” movies’ previous $3.51 billion record.”
““I promise that the money we raise together will go directly to the people who are living in that block.”Adele’s act of charity just so happens to coincide with the news that “Despicable Me” is officially the highest-grossing animated franchise of all time.”
““It’s been two weeks since the fire, and still the people who were affected by it are homeless,” she said in a pre-show video message.”
“Adele previously implored her fans to donate to her Grenfell Tower fund while performing at Wembley Stadium back in June.”
“A final death toll is not expected to be released until at least 2018, but around 255 people are said to have survived.”
“Firefighters originally warned occupants to remain in their apartments, but improper cladding caused the fourth floor fridge-freezer fire to alarmingly accelerate.”
“At least 80 people were killed when a fire broke out in the 24-story West London building on June 14.”
“...movie on Thursday...”
“While she s working hard behind the scenes to raise cash she wanted to treat residents to a night of fun and help take their minds off what happened and organised a private viewing of the brand new Despicable Me 3 movie Dozens of residents joined Adele for the animated...”
““Being a local Londoner, she’s made no secret about how personally affected she was by the Grenfell Tower blaze and wants to help in every way she can,” claims the source.”


"Now, the global box office of the" minions "series has reached $3.528 billion, surpassing the previous record of $3.51 billion for the five Shrek films."
"I promise that the money we raise together will go directly to the people who live on that block." Adele's charity just coincides with the news that "mean me" has officially become the highest box office animation series ever
"Two weeks after the fire, there are still people affected by the fire who are homeless," she said in a video message before the show
"Adele pleaded with her fans to donate money to her grenfeld tower foundation during her performance at Wembley Stadium in June this year."
"The final death toll is not expected to be released until at least 2018, but about 255 people are said to have survived."
"Firefighters originally warned residents to stay in the apartment, but due to improper covering, the fire in the refrigerator freezer on the fourth floor accelerated, which is worrying."
"On June 14, a fire broke out in a 24 story building in West London, killing at least 80 people."
“… Thursday's movie... "
"When she was trying to raise money behind the scenes, she wanted to let the residents enjoy a fun night and help them forget what happened. She also organized a private activity to watch the brand new" mean me 3 "movie, and dozens of residents joined Adele's animation performance..."
"As a local Londoner, she made no secret of how she was affected by the grenfeld building fire and wanted to do everything possible to help," the source said



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Most of the ones giving advice are in no place to give anything at all.””
“Image zoom Khloé Kardashian and Kanye West Credit Taylor Hill FilmMagic Rindoff Dufour Getty Images Surprising her fans Kardashian was caught listening to Swift s hit song Delicate on Friday even though her brother in law and sister Kim Kardashian West have had an infamously complicated relationship with the Grammy...”
“Ye fan...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Ye,” she wrote on Twitter, accompanied by multiple flame emojis.”
“She also gave a sweet shout-out to her siblings, writing, “I have the best sisters in the world!”
“I feel so blessed!!”
“Built in besties!!”
“I love you guys!!”
“Rob, you’re already my ACE for life!”


"Most people who give advice don't have a place to give any advice at all."
"Picture zooming Kardashian and Kanye West credit Taylor Hill film magician lindolf dufugetti picture surprised her fans Kardashian was found listening to Swift's hit song subtly on Friday, even though her brother-in-law and sister Kim Kardashian West have a notoriously complex relationship with Grammy..."
"Ye Fan..."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Yeah," she tweeted, with multiple expressions of flame
She also gave a sweet cry to her brothers and sisters and wrote, "I have the best sisters in the world!"
"I feel very lucky!"
"A natural friend!"
"I love you all!"
"Rob, you're my ace!"



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us in the “Comments” section below.”
“So, which attraction are you most excited to see when the land opens this June?”
“The entire land will serve as a visual celebration of toys, with Crayons, Cooties, Green Army Men, Rubik’s Cubes, Tinkertoys, and other familiar toys and game pieces incorporated into the land’s design.”
“Woody’s Lunch Box – actually, Andy’s lunch box that he’s set on its side – will serve up tasty meals and old-fashioned soda floats from a walk-up window setting.”
“Now expanded with a third track, the popular attraction will put even more guests in the action taking aim at 3D objects – using everything from baseballs to cream pies – in a variety of whimsical, fast-paced games.”
“Guests can also walk through a new carnival game box to experience Toy Story Mania!, which has been a guest-favorite attraction at the park since it opened in 2008.”
“Here, adorable little green aliens swirl about in their flying saucers with guests in tow in their rocket ship toys, while “The Claw” hangs overhead.”
“Families will also be able to take a spin on Alien Swirling Saucers, a galactic play set that Andy won from Pizza Planet.”
“(Check out the time-lapse video above of one of Slinky Dog Dash’s first test runs).”
“Here, guests can take a ride on Slinky Dog Dash, a roller coaster Andy has assembled from his Mega Coaster Play Kit and topped off with Slinky and Jessie.”


Please let us know in the comments section below
"So, which scenic spot do you want to see most when it opens in June this year?"
"The whole land will be used as a visual celebration of toys. Crayons, raccoons, green soldiers, Rubik's cube, Tinker's bell and other familiar toys and game pieces will be included in the design of the land."
"Woody's lunch box - in fact, Andy's lunch box is on the side - will serve delicious meals and old-fashioned soda, all of which float out of an approaching window."
"Now with the expansion of the third track, this popular attraction will allow more guests to participate in the action, aiming at 3D objects in all kinds of whimsical, fast-paced games - from baseball to cream pie."
"Guests can also experience the fanaticism of toy story through a new Carnival Game Box! Since its opening in 2008, it has been a favorite attraction for tourists. "
Here, lovely little green aliens spin in their flying saucer, guests are dragged by their rocket spaceship toys, and "claws" are hanging overhead
"Family can also spin on the alien spinning disc, which is a galaxy game Andy won from the planet of pizza."
"Please see the delay video of the first trial run of Slinky dog dash above."
"Here, guests can take the slinky dog sprint roller coaster, which Andy assembled with his super roller coaster game kit, and finally slinky and Jesse."



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#TeenMomOG.””
“Palin also has another child, a 9-year-old boy named Tripp, with her ex-fiancé Levi Johnston.”
“See the sweet photo of her hanging out with her Teen Mom OG costars for the first timeBristol Palin has the support of her new Teen Mom OG costars.”
“The mom of three, 27, recently joined Catelynn Lowell Baltierra, Amber Portwood, Maci Bookout McKinney and fellow new addition Cheyenne Floyd, for a night out.”
“Baltierra, 26, posted a group shot on her Instagram on Monday night, captioning it, “Nice meeting you ladies ❤️ welcome to the #TeenMomOG side .” She also tagged the other four women’s Instagram accounts.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The trailer for the new season of Teen Mom OG dropped on Monday and shows how Floyd, 25, and Palin are fitting into the series.”
“Palin’s storyline involves her ex-husband Dakota Meyer, whom she divorced earlier this year.”
“They have two daughters together: Sailor, 2 and Atlee, 1.”
“She gave birth to him when she was 18 and her mother was running for vice president.”


"Tienmog."
Palin has another child, a nine-year-old boy named Tripp, with her ex fiance levy Johnston
"This is the first time that Bristol Palin has been supported by the new mom og. She has seen a sweet picture of her with the partners of the young mom og."
The 27 year old mother of three recently went out for a night with katerin Lowell baltier, amber porterwood, Macy Booker McKinney and the new addition of Cheyenne Freud
Baltiella, 26, posted a set of photos on instagram on Monday night titled "nice to meet you ladies." ❤️  Welcome to teenmoog She also tagged four other women's instagram accounts
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The trailer for the new season of teenage mom og, which aired on Monday, shows how Freud and Palin, 25, fit into the series
"Palin's plot involves her ex husband Dakota Meyer, who divorced her earlier this year."
They have two daughters: a two-year-old sailor and a one-year-old atley
"She gave birth to him at 18, and her mother ran for vice president."



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Dr. Dubrow says if things don’t go quite right and nerves are damaged she could even lose all movement in her face…Botched airs Sundays at 9pm PT/ET on E!”
“Comments Box SVG icons Used for the like, share, comment, and reaction iconsBut the doctors caution her about the risks of doing more surgery and being left with an even bigger problem.”
“Shauna is seeking the doctors’ help because she feels her right cheek has been left too big.”
“She also recounts how in the black urban community, transgender people would rely on illegal silicone injections in their cheeks, breasts, and buttocks to get the feminized look they sought.”
“Watch the clip below as Shauna outlines how she got to where she is today, starting off with how she began using black market hormone therapy when she was just 14.”
“Injecting silicone destroys the underlying tissues by causing a severe inflammatory response and becomes a chronic problem.”They also warn against seeking any sort of surgery outside of the USA to save money, as doctors may not be as qualified and things can easily go wrong.”
“Dr. Nassif says: “Injecting anything permanent into any part of your body is a bad thing.”
“Sign up for our TV newsletter!”
“Her story horrifies Botched doctors Terry Dubrow and Paul Nassif, who explain in great detail how your tissue can break down and die when foreign substances are “pumped” into the soft tissue.”
“Shauna traveled all the way to Thailand to get the surgery on her cheekbones after doctors at home told her they wouldn’t do it due to the silicone in her cheeks.”


Dr. dubro said that if things don't go well and her nerves are damaged, she may even lose all her facial movements At 9 p.m. Sunday, 9 p.m. Eastern time, she'll be terrible! "
"The SVG icon in the comment box is used for" like "," share "," comment "and" reaction "icons, but the doctor reminded her that doing more surgery may cause more problems."
"Shawna is looking for the doctor's help because she thinks her right cheek is too big."
"She also tells how transgender people in black urban communities rely on illegal injections of silicone on their cheeks, breasts and buttocks to achieve the feminine image they seek."
"Take a look at the video below. Shawna started using black market hormone therapy when she was 14 years old. It outlines how she got to where she is today."
"Silicone injections can cause severe inflammation, which can damage the underlying tissue and become a chronic problem." They also warned against seeking any type of surgery outside the United States to save money, as doctors may not be qualified and are prone to problems
"It's a bad thing to inject anything permanent into any part of your body," Dr. nasif said
"Sign up for our TV news release!"
Her story scares poor doctors Terry dubro and Paul nasif, who explain in great detail how your tissue decomposes and dies when a foreign body is "pumped" into the soft tissue
"Shawna came all the way to Thailand for zygomatic surgery because the doctors at home told her that they would not do it because of the silicone on her cheek."



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We created something important and pure an no cancellation can take that away."”
“Unfortunately for her, it was announced that the show will not be returning for a second season.”
“The actress was spotted hanging out with Ryan Rottman.”
“As reported by E!”
“...the two stepped out to grab Starbucks.”
“Lucy stepped out wearing a casual attire.”
“The actress wore a pink top with blue jeans and paired it with the perfect summer sunglasses.”
“Meanwhile, Ryan opted for denim jeans with a washed out grey sweater.”
“While the pair seemed to enjoy their day out, they were spotted holding hands at a point in time.”
“The two have not yet commented on their relationship.”


"We have created something important and pure, and no cancellation can take it away."
"Unfortunately for her, there is news that the show will be on air in the second season."
"The actress was found with Ryan Rotman."
"According to e!"
“…… They came out to grab Starbucks. "
"Lucy came out in casual clothes."
"The actress wore a pink top with blue jeans and perfect summer sunglasses."
"At the same time, Ryan chose denim jeans with a washed old grey sweater."
"Although they seem to enjoy going out, some people find that they are holding hands at some point in time."
"The two have yet to comment on their relationship."



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He is survived by Jill, his three children from a previous relationship — Jonathan, David and Jennifer — and stepdaughter Ally.”
““Bobby’s not giving up but there’s not much fight left,” the insider added.”
““He never loses anything, never forgets anything and when I think he is wrong… he is always right!”An insider told Us Weekly in November 2017 that Bobby was “really fighting” as he encouraged his family to go about their daily routines.”
“Bobby is the most perfect man I know,” the 54-year-old reality TV star captioned a photo collage of them together.”
“Anniversary to the love of my life Bobby Zarin.”
““Happy 18th!”
““I wake up everyday now so grateful to see Bobby getting stronger.”The couple celebrated their 18th wedding anniversary earlier this month.”
““It’s been the most emotional time in our lives and couldn’t have gotten to where we are without help from many,” she captioned an Instagram pic that showed them out to dinner.”
“In November 2016, Jill revealed that the cancer had spread to his brain, but said in a statement at the time that they were determined to “remain strong.”She was hopeful after he left the hospital in August 2017 after undergoing chemotherapy.”
“Thank you, everyone, for all your love and support during this difficult time.”Bobby, the owner of Zarin Fabrics, beat thyroid cancer in 2009 but it returned in 2013 and spread to his lungs.”


He was born to Jill, his three children, Jonathan, David and Jennifer, and his stepdaughter, Ellie
"Bobbie didn't give up, but there wasn't much fighting left," the insider added
"He never loses anything, never forgets anything, when I think he is wrong He's always right! "! "In November 2017, an insider told us weekly that Bobbie was" really fighting "when he encouraged his family to carry on their daily life
"Bobbie is the perfect man I know," the 54 year old reality star wrote in a collage of photos of them together
"In memory of the love of my life, Bobbie zarin."
"Happy 18th!"
"Every day I wake up now, I'm happy to see that Bob is getting stronger and stronger." The couple celebrated their 18th wedding anniversary earlier this month
"It's the most exciting moment of our lives, and we couldn't have been where we are without the help of a lot of people," she wrote in an instagram photo showing their dinner
"In November 2016, Jill revealed that the cancer had spread to his brain, but said in a statement at the time that they were determined to" stay strong. ". In August 2017, he left the hospital after chemotherapy, and she was hopeful about that. "
"Thank you for your love and support in this difficult time." Zalin's boss, boby, beat thyroid cancer in 2009, but relapsed and spread to the lungs in 2013



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This came a day after Chloë shared an arty snap of the aspiring photographer, simply captioning it with a spade emoji.”
“Uploading the sweet snap, Brooklyn posted the picture with the caption 'Beautiful', adding a heart emoji.”
“But the fairy tale soon turned into a nightmare for Chloë Grace Moretz when she and Brooklyn Beckham split in 2016.”
“Speaking to Stellar on Sunday, the 20-year-old revealed just how hard it was to deal with a break-up so publicly.”
“'I felt like things were falling apart': Speaking to Stellar on Sunday, Chloë Grace Moretz (right) revealed just how hard it was to deal with her public split with Brooklyn Beckham (left)'I went through a hard year and I’m not going to hide that,' Chloë told the publication.”
“The actress added that her high visibility made it tough to handle the relationship falling apart.”
“'I had to deal with this new level of fame while I was growing up, I was getting out of a relationship and all of it was very public.”
“I wanted to hide,' Chloë explained.”
“I was getting out of a relationship and all of it was very public The actress explained she wanted to hide in the wake of the split I went through a hard year and I m not going to hide that Chloë credited those close to her with helping her...”
“...through the rough patch The Carrie star admitted that it was support and understanding from her family and friends that helped her navigate the tough times...”


"It was released the day before Chlo è shared an art photo with the aspiring photographer, just with a spade emoticon as the title."
"Brooklyn uploaded this sweet snapshot and posted a photo titled 'beautiful' with a heart-shaped expression."
"But the fairy tale soon turned into a nightmare for Chlo è grace Moretz, who broke up with Brooklyn Beckham in 2016."
"In an interview with Stella on Sunday, the 20-year-old revealed how difficult it is to deal with a breakup in such a public setting
"I feel like things are falling apart": in an interview with stellar on Sunday, clograce Moretz (right) revealed how difficult it was for her to break up with Brooklyn Beckham (left), "I've had a tough year and I won't hide that," cloy told the journal
"The actress added that her high profile made it difficult to deal with the break-up."
"As I grew up, I had to face this new fame, I was getting rid of a relationship, and it was very public."
"I want to hide," Chloe explained
"I just came out of a relationship and everything was very public. The actress explained that she wanted to hide after the break-up. I've had a hard year and I won't hide that Chloe owes it to the people around her who helped her..."
“… Through the bumpy patch, Carrie star admitted that it was the support and understanding from her family and friends that helped her through the difficult times... "



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Here is the Season 7B promo followed by Adams’ full statement:”
““I am eagerly awaiting the news of a pickup, and I’m optimistic it would happen,” Korsh told Deadline.”
“The network also officially confirmed the exits of original cast members Patrick J. Adams and Meghan Markle after the end of Season 7.”
“Primetime Panic Your Complete Guide to Pilots and Straight to Series orders See All Returning for Season 8 are fellow original cast members Gabriel Macht Harvey Specter Sarah Rafferty Donna Paulsen and Rick Hoffman Louis Litt joined by Dulé Hill Alex Williams who has been promoted to a series regular...”
“...after recurring this season...”
“USAThe remainder of Season 7 will premiere March 28, culminating in a two-hour season finale on Wednesday, April 25 – an arc in which Suits will bid farewell to characters Mike Ross (Adams) and Rachel Zane (Markle).”
“The arc, which also includes the planted Suits spinoff pilot starring Gina Torres in the season finale, is expected to feature the long-awaited Mike and Rachel wedding just a couple of weeks before Markle’s real-life nuptials to Prince Harry.”
“Mike Ross has taught me a lot about commitment hard work and the power of believing in yourself and I feel blessed that now we both get to walk out into the lives that we never dreamed we would actually be lucky enough to live Adams said in a statement...”
“...about his exit thanking colleagues and fans...”
“(you can read it in its entirety below the post.)”


"Here's the season 7b promo, followed by Adams's full statement:
"I'm eagerly waiting to hear from pickup, and I'm optimistic that will happen," colsh told deadline
"After the end of season 7, the network also officially confirmed the withdrawal of former actors Patrick J. Adams and Megan markel."
"Prime time panic for your pilot and direct to the complete guide to series orders to see all the original members returning to season 8 Gabriel Macht, Harvey Specter, Sara Flaherty, Donna Paulson and Rick Hoffman, louislit joining durahill, Alex Williams, who have been promoted to a series routine..."
“… After the season returns... "
The rest of season 7 premieres on March 28, culminating in a two-hour season finale on April 25 (Wednesday), when the suit will bid farewell to Mike Ross (Adams) and Rachel Zane (markel)
"Arc also includes a derivative pilot of a flocked suit starring Gina Torres in the season finale, which is expected to feature the long-awaited wedding of Mike and Rachel a few weeks before Marcel's actual wedding to Prince Harry."
"Mike Ross has taught me a lot about commitment, hard work and believing in my power, and I feel very lucky that now we are all able to live lives we never dreamed of," Adams said in a statement
“… Thanks to colleagues and fans for his quitting... "
"You can read it in its entirety at the bottom of the post."



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She also requested an additional $200,000 to go towards paying her attorney’s fees.”
“In April, Drake-Lee petitioned the court for $27,000 more in child support.”
“After five years of marriage, Williams filed for divorce in April 2017.”
“They first met while Williams was working as a teacher in New York.”
“At the time, they had been dating for over five years.”
“Image zoom Aryn Drake-Lee and Jesse Williams | Credit: Stefanie Keenan/GettyWilliams wed Drake-Lee, a real estate broker, in Los Angeles in September 2012.”
“The court ordered Williams to begin paying Drake-Law $50,629 in child support — the first half due on July 1 and the second on July 15.”
“However, after a forensic accountant combed through his earnings and assets it was deemed that he had an ‘extraordinarily high income’ with the Grey’s Anatomy star earning more than $521,000 a month.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Williams, who is already paying his estranged wife Aryn Drake-Lee $50,695 per month in spousal support, had asked the court to reduce the money he contributes towards the care of their children, Maceo, who is almost 3, and Sadie Williams, 4, according to court documents obtained by PEOPLE.”


"She also asked for an additional $200000 to pay for lawyers' fees."
"In April, Drake Lee applied to the court for an additional $27000 in child support."
"After five years of marriage, Williams filed for divorce in April 2017."
"The first time they met was when Williams was a teacher in New York."
"At that time, they had been dating for more than five years."
Photo: in September 2012, yalene Drake Lee and Jesse Williams married in Los Angeles
"The court ordered Williams to start paying Drake law $50629 in child support - the first part due on July 1, and the second part due on July 15."
"However, after a forensic accountant carefully examined his income and assets, people thought he had a" very high income ", and the star of Gray's anatomy made more than $521000 a month."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"According to court documents obtained by people familiar with the matter, Williams has paid $50695 a month in alimony to his separated wife, Arlene Drake Lee, and asked the court to reduce the amount of money he donated to take care of his children, Marcio, nearly 3, and Sadie Williams, 4."



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He’s absolutely an amazing man.”
“News,“John is the love of my life.”
“Their wedding was scheduled for May 5, but the pair announced their breakup on April 15.”
“But then, Cena apparently changed his mind on the whole marriage thing and proposed to Bella at WrestleMania in 2017.”
“Bella hoped to wed and have kids with Cena, whereas Cena wasn't on board with either.”
“Cena and Bella began dating in 2012, and as Total Divas and Total Bellas fans know all too well, the topics of marriage and children were recurring issues in their relationship.”
“Oof, how's that for crummy timing.”
“But now they may finally be on the same page about kids but also broken up?”
“Many speculate that this failure to see eye to eye might've fueled their breakup.”
“...reality shows, and the WWE power couple never seemed to get to the same page.”


"He's definitely a great man."
News, "John is the love of my life."
"Their wedding was originally scheduled for May 5, but they broke up on April 15."
"But then, senna obviously changed his view of the whole marriage and proposed to Bella at the 2017 wrestling competition."
"Bella wants to marry senna and have children, and Senna is not here."
"Seine and Bella have been dating since 2012. As fans of total divas and total Bellas are very clear, the topic of marriage and children is a recurring problem in their relationship."
"Oh, this is a bad time."
"But now they may finally agree on the issue of children, but they have also broken up?"
"Many people speculate that this disagreement may have contributed to their breakup."
“… Reality shows, and WWE's power couple never seem to reach the same page. "



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...the life man better than a cruise...”
“She also added Star Wars and Wonder Woman just rock Prince got to meet Gadot a couple of days ago at the Academy of Motion Picture Arts and Sciences Governors Awards in L A She even took to Instagram to share the exciting rendezvous adding the sweet caption This is...”
“I got to meet Elle Fanning.”
“Oh, Helen Mirren!”
““I met Gary Oldman, I met Zachary Quinto, I met Emma Roberts, I met… what’s her name?”
““I was just thinking about some of the celebrities I’ve met,” she said.”
“Brooklyn has an entire bucket list of starts that she would like to meet.”
“The young actress revealed in a recent interview with ET that she’s been dying to meet the Wonder Woman star.”
“7-year-old actress Brooklyn Prince had her wish come true when she met Gadot on Saturday during the 2017 Governors Awards.”
“Gal Gadot proves again that she’s a real life wonder woman!”


“… Life is better than a cruise... "
"She also added Star Wars and wonder woman. The rock prince met with gado at the Academy of film arts and Sciences governor's award in Los Angeles a few days ago. She even shared this exciting date on instagram and added the sweet subtitle" this is... "
"I'm going to see al fanning."
"Oh, Helen Mirren!"
"I met Gary Oldman, I met Zachary kunto, I met Emma Roberts, I met What's her name
"I was just thinking about some celebrities I met," she said
"Brooklyn has a lot of new people she wants to meet."
"The young actress recently revealed in an interview with et that she has always been eager to see the wonder actress."
"The 7-year-old actress Brooklyn Prince's wish came true when she met more than one at the 2017 governors awards on Saturday."
"Gail gado proved once again that she was a real miracle of life!"



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kensington Palace has been contacted for comment.”
“The reports come after Meghan and Prince Harry were notably absent from the royal Easter Sunday church service at St George's Chapel in Windsor.”
“The bride-to-be is said to have left London in secret last Thursday to spend a few nights with her mother, Doria Ragland, at her home.”
“According to Good Morning America royal correspondent Omid Scobie, the mother and daughter spent time discussing wedding plans - six weeks ahead of the royal nuptials.”
“Scobie said Meghan, 36, arrived 'equipped with sketches from the wedding and of the wedding dress itself, so she could really give her mom some insight on how the big day will look'.”
“Close bond: Meghan Markle, 36, is said to have left London in secret on Thursday to spend a few nights with her mother, Doria Ragland, at home in Los AngelesIroning out the details: The bride-to-be reportedly jetted over to show her mother sketches of her wedding dress.”
“Pictured, Meghan with Harry in Northern Ireland last monthIt is understood Meghan has since returned to London.”
“Doria, a yoga instructor, was spotted outside her Los Angeles home on Monday but Meghan was not present.”
“The service was attended by senior royals including the Queen, the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge, Princesses Beatrice and Eugenie, and the Wessexes.”
“Palace aides have already said that the prince and Markle’s wedding will 'reflect their characters and personalities' and be a moment of 'fun and joy.'”


"Kensington Palace was contacted for comment."
"The reports came after Megan and Prince Harry were absent from the Royal Easter Sunday church service at St. George's chapel in Windsor."
"It is said that the bride to be left London secretly last Thursday and spent several nights at home with her mother, Doria Raglan."
"According to good morning, royal correspondent Omid Scobie, the mother and daughter spent time discussing wedding plans - six weeks ahead of the royal wedding."
"Scobie said Megan, 36, came with a sketch of the wedding and the wedding dress itself, so she could really give her mother some ideas about big days."
"Intimacy: Meghan Markle, 36, is said to have left London secretly on Thursday to spend several nights at her Los Angeles home with her mother, Doria ragland, detailing the following details: the bride to be is reported to have flown in a jet to show her mother a sketch of her wedding dress."
"The picture shows Megan and Harry in Northern Ireland last month. It is reported that Megan has returned to London since then."
"On Monday, people found Yoga coach Doria in front of their Los Angeles home, but Megan wasn't there."
The queen, the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge, Princess Beatrice and Princess Eugenie, and the Westminster couple attended the ceremony
"Palace aides have said that the wedding of the prince and Marcel will" reflect their character and personality "and will be a" time of fun and joy. "



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...behind the scenes...”
“But there was a lot more to the Royal Wedding than all of that and thanks to social media and the high profile guests who attended the wedding we got a tiny extra insight to what the day was like...”
“...shared their first kiss outside St George s Chapel...”
“We witnessed the bride travelling to Windsor Castle we saw her walk down the aisle we caught a glimpse of Harry s face when he first saw his wife to be and we were all watery eyed as the newlyweds...”
“We may not have been invited to the Royal Wedding, but we certainly got to see a lot of it thanks to Harry and Meghan agreeing to their special day being broadcast all around the world.”


“…… Behind the scenes... "
"But the significance of the royal wedding is much more than that. Thanks to social media and well-known guests attending the wedding, we have a little understanding of the situation on that day..."
“… Share their first kiss outside St. George's Church... "
"We saw the bride go to Windsor Castle, we saw her walking down the aisle, we glimpsed Harry's face, and when he saw his wife for the first time, we all burst into tears like newlyweds..."
"We may not have been invited to the royal wedding, but we've certainly seen a lot, thanks to Harry and Megan for allowing their special day to be broadcast around the world."



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“As she told PEOPLE Editor-in-Chief Jess Cagle, her 2011 hit single “On the Floor” was motivated by her two children.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Watch Jennifer Lopez Tear Up Remembering Her Twins Being BornA major musical inspiration for Lopez continues to be her twins.”
“They shared the stage in New York City in August, and even shared a kiss after Lopez presented Anthony the Latin Recording Academy’s Person of the Year award at November’s Latin Grammys.”
“The couple split in in July 2011, after seven years of marriage, but have remained close since their divorce was finalized in June 2014.”
“They dated for just six months before getting married — though first met as friends in 1998 when Anthony was starring in Broadway’s The Capeman.”
“!” Lopez captioned the shot — adding the hashtags “#weinthistogether,” “#mylilcoconuts,” and “#styleon1000.”Their style surely was on 1,000 — as in, “a thousand percent from mom and dad’s closet.”Lopez and Anthony tied the knot in a secret ceremony in June 2004 at Lopez’s home in Beverly Hills.”
“Image zoom“They wanted to come support mama on her first show back in Vegas!”
“Her brother, Max, was by her side — look posing with double peace signs while wearing a crisp black shirt and grey jeans patterned with black skulls and crossbones.”
“Her brunette locks pulled back in a tight ponytail — she served fierce JLo diva-face while sitting on a white couch.”
“Emme wore a black fur jacket with black leather leggings and gold-toed black boots.”


"As she told people editor in chief Jess Cagle, her 2011 hit single on the floor was driven by her two children."
"Related video: Jennifer Lopez was in tears when she recalled that her twin was Borna. Lopez's main musical inspiration is still her twins
In August, they performed together in New York, even kissing each other after Lopez presented Anthony with the Latin Conservatory's person of the year award at the Latin Grammy Awards in November
"The two broke up in July 2011 after seven years of marriage, but have been close since the divorce was finalized in June 2014."
"They dated only six months before they got married - although they first met in 1998, when Anthony starred in Broadway's capman."
"! Lopez tagged the photo with" # weinthistogethers "," # mylilcconauts "and" # styleon1000 ". Their style must be on 1000, such as "one thousandth of mom and dad's Wardrobe". In June 2004, Lopez and Anthony held a secret wedding at their home in Beverly Hills
"Image zooming" they want to support mom's first performance in Las Vegas
Her brother max, wearing a black shirt and gray jeans with black skulls and cross bones, stood beside her in a peaceful posture
"Her dark brown hair is in a tight ponytail - she's sitting on a white sofa with a ferocious JLO Queen's face on her face."
"Amy is wearing a black leather jacket with black leather tights and gold toed black boots."



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But it didn’t matter.”
“The clothes were heinous.”
“It says you know who you are, what you want to project, and that you’ve managed to reduce it all to a single navy/latex/whatever exclamation mark.”
“And yes, I do know that “a uniform” is the holy grail of modern style.”
“It’s a lifelong learning curve – and it can’t be done without an injection of fashion.”
“It’s a talent.”
“It’s a lifelong learning curveBeing well-dressed is a discipline.”
“Being well-dressed is a discipline.”
“Given that no one is exempt from having to get dressed most days, I – we – might as well do it to the best of our abilities, whatever our DOB.”
“I think I realised this when my daughter, now 21, and her friends were dressing in clothes they’d bought by weight from Brick Lane Market.”
“And muddle – the natural habitat of the young.”


"But it doesn't matter."
"The clothes are too dirty."
"It says you know who you are and what you want to project, and you've managed to reduce it to a Navy / Latex / any exclamation point."
"Yes, I know uniform is the Holy Grail of modern style."
"It's a lifelong learning curve - it can't be done without fashion injection."
"It's a genius."
"It's a lifelong study, and dressing well is a discipline."
"Dressing well is a discipline."
"Considering that most of the time no one can do without clothes, I - we - might as well do our best, no matter what kind of children we are."
"I think I realized that when my 21-year-old daughter and her friends were wearing clothes from the Brick Lane market."
"And muddle through - a natural habitat for young people."



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That they won’t be catcalled when they walk down the streets.”
“Before Kai was killed, he told Ally, "You symbolize the hope that women will one day win an argument with their husbands.”
“The finale, titled "Great Again," also came full circle as the women of the cult came out successful — unlike Trump vs. Clinton — in their resistance.”
“In order to accomplish that, Peters morphed into five real-life cult leaders — Charles Manson, Jim Jones, David Koresh, Marshall Applewhite and Andy Warhol — to hammer home Murphy's point of how a man, like Donald Trump, can rise within a disenfranchised community.”
“This season documented Kai Anderson's (Peters) rise from a basement-dwelling Trump supporter to a small-town cult leader to a candidate for Michigan's open Senate seat.”
“Now, it's horrible what's happening, but it's a good thing that women are getting their power back."”
“And when filming the ending, at the time it did feel relevant.”
“"The writers were ahead of the curve with the riots in Charlottesville [Va.], something Ryan has talked about.”
“"The writers have their finger on the pulse of what’s going on," star Evan Peters tells THR about Cult delivering a provocative and timely ending, instead of a thematic one.”
“Roanoke doubled down on Murphy's promise with its AHS mythology nods, but now that the finale of Cult has come and gone: Did the election throw a wrench into Murphy's plans for the larger universe?”


"They don't get called by cats when they walk in the street."
Before Kay was killed, he said to Ellie, "you symbolize the hope that one day a woman will win a quarrel with her husband."
"The finale of this film, called" once again great ", also goes around, because the women worshipped succeed in resistance - unlike trump and Clinton."
"In order to achieve this goal, Peters transformed into five real-life cult leaders - Charles Manson, Jim Jones, David Kresh, Marshall appwhite and Andy Warhol - to confirm Murphy's view on how people like Donald Trump rise in a disenfranchised community."
"This season records Kai Anderson (Peters) from a trump supporter living in the basement to a cult leader in a small town to a candidate for the open seat in the Michigan Senate."
"Now, what's happening is terrible, but it's a good thing that women regain power."
"At the end of the shooting, I really felt that there was a connection."
"The writers got ahead of the riots in Charlottesville, Virginia, which Ryan talked about."
"The writers know the pulse of what's going on, not a thematic ending, but a provocative, timely ending," star Evan Peters told the times
Roanoke doubled his commitment to Murphy with his mythical nod, but now the end of the cult has come and gone: has the election affected Murphy's plan for the universe



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Updated with a quote from Depp's attorney.”
“TMG also claims Depp's "army of attorneys" has bailed him out of legal crises and made a series of "hush money settlements" — details of which they promise will be revealed during trial.”
“Johnny Depp's former business managers aren't taking his recent comments about their dispute lightly — and they have escalated their claims against the actor in an amended complaint.”
“The legal battle between Depp and The Management Group's Joel and Robert Mandel began in January, when the actor sued his former business managers for fraud.”
“TMG fired back, saying the actor's financial woes are all his own.”
“TMG says Depp's sense of entitlement is "clear and epic," as evidenced by his recent interview with The Wall Street Journal — in which he said, “It's my money.”
“If I want to buy 15,000 cotton balls a day, it's my thing."”
“"Depp listened to no one, including TMG and his other advisors, and he demanded they fund a lifestyle that was extravagant and extreme," writes attorney Michael Kump in the amended complaint filed Monday.”
“"Ultimately, Depp and/or his sister and personal manager, Elisa Christie Dembrowski, knowingly approved all of Depp's expenditures."”
“Cited among the purchases are 14 residences, 45 luxury vehicles, 70 collectible guitars and enough Hollywood memorabilia to fill 12 storage facilities.”


"Updated in Depp's words."
TMG also claimed that Depp's "lawyer army" had rescued him from the legal crisis and carried out a series of "seal fee settlements" - they promised that details would be disclosed in the trial
"Johnny Depp's former business managers did not take his recent comments on their dispute lightly. They put higher demands on the actor in a revised complaint."
"The legal battle between Depp and management group's Joel and Robert Mandel began in January, when the actor charged his former business manager with fraud."
"TMG retorts that the actor's financial troubles are all his own."
TMG said Depp's sense of power is "clear and epic," and in a recent interview with the Wall Street Journal, he said, "this is my money."
"If I want to buy 15000 cotton balls a day, it's my business."
"Depp did not listen to anyone, including TMG and his other advisers, who asked them to fund extravagant and extreme lifestyles," lawyer Michael Kump wrote in an amended complaint filed on Monday
"In the end, Depp and / or his sister and personal manager, Eliza Christie dembevsky, knowingly approved all of Depp's expenses."
According to reports, the purchase includes 14 homes, 45 luxury cars, 70 collectable guitars and enough Hollywood souvenirs for 12 storerooms



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s an attempt to add a new spin on the proceedings, but a) what is Dirty Dancing: The Musical?”
“Johnny wistfully tells her to keep dancing and watches her go.”
“Johnny Castle still has an impressive record collection, but we rarely see him make use of a turntable.”
“...ve Had The Time of My Life are now sung by the characters and the Kellerman band...”
“Some new songs find their way in with Debra Messing and Bruce Greenwood each taking their turn on They Can t Take that Away from Me and Katey Sagal delivering her rendition of Fever More notably many of the classic numbers from the original film including the finale track I”
“(Despite the fact that a stage musical production of Dirty Dancing exists, this is the most traditional musical version to date; in the stage show, the actors primarily dance to prerecorded tracks and don’t sing).”
“This update takes it one step further and has characters actually sing their numbers.”
“It skillfully employed musical montage, using well-edited sequences set to “Wipeout” and “Hey Baby” to lead the audience through Baby’s dance lessons.”
“The original film featured musical sequences, with its chart-topping soundtrack underscoring many key moments and the titular dance numbers dominating the storytelling.”
“Image zoom Credit: Everett Collection/ Guy D'Alema/ABCA musical!”


"It's an attempt to add a new spin program, but a) what's Dirty Dancing: musicals?"
"Johnny eagerly told her to keep dancing and watch her go."
"Johnny castle's record collection is still impressive, but we rarely see him using turntables."
“…… The happiest times of my life are now being sung by the Kellerman band and the characters... "
"With Debra messaging and Bruce Greenwood singing their own songs, some new songs became popular. They can't erase that from me and Katey Sagal, who sang "fever." what's more, many of the classic numbers come from the original movie, including the last track "I."
"Despite the existence of dirty dances produced by stage music, this is the most traditional version of music to date; in stage performances, actors mainly dance according to pre recorded tracks instead of singing."
"This update goes a step further, allowing the characters to actually sing their numbers."
It skillfully uses music montage, using carefully edited sequences of "annihilation" and "Hey baby" to guide the audience through baby's dance lessons
"The original film features music sequence, and its music score is at the top of the list, highlighting many critical moments, while the real dance numbers dominate the story telling."
Credit for image zooming: Everett collection / guy dalema / abka musical



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That did not stop Kim from sharing photos of her new look, however, as she continued to share several sultry looks with them on Monday.”
“Kim they are called CORN ROWS.'”
“But Kim Kardashian proved that she could be one of the Mean Girls.”
“The 37-year-old reality star took to Instagram to throw some shade at the 31-year-old actress after a comment about Kim's new braids.”
“The Keeping Up With The Kardashians star took aim and Lindsay for the bizarre accent she had began using after a trip to Europe in 2016.”
“Face off: Kim Kardashian took to Instagram to throw shade at Lindsay Lohan after a comment about her new braidsOuch: The social media feud began when Perez Hilton shared a snap of Kim's new braided locks with the caption: 'Kim K's new look.”
“Thoughts????'”
“Kim pulled no punches as she wrote: '@lindsaylohan you know what's confusing.....your sudden foreign accent.'”
“The social media feud began when Perez Hilton shared a snap of Kim's new braided locks with the caption: 'Kim K's new look.”


However, this did not prevent Jin Yan'er from sharing photos of her new look, as she continued to share some sexy looks with them on Monday
"They call it corn chops."
"But Kim Kardashian proved that she could be a mean girl."
"After commenting on Kim Jong Il's new braids, the 37 year old reality star cast some shadows on instagram over the 31 year old actress."
"The star of" keep up with Kardashian "is targeting Lindsay because she started using a strange accent after her trip to Europe in 2016."
"Confrontation: after commenting on Lindsay Lohan's new braid, Kim Kardashian casts a shadow on instagram: the social media feud begins when Perez Hilton shares a snapshot of Kim's new braid with the title:" Kim K's new look. "
"Ideas?"
"Kim wrote without hesitation: @ LindsayLohan, you know what's confusing Your sudden foreign accent. "
"The social media controversy began when Perez Hilton shared a snapshot of Kim Jong Il's new braid, titled 'Kim K's new face'"



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ https://t.co/UQAhEL5iRH pic.twitter.com/1PdMEj0NPV — NBC Olympics (@NBCOlympics) February 16, 201823-year-old Yung Sungbin build up a big enough lead in men’s skeleton that his final run was essentially a victory lap, and the home crowd went nuts for him.”
“"Ironman" Yun Sung-Bin just made history.”
“Chris Mazdzer winning Team USA’s first-ever men’s singles luge medalChris @Mazdzer makes history with the first men’s singles luge medal for @TeamUSA, bringing home the #Silver!”
“#WinterOlympics https://t.co/NsNuy9F46h pic.twitter.com/jCMTb4LtXv — NBC Olympics (@NBCOlympics) February 12, 20188.”
“You just witnessed a historic triple axel from Mirai Nagasu.”
“"HOLY COW!"”
“...run...”
“WinterOlympics BestOfUS https t co a8E2Sv9O2T pic twitter com XZZk0PCVqm NBC Olympics NBCOlympics February 11 2018 Gerard wasn t one of the favorites to win men s slopestyle but just like Sage Kotsenburg did four years ago in Sochi Gerard stormed to the top of the podium with a stellar...”
“17-year-old Red Gerard gave Team USA its first gold medal of 2018.”
“This run was golden!”


“  https://t.co/UQAhEL5iRHpic.twitter.com/1PdMEj0NPV-NBC  Olymps (@ NBC olymps) on February 16, 201823, Rong Shangbin, 23, established a big enough lead in the men's skeleton. His last run was basically a victory circle, and the home audience was crazy for him. "
"Iron Man" Yin Chengbin has just made history
"Chris Mazel won the first men's singles sled medal in the history of the U.S. team, and won the first men's singles sled medal for @ teamusa, making history!"
"Winter Olympics https://t.co/NsNuy9F46hpic.twitter.com/jCMTb4LtXv-NBC The Olympic Games (@ NBC Olympic Games) 12 February 2018. "
"You've just witnessed a historic Trident from Miley bearded."
"My God!"
“… Run... "
"In the Winter Olympics, baystows, HTTPS t Co a8e2sv9o2t pic twitter com xzzk0pcvqm NBC Olympics NBC Olympics February 11, 2018, Gerrard is not one of the most popular players to win the men's skiing championship, but just like Sacchi kosenberg did in Sochi four years ago, Gerrard rushed to the podium with a dazzling light..."
"17-year-old red Gerrard won the first gold medal for the United States in 2018."
"Good run this time!"



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"This message is just an opportunity for you to know my heart, I'm not expecting anyone to understand, but I do want people to have an opportunity to know where I am coming from!"”
“The 23-year-old “Sorry” singer wasn’t choreographing to his own music, though.”
“In two separate videos, the Biebs spun and flipped to Ed Sheeran’s “Perfect.”The slow, romantic tune doesn’t exactly lend itself to any extreme moves, but Bieber looked very passionate as he tried out his interpretive moves.”
““I’m gonna get this dance thing down,” he captioned one of the clips.”
“Back in August, Bieber cancelled the remaining 12 dates of his Purpose tour, penning a heartfelt message to his fans.”
“"Me taking this time right now is me saying I want to be SUSTAINABLE..”
“I want my career to be sustainable, but I also want my mind heart and soul to be sustainable.”
“So that I can be the man I want to be, the husband I eventually want to be and the father I want to be," he wrote.”
“Two months later, Bieber and his on-again, off-again girlfriend, Selena Gomez, reunited and have been going strong ever since.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"This message is just an opportunity for you to understand my heart. I don't expect anyone to understand it, but I do hope people will have a chance to know where I come from!"
"However, the 23-year-old" I'm sorry "singer didn't arrange it according to his own music."
In two separate videos, Bieber spins and flips to ED Sheeran's "perfection.". Slow, romantic tunes are not suitable for any extreme action, but Bieber is very enthusiastic when he tries to interpret the action
"I'm going to get this dancing thing off," he wrote in the title of one of the clips
"As early as August, Bieber cancelled the remaining 12 dates of his target tour and wrote a heartfelt letter to his fans."
"I'm taking this time to say that I want sustainable development..."
"I want my career to last, but I also want my heart and soul to last."
"So I can be the man I want to be, the husband I eventually want to be, the father I want to be," he wrote
"Two months later, Bieber and his intermittent girlfriend, Selena Gomez, met again and became strong."



Number  183
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““This worked out very well and helped her get into character.”Image zoom Credit: Photographed by Albert Watson/ 2019 Pirelli CalendarGarner played the role of a “botanical photographer who dreams of putting on successful exhibitions.” And Watson remarked that Garner got “straight into character” during their time on set.”
“Image zoom Credit: Photographed by Albert Watson/ 2019 Pirelli CalendarFor Hadid’s part, she played a woman who just broke up with her companion (don’t worry — IRL she’s still with Zayn Malik).”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The 46th edition of the calendar was shot by Albert Watson and meant to look like film stills.”
““Each character has a part to play in the 2019 Pirelli Calendar,” Watson explained.”
““In some cases, the role was close to what the actress does for a living, but here they were certainly all acting a part.”
“Not themselves.”
“And that’s what I wanted.”The theme of the collection is titled “dreams” because each woman is focused on their future in the stills.”
““The basic idea behind the whole project is that of telling a story in four ‘little movies,'” Watson said.”
““She has a confidant, not a boyfriend, played by the designer Alexander Wang,” said Watson.”


"It's a good solution to the problem and helps her get into the role." Photo zooming credit: Albert Watson filmed / Pirelli calendar 2019. Ghana played the role of a "plant photographer who dreams of a successful exhibition". Watson said Ghana "went straight into the character" during the filming
"Image zooming credit: Albert Watson / Pirelli filmed Hadid in 2019, playing a woman who just broke up with her partner (don't worry, she's still with Zane Malik."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The 46th edition of the calendar was shot by Albert Watson to look like a movie still."
"On the Pirelli calendar in 2019, each character has its own character," Watson explained
"In some cases, the role is close to the way actresses make a living, but here, they are definitely playing a role."
"Not themselves."
"That's what I want." The theme of this series is "Dreams" because every woman focuses on her future in still life
"The basic idea behind the whole project is to tell a story in four 'little movies'," Watson said
"She has a confidant, not a boyfriend, played by designer Alexander king," Watson said



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The asymmetrical sunglasses and the “B” ring are some of our favorite accessories from the tour.”
“It is clear that a lot of detail was paid to the off-the-shoulder catsuit which was accented with a flowing train.”
“The high-power entertainment couple trailed through Europe and North America producing visually-stunning performances filled with personal moments and endless hits.”
“For her second co-headlining tour, Beyoncé took her costumes to the next level recruiting custom designs from Mugler, Vivienne Westwood and Versace.”
“In addition to her signature bodysuits and thigh-high boots, stylist Marni Senofante incorporated hats and masks to truly dazzle the crowd.”
“We’ve rounded up our favorite style moments from the unforgettable OTR II tour.”
“Read on below and let us know your top picks.”
“Olivier Rousteing was recruited to create an iridescent costume complete with leggy boots and a windbreaker to match.”
“The two recently collaborated on a capsule inspired by her Coachella 2018 performance where she sported a bejeweled hoodie with custom graphics.”
“This look set the standard for the rest to come.”


"Asymmetrical sunglasses and 'B' rings are some of our favorite accessories on tour."
"Obviously, there's a lot of detail in this off the shoulder Leotard, and this leotard has flowing lines."
"This super entertainment couple performed brilliantly in Europe and North America, full of personal moments and endless hits."
"In her second joint lead tour, Beyonce took her dress to a new level, recruiting custom designs from Muller, Vivian Westwood and Versace."
"In addition to her signature jumpsuit and high boots, stylist Marni senofate has also incorporated hats and masks into it to really dazzle the audience."
"We summed up our favorite fashion moments from the unforgettable OTR II tour."
"Please read on to let us know your best choice."
"Olivier Rothstein was recruited to design a rainbow dress with boots and windbreaker."
"The two recently collaborated on a capsule inspired by her performance at Coachella in 2018, where she displayed a jewelry hoodie with a custom pattern."
"This shape sets the standard for the rest of the rest."



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Cast your vote now!”
“It’s all up to you now, which of Adele’s costumes is going to be your next Halloween dress-up inspiration?”
“We love you!”
“The effortless queen of song, Dolly Parton!”
“Kate Winslet would be proud!”
“PhotosAdele’s Celebrity Grammy FriendsInstagramI’ll never let go, Jack:We don’t know if it’s the dress or Adele’s perfect curled hairstyle in these photos, but she nailed the Titanic character.”
“Take a few pointers from Adele AKA the costume queen and vote for her best dress-up look ever in the poll below!”
“We know it’s not Halloween, but it’s never too early to start thinking about your next costume.”
“She really knows what to do when it comes to getting into character and we’re obsessed with each and every costume.”
“She’s made herself into real-life stars like Dolly Parton over the last few years and channeled her inner old lady as well.”


"Vote now!"
"Now it's up to you. Which costume of Adele will be the inspiration for your next Halloween costume?"
"We love you!"
"Easy queen, Dolly Parton!"
"Kate Winslet will be very proud!"
"Stagrami, a Grammy celebrity friend of photosadele, will never let go. Jack: we don't know. I don't know if it's a skirt or Adele's perfect curly hair in these photos, but she's pinning the Titanic character
"Get some advice from Adele, the dress queen, and vote for the best dress she's ever had
"We know it's not Halloween, but it's never too early to start thinking about your next outfit."
"She really knows what to do when she's in a role, and we're fascinated by every costume."
"In the past few years, she has turned herself into a real-life star, such as Dolly Parton, and at the same time, she has also groomed the old lady in her heart."



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Eagles won the Super Bowl.”CNN has reached out to Hart for additional comment.”
““Trying to go on stage with the trophy definitely” is one of the “stupidest things I’ve ever done but who cares?”
“For his part, Hart explained in an Instagram video posted Monday that he was “tipsy.”“You know when alcohol is in your system you do dumb stuff,” Hart said.”
“Footage of the moment quickly went viral and fans had a laugh about it on social media, some noting the actor’s small stature as he reportedly is 5 feet 4 inches tall.”
“But the “Jumanji” star received the most attention from social media after security denied his attempt to join the champion Eagles on stage for the trophy presentation.”
“Things went left and Hart ended up dropping an F-bomb live on national TV, before escorting himself off the set.”
“So happy that Hart crashed a post-game NFL Network interview with an Eagles player.”
“The comedic actor was super happy that the Philadelphia Eagles pulled off a win.”
“Hart, who is a native of Philadelphia, seems to have gotten his party on at Super Bowl LII.”
“Funnyman actor Kevin Hart provided some comic relief at the Super Bowl – but he was laughed at more than laughed with.”


"The eagles won the super bowl." CNN has contacted hart for more comment
"Coming on stage with a trophy" is definitely "one of the stupidest things I've ever done, but who cares?"
Hart explained in an instagram video released on Monday that he was "drunk." "You know, when you have alcohol in your body, you do stupid things," Hart said
"The footage of this moment quickly became popular, and fans laughed at it on social media. It was noticed that the actor was short, and he was reported to be 5 feet 4 inches tall."
"But the star, Zhu Manji, received the most attention from social media after security denied that he was trying to join the champion eagles to show off the trophy."
"It's not over. Hart broadcast a hydrogen bomb live on state television before escorting himself out of the set."
"I'm glad Hart gave an NFL interview to an eagles player after the game."
"The comedian is very happy that the Philadelphia Eagles have won."
Hart is from Philadelphia. He seems to have a party in the super bowl
"Comedian Kevin Hart offered some comic consolation at the Super Bowl - but he was ridiculed more than he was ridiculed."



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“News points out, Polanco has previously spoken about her daughter in Latina magazine, describing her as a “miracle baby.”While we thought there might be some relation between the two when we saw the scene, we still can’t quite get over just how much they look alike.”
“In fact, as E!”
“The 34-year-old actor gave birth to her daughter when she was 18 years old.”
“While Dascha might not look old enough to have a 15-year-old daughter, she does.”
“BLOWN.”
“...falseMIND.”
“After some digging, a Twitter user discovered that the actor who played the young Daya is, in fact, Polanco’s 15-year-old daughter, Dasany Kristal Gonzalez!”
“However, some clever internet sleuths put on their detective hats and fired up their little grey cells (or, you know, google) in an attempt to figure out whether the resemblance could be a familial one.”
“The flashback gave us a peek at 14-year-old Daya, and goodness the resemblance to Polanco was uncanny.”
“During the eighth episode of the season, we got even more insight into Daya’s relationship with her mother, Aleida, played by Elizabeth Rodriguez.”


According to the news, polako had previously talked about her daughter in Latin America magazine, describing her as a "miracle baby". Although we think there may be some connection between them when we see this scene, we still can't fully understand how similar they look
"In fact, as e!"
"The 34 year old actor gave birth to a daughter at the age of 18."
"Although Dasha doesn't look big enough to have a 15-year-old daughter, she does."
"It's blown out."
“… Imagine
"After a bit of digging, a twitter user found that the actor who played young Daya was actually polaco's 15-year-old daughter, Dasani Kristal Gonzalez!"
"However, some smart Internet detectives put on their detective caps, ignite their little gray cells (or, you know, Google) and try to find out if this similarity can be familial."
"The flashback shows us the 14-year-old Daya. My God, the similarity with polaco is incredible."
"In the eighth episode of the season, we learn more about Daya's relationship with her mother, aleda, who is played by Elizabeth Rodriguez."



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Chalamet said he refrained from talking about the choice to work on Allen's movie due to contractual obligations, although a report has claimed these restrictions don't actually exist in the contract.”
“It followed criticism of his decision to work with Allen, who was accused of sexual assault by his adopted daughter Dylan Farrow.”
“The money will go to Time's Up campaign, the Rape, Abuse & Incest National Network (RAINN), and New York's LGBT Center.”
“Last week, Chalamet announced on Instagram that he donated his salary from the upcoming Woody Allen film A Rainy Day in New York to charity.”
“Equality in the workplace, 50/50 by 2020, these are messages that are getting out there now."”
“"With the centralization, the Time's Up movement and hopefully at award shows like this, conversation's getting out there.”
“"I think at the level of campus sexual assault, for people my age this was a dialogue that was somewhat already happening.”
“News, standing alongside Lady Bird co-star Saoirse Ronan.”
“SEE ALSO: Timothée Chalamet was reportedly wrong about his contract silencing him on Woody Allen"Absolutely, and thank god it is," the 22-year-old actor told E!”
“With two nominations at the SAG Awards, Call Me By Your Name and Lady Bird star Timothée Chalamet was asked on the red carpet if the Time's Up movement against systemic sexual abuse in Hollywood had an effect on young men.”


"Chalamit said he didn't talk about choosing to work for Allen's film because of his contractual obligations, although a report claimed that the restrictions didn't actually exist in the contract."
Earlier, he was criticized for his decision to work with Allen, who was accused of sexual assault by his adopted daughter Dylan farrow
"The money will go to time's up campaign, the national network for rape, abuse and incest (rain) and the LGBT Center in New York."
"Last week, chalamit announced on instagram that he donated the salary of the upcoming Woody Allen film a rainy day in New York to charity."
"Equality in the workplace, 50 / 50 by 2020, is the message that is being conveyed now."
"With the centralization of power and the passage of time, it is hoped that people will talk more and more at awards ceremonies like this."
"I think at the level of sexual assault on campus, for people my age, it's a conversation that has already taken place."
"News, standing next to Mrs. Byrd's co star, Sayers Ronan."
"See also: it's reported that it's wrong for Timothy chalamit's contract to shut him up on Woody Allen's show," the 22-year-old actor told the Wall Street Journal! "
"With two sag nominations, Timothy chalamit, the star of" call me your name "and" Lady birdie, "was asked on the red carpet whether Hollywood's anti systemic abuse trend has affected young men



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...gospel artist Tasha Cobbs Leonard Top social artist BTS Top touring artist U2 Chart achievement award Camila Cabello Icon award Janet Jackson...”
“...duo group Imagine Dragons Top R B artist Bruno Mars Top rap artist Kendrick Lamar Top country artist Chris Stapleton Top rock artist Imagine Dragons Top Latin artist Ozuna Top dance electronic artist The Chainsmokers Top Christian artist MercyMe Top...”
“...by Kendrick Lamar Top artist Ed Sheeran Top new artist Khalid Top female artist Taylor Swift Top male artist Ed Sheeran Top streaming songs artist Kendrick Lamar Top song sales artist Ed Sheeran Top radio songs artist Ed Sheeran Top...”
“Top Hot 100 song: "Despacito" by Luis Fonsi and Daddy Yankee featuring Justin BieberTop Billboard 200 album: "DAMN."”
“Ed Sheeran, who was not at the show, won big, in categories that included top artist and top male artist, while Janet Jackson won the icon award.”
“LAS VEGAS -- Here are the winners in the top categories at the 2018 Billboard Music Awards, held Sunday at the MGM Grand Garden Arena in Las Vegas.”


“… Evangelical artist Tasha cobs Leonard top social artist BTS top roving artist U2 list achievement award Camilla Cabello idol award Janet Jackson... "
“… Duet group imagine dragons top RB artist Bruno Mars top rap artist Kendrick Lamar top country artist Chris Stapleton top rock artist imagine dragons top Latin artist ozuna top dance electronics artist chainmokers top Christian artist mercyme top... "
“… By Kendrick Lamar top artist ed Sheeran top new artist Khalid top female artist Taylor Swift top male artist ed Sheeran top streaming music artist Kendrick Lamar top song sales artist ed Sheeran top radio song artist ed Sheeran top... "
Top 100 songs: "despacito" by Louis fonsey and Yankee dad on Justin biebertop's billboard 200 Album: "Damn it."
"Ed Sheeran didn't take part in the show. He won awards including top artists and top male artists, while Janet Jackson won the idol award."
"Las Vegas - here are the winners of the 2018 Billboard Music Awards at the MGM Grand Garden Arena in Las Vegas on Sunday."



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: Princess Diana Once Wore a Lace Slip Dress with a Choker to the Met Gala...”
“Scroll through a list of surprising Met Gala omissions below, and see just whose debut you should be crossing your fingers for this year.”
“But despite this, there are 6 very famous women (some of them Vogue cover girls), who haven't RSVP'd yes yet.”
“Even Princess Diana herself walked the famed carpet, in a silk slip and choker, no less.”
“Admittedly, the list is somewhat small, but that's because just about everyone has been to at least one before.”
“But then there are the rare celebs who have never been to a Met Gala—which is saying something, considering the event has been around since 1948.”
“...big names to keep us entertained...”
“And while we re inevitably disappointed when some stars can t make it due to a filming conflict pregnancies or last minute vacation plans we re still upset about Beyoncé skipping this year s TBH there s always plenty of...”
“Year after year, A-listers walk the fashion-focused red carpet in their best rendition of the year's theme.”
“Some red carpet affairs are known to draw more big names than others, but one we can count on to constantly deliver the star power we crave is the Met Gala.”


"Video: Princess Diana once wore a lace dress with a necklace at a metropolitan party..."
"Scroll through the following list of surprising omissions from the met Party to see whose debut you should be praying for this year."
"However, there are still six very famous women (some of whom are cover girls of fashion magazine) who have not answered yet."
"Even Princess Diana herself walked on the famous carpet in silk notes and necklaces."
"Admittedly, the list is a little small, but that's because almost everyone has been there at least once before."
"However, considering that the London Metropolitan has been holding since 1948, few celebrities have never participated in the event, this is what we are talking about."
“… Let's have fun... "
"When some stars are unable to play because of shooting conflict, pregnancy or last-minute holiday plans, we will inevitably feel disappointed, but we still feel uneasy when Beyonce jumps over this year's TBH. There are always many..."
"Year after year, the first-line stars are walking on the red carpet with the theme of fashion, with their best interpretation of the theme of the year."
"As we all know, some red carpet events attract more celebrities than others, but one of the stars we can count on to continue to convey our desire is the metropolitan party."



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“The in a recent statement, the actress commented on her life after amicably divorcing from her husband: "I have three wonderful kids and my family is complete."”
“The two were also seen together on Easter, just a few days after news broke of their legal separation, and just last month they vacationed at Atlantis Paradise Island Resort in the Bahamas with their kids.”
“Splash NewsTheir joint celebration on the Fourth isn't Affleck and Garner's first reunion since filing for divorce.”
“In his telling Facebook post, he thanked Garner, calling her "my co-parent, Jen, who has supported me and cared for our kids as I've done the work I set out to do."”
“Their official separation was reported a month after Affleck revealed he completed a treatment for alcohol addiction.”
“Splash NewsThey exes first announced their separation in 2015, and filed for divorce in April 2017, where they both sought legal and physical joint custody of their children.”
“Affleck and Garner were seen spotted sharing a laugh from their seats as they watched the parade.”
“They were accompanied by their kids—Violet, 11, Seraphina, 8, and Samuel, 5—and their fluffy Golden Retriever.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
In a recent statement, the actress commented on her life after her friendly divorce from her husband: "I have three good children and my family is complete."
"On Easter day, just days after the news of their legal separation came out, the two were still seen together, and just last month, they took their children on holiday on the paradise island of Atlantis in the Bahamas."
"Their party on the 4th is not the first reunion since Affleck and Ghana filed for divorce."
In a post he told Facebook, he thanks Ghana, calling her "my co parent Jen, who supports me and takes care of our children just as I did what I started."
"It's reported that they officially separated one month after Affleck revealed that he had completed his alcohol treatment."
"Their predecessors announced their separation for the first time in 2015 and filed for divorce in April 2017, both seeking common legal and physical custody of their children."
"Alfred and garner were seen laughing in their seats as they watched the parade."
They are accompanied by 11 year old violet, 8-year-old Serafina and 5-year-old Samuel, as well as their fluffy golden retriever



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contributing: Bryan Alexander, The Associated Press...”
“She had been sober for six years.”
“She also discussed heartbreak in the documentary.”
“"I went on like a bender of like two months where I was using daily."”
“I was sneaking it on planes, sneaking it in bathrooms, sneaking it throughout the night — nobody knew," she said in the film.”
“"I wasn't ready to get sober.”
“In the documentary Lovato discussed her drug use.”
“She has spoken out about her battles over the years, detailing her recovery in the YouTube documentary "Simply Complicated," which was released last year.”
“Lovato has struggled with an eating disorder, self-mutilation and other issues, and entered rehab in 2010.”
“More:Celebrities tweet their support for Demi Lovato following possible drug overdoseIn June, the singer released "Sober, " a regretful ballad that has Lovato apologizing to her family and fans, admitting, "I'm so sorry, I'm not sober anymore."”


"By Brian Alexander, associated press..."
"She's been sober for six years."
"She also talked about heartbreak in the documentary."
"I'm like a drunkard, drinking every day."
"I'm sneaking on the plane, I'm sneaking in the bathroom, I'm sneaking all night - no one knows," she said in the film
"I'm not ready to wake up."
"In the documentary, Lovato discusses her drug use."
"In the YouTube documentary simple and complex released last year, she described in detail her years of fighting experience and her recovery."
"Lovato has been struggling with eating disorders, self mutilation and other issues, and entered the drug treatment center in 2010."
"More: Celebrity Weibo and their support for Demi Lovato after a possible drug overdose in June, the singer released a regretful ballad" sober up. "Lovato apologized to her family and fans, admitting," I'm sorry, I'm not sober anymore. "



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Debra also works out three times a week, which Healthy Celeb says involves spinning, weightlifting, circuit training, yoga and Pilates.”
“The only flower she is not allergic to is orchids.'”
“...her bathroom cabinet that help her to look her best Back again The starlet returned to screens in the Will Grace reboot earlier this year prompting many to marvel at her wrinkle free complexion Praise Fans of the actress have been taking to Twitter to comment on her youthful looks...”
“Moving forward Debra pictured left in 1990 and right in 2018 turned 50 in August and has now opened up about the secrets of maintaining her ageless appearance Routine Debra pictured in a 2000 episode of Will Grace admits that she has a rather impressive arsenal of pricey skincare in...”
“Debra then uses serums like the Niod Copper Amino Acid Isolate Serum $60 (£38) because it 'evens out my skintone'.”
“The actress then layers different essences - a staple of any Korean beauty routine - opting to rely on the Klairs Supple Preparation Facial Toner $22 (£22.99) and the Missha Time Revolution The First Treatment Essence $49 (£25.18).”
“Debra starts with a double cleanse of the Joanna Vargas Vitamin C Face Wash $40 (£32), followed by the iS Clinical Cleansing Complex $40 (£31.99) because, she says, 'They are both great for sensitive skin.'”
“While talking through the staples in her bathroom cabinet, the Will & Grace actress admitted she has 'so many [products] that I love', before giving a glimpse into the rather lengthy - and pricey - regimen she follows in order to keep her skin looking as young and fresh as possible.”
“But in a recent interview with Forbes, Messing opened up about a few more of the anti-aging weapons in her arsenal: her favorite skincare products.”
“So far it sounds pretty achievable – drinking water and sleeping is free for everyone.”


"Debra also exercises three times a week, which healthy celebrities say includes spinning, weight lifting, cycle training, yoga and pilates."
"The only flower she's not allergic to is orchid."
“… Her bathroom cabinet helped her get back to her best, and the actress's return to screen in "will grace" earlier this year surprised many with her wrinkle free complexion. Fans of the actress have been commenting on twitter about her young looks... "
"Looking ahead, Debra turned 50 in August, 2018, left in 1990, and now she has revealed the secret of keeping her looks the same. Debra admitted in a photo in the 2000 episode of will grace that she was It has a very impressive and expensive skin care product library. "
"Debra then uses serum like niod copper amino acid separation serum for $60 (38 pounds) because it balances my complexion."
"Then, the actress layered the different flavors - this is the main product of any Korean beauty Convention - choose to use Klairs softening conditioning facial toner 22 dollars (22.99 pounds) and Missha Time Revolution the first treatment essence 49 dollars (25.18 pounds)."
"Debra started with Joanna Vargas vitamin C Facial Cleanser for $40 (￡ 32), followed by is clinical cleansing complex for $40 (￡ 31.99) because she said they were good for sensitive skin."
"When it comes to staples in the bathroom cabinet, the will & Grace actress admits that she has a lot of [products] that I like, and then she takes a look at the rather long and expensive regimen she follows to make her skin look as young and fresh as possible."
"But in a recent interview with Forbes, messing revealed some of the anti-aging weapons in her treasure house: her favorite skin care products."
"So far, it sounds like it can be done - water and sleep are free for everyone."



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pre-order my new sci-fi novel Herokiller, and read my first series, The Earthborn Trilogy, which is also on audiobook.”
“Brian Yorkey, Joy Gorman, Mandy Teefey, Kristel Laiblin, Tom McCarthy, Steve Golin and Selena Gomez are returning as EPs.”
“The original run of the Netflix original was one of the most talked-about series of the year, often by fans who loved it, sometimes by critics who lamented how it handled its tough issues like suicide and rape.”
“But season 2 has come and gone with…almost no buzz at all.”
“It was a very, very strange phenomenon.”
“I don’t think I’d ever seen a show go from all anyone could talk about to a complete void of coverage for its sophomore season, yet that’s exactly what happened with 13 Reasons Why.”
“The theory was that, perhaps, after a relatively conclusive ending to season 1 (13 episodes, 13 tapes, the end), that simply no one was watching the second season.”
“But that appears not to be the case as Netflix has announced today that yes, 13 Reasons Why is returning for season 3.”
“They also gave these details alongside the announcement:Production on the new season will resume later this year.”
“The new season will premiere in 2019.”


Pre order my new science fiction "hero killer", read my first series, also in the audio book "the birth of the Earth Trilogy"
"Bryan joki, Joey Gorman, Mandy Tiffany, crystal leiblin, Tom McCarthy, Steve Goering and Serena Gomez will return as earnings per share."
"The original version of Netflix is one of the most watched series this year. It's often sought after by fans who love it, and sometimes by critics who lament how it deals with thorny issues such as suicide and rape."
"But the second season has come and gone There is hardly any excitement. "
"It's a very, very strange phenomenon."
"I don't think I've ever seen a show change from a topic that anyone can talk about to a completely unreported sophomore, but that's the truth. There are 13 reasons."
"The theory is that maybe after the end of the first season (13 episodes, 13 tapes, the end), no one will watch the second season."
"But that doesn't seem to be the case, because Netflix announced today that, yes, there are 13 reasons for the third quarter return."
"They also provided these details with Ann cement: production of the new season will resume later this year."
"The new season will premiere in 2019."



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...on June 29.”
“Season 2 of WAGS Miami premieres on E!”
“...show.”
““Lots of bling, candles everywhere and gold touches.”The couple got engaged during a November 2016 episode of the hit E!”
““Everything is very formal beach glamour, it’s a beach wedding, but still very glam,” Roberts told Us of her vision.”
“Their beach-glam wedding also featured lots of candles and gold touches.”
““I wanted to be able to dance the night away,” Roberts told Us.”
“It was perfect.”The bride wore two dresses for her big day: During the ceremony she opted for a Milady-designed mermaid gown, which featured bling everywhere, and for the reception, she changed into a Lena Bernisha-designed dress with a detachable train.”
““The island is close to Aruba, but closer to Venezuela and South America and it’s only a two-hour flight from Miami.”
““I really wanted to pick a place that no one I knew had been before … so it would be an experience not just for me and Phil, but for everyone,” Roberts told Us of the location ahead of their big day.”


“… 29 June. "
"Swing Miami" Season 2 premiere
“… Performance. "
"There's jewelry everywhere, candles and gold ornaments everywhere." The couple got engaged on the hit show E in November 2016! "
"It's all very formal beach glamour, it's a beach wedding, but it's still very dazzling," Roberts told us of her vision
"Their beach wedding also has a lot of candles and gold decorations."
"I want to dance at night," Roberts told us
"It's perfect." The bride wore two dresses on her big day: at the wedding, she chose a mermaid dress designed by miradi, which was full of shining decorations; at the reception, she changed into a dress designed by Lina bernissa with a detachable train
"The island is very close to Aruba, but closer to Venezuela and South America, only two hours' flight from Miami."
"I really want to choose a place that no one I know has been to So it's an experience not only for Phil and me, but for everyone, "Roberts told us about the site before their big day



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In an exclusive interview with Us Weekly, the Rocky Balboa star promised he is here for Us, saying he is open to giving heartbroken fans “hugs” following the devastating reveal.”
“Following the episode, upset fans tweeted about Crock-Pots, with many saying they refuse to use the household appliance.”
““The big game is fast approaching and for many of us, this day brings us an opportunity to gather with friends and family, loved ones we don’t get to see all that often,” Ventimiglia, who plays Jack Pearson on the hit show, begins.”
““But in 2018, gathering friends and family, well, it’s not as easy as what it used to be.”
“The country is divided.”
“Sometimes that can make it tough to find common ground but this year this year I think we should all take a deep breath find the ability to forgive and remind ourselves there is no difference so great that we can t overcome it the Gilmore Girls alum 39 concludes...”
“...before scooping chili out of a Crock Pot into a bowl as the hashtag CrockPotIsInnocent appears on the screen...”
“The promo is in response to the January 23 episode of This Is Us, which ended with Jack walking around the kitchen, tidying up.”
“Before heading to bed, he turns off the family’s Crock-Pot — but due to its old age and faulty switch, the slow cooker switched back on and started a fire that many believe took the beloved character’s life.”
“The outrage prompted series creator Dan Fogelman to tweet, “Taking a moment to remind everyone that it was a 20 year old fictional crockpot with an already funky switch?”


"In an exclusive interview with us weekly, the Rocky Balboa star promised that he would support us here and that he was willing to" hug "the sad fans after the disastrous Revelation
"After the incident, upset fans posted on Weibo about the jar, and many said they refused to use household appliances."
"The competition is about to start soon. For many of us, this day brings us an opportunity to get together with friends, family and relatives we don't see very often," said vanti Miglia, who plays Jack Pearson in the hit TV series Jack Pearson
"But in 2018, it's not as easy as it used to be to gather family and friends."
"The country is divided."
"Sometimes it's hard for us to find common ground, but this year I think we should all take a deep breath, find the ability to forgive, and remind ourselves that there's not much difference, we can't overcome it," concluded Gilmore alumni 39
“… When the crockpotisincent tag appears on the screen, before scooping the pepper out of the pot into the bowl... "
"This promo is aimed at the plot of Jack walking around the kitchen and picking up things in" this is us "broadcast on January 23
"Before going to bed, he turned off the pot at home - but because the pot was in disrepair and the switch failed, the slow pan was turned on again, causing a fire that many people think took the life of this beloved character."
Anger prompted Dan fogman, creator of the series, to tweet: "take a moment to remind you that this is a 20-year-old fictional crocodile with a fashionable switch?"



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Podcast of 2018 Amy Schumer Presents 3 Girls 1 Keith Scrubbing in With Becca Tilley Tanya Rad Anna Faris Is Unqualified LADYGANG Chicks in the Office...”
“Ellen DeGeneres Chrissy Teigen BTS Taylor Swift Selena Gomez Comedy Act of 2018 Kevin Hart Tiffany Haddish Ali Wong Marlon Wayans Amy Schumer Style Star of 2018 Zendaya Blake Lively Emma Watson Beyoncé Harry Styles Game Changer of 2018 Colin Kaepernick Serena Williams Cristiano Ronaldo Aly Raisman Nia Jax Pop...”
“Well, Sunday's People's Choice Awards may be the ceremony for you.”
“Honoring popular film, TV, music and even podcasts, this is the award show where we, the people, determine the year's best in entertainment.”
“After airing more than three decades on CBS, the People's Choice Awards have a new home at the E!”
“...network.”
“You can watch the ceremony live on E!, beginning at 9 p.m. EST Sunday, November 11.”
“Check out the full list of nominees below.”
“Movie of 2018 Black Panther Avengers Infinity War Incredibles 2 Fifty Shades Freed A Quiet Place Comedy Movie of 2018 Love Simon Blockers The Spy Who Dumped Me Mamma Mia Here We Go Again Crazy Rich Asians Action Movie of 2018 Black Panther Avengers Infinity War Deadpool 2 Jurassic World...”
“Fallen Kingdom Ocean s 8 Drama Movie of 2018 Fifty Shades Freed 12 Strong Red Sparrow Midnight Sun A Quiet Place Family Movie of 2018 Incredibles 2 A Wrinkle in Time Hotel Transylvania 3 I Can Only Imagine Christopher Robin Male Movie Star of 2018 Chris Hemsworth Avengers Infinity War...”


"2018 podcast Amy Schumer introduces three girls 1 Keith and Becca Tilly Tanya rad together. Anna Faris is an unqualified lady in the office..."
"Ellen DeGeneres Chrissy Teigen BTS Taylor Swift Selena Gomez comedy performance 2018 Kevin harttiffany haddish Ali Wang Malone Wayans Amy Schumer style 2018 zendaya Blake Lively Emma Watson Beyonce Harry style 2018 game changer Colin kapenick Serena Williams Cristiano Ronaldo alilesman NIA Jax popular..."
"Well, Sunday's people's choice award may be your ceremony."
"This is an award ceremony for popular movies, TV, music and even podcasts, where our people decide the best entertainment of the year."
"More than 30 years after CBS broadcast, people's choice award is in E!"
“… Network. "
"You can live the ceremony online! From 9 p.m. on Sunday, November 11, EST. "
"Please see the full nomination list below."
"Movie 2018 Panther Avenger Infinite War incredible 250 shadows liberate a quiet place comedy movie 2018 love Simon blockade who dumped my spy Mamma Mia here we go crazy rich Asian action movie 2018 Panther Avenger infinite war dead pool 2 Jurassic world..."
"The ocean of the fallen kingdom in 2018 the eighth drama movie" Fifty shadows "released 12 strong red sparrows" midnight sun "quiet place in 2018 family movie" incredible "2" wrinkles in time "Transylvania Hotel 3 I can only imagine Christopher Robin, actor Chris Hemsworth in 2018, endless war of Avengers..."



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I'M JEALOUS OF REGULAR KIDS WHEN … "They get to walk around and no one recognizes them."”
“We just want to inspire young kids like us that they can do anything."”
“Obviously, Brown went with ABC's Black-ish, on which he and Martin play twins.”
“Now, the pair are breaking into film, with Brown starring in indie Emmett alongside Rita Wilson ?as Martin drives a new project ?of her own.”
“After firing the agent who suggested she just chill and take a break during a hiatus the executive producer of 2019 s Little conceived the film a twist on Tom Hanks iconic comedy Big and even convinced Issa Rae to...”
“...star alongside her in the Universal feature...”
“BROWNTHE SHOW OR MOVIE THAT MADE ME WANT TO ACT Space JamI'D LOVE TO STAR IN A REMAKE OF … "Space Jam.”
“I know you're doing it, LeBron!"”
“LAST SHOW I BINGED "When Stranger Things season two came out I literally watched the whole season while my dad was shopping at some suit store.”
“We were there for a long time!"”


"I envy ordinary children..." They walked around and no one recognized them
"We just want to motivate kids like us to do everything."
"It's clear that Brown is co starring with ABC's black man, and he and Martin are twins in the film."
"Now, the two are entering the film industry, brown and Rita Wilson starring in the independent film" Emmett "? Martin's starting a new project? Her own. "
"After dismissing the agent who advised her to take a break, the executive producer of little girl in 2019 conceived a film adapted from Tom Hanks' iconic comedy big man, and even convinced Issa ray..."
“… With her in universal movies... "
"Brown made me want to be in a space jam show or movie. I really want to be in a remake..." "Space Jam"
"I know what you're doing, LeBron!"
On the last show I binge "when strangers' things come out in the second season, I really watched the whole season, while my father was shopping in some clothing stores."
"We've been there a long time!"



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jennifer Lawrence wore a metallic floor-draping Dior gown.”
“It was stunning.”
“(Photo by Frazer Harrison/Getty Images)HOLLYWOOD, CA – MARCH 04: Salma Hayek attends the 90th Annual Academy Awards at Hollywood & Highland Center on March 4, 2018 in Hollywood, California.”
“(Photo by Frazer Harrison/Getty Images)HOLLYWOOD, CA – MARCH 04: Jane Fonda attends the 90th Annual Academy Awards at Hollywood & Highland Center on March 4, 2018 in Hollywood, California.”
“(Photo by Neilson Barnard/Getty Images)HOLLYWOOD, CA – MARCH 04: Ashley Judd attends the 90th Annual Academy Awards at Hollywood & Highland Center on March 4, 2018 in Hollywood, California.”
“(Photo by Richard Shotwell/Invision/AP)HOLLYWOOD, CA – MARCH 04: Allison Williams attends the 90th Annual Academy Awards at Hollywood & Highland Center on March 4, 2018 in Hollywood, California.”
“(Photo by Frazer Harrison/Getty Images)Mary J. Blige arrives at the Oscars on Sunday, March 4, 2018, at the Dolby Theatre in Los Angeles.”
“(Photo by Kevork Djansezian/Getty Images)HOLLYWOOD, CA – MARCH 04: Allison Williams attends the 90th Annual Academy Awards at Hollywood & Highland Center on March 4, 2018 in Hollywood, California.”
“(Photo by Jordan Strauss/Invision/AP)HOLLYWOOD, CA – MARCH 04: Margot Robbie attends the 90th Annual Academy Awards at Hollywood & Highland Center on March 4, 2018 in Hollywood, California.”


"Jennifer Lawrence is wearing a metal floor Dior dress."
"Great."
"(Frazer Harrison / Getty Images) Hollywood, California – March 4: Salma Hayek attends the 90th Academy Awards ceremony at Hollywood Highland Center, California, on March 4, 2018."
(Frazer Harrison / Getty Images) Hollywood, California - March 4: Jane Fonda attends the 90th Academy Awards ceremony at Hollywood Highland Center, California, on March 4, 2018
(Nelson Barnard / Getty Images) Hollywood, California - March 4, 2018: Ashley Judd attends the 90th Academy Awards ceremony at Hollywood Highland Center, California, on March 4, 2018
(Richard shotwell / invasion / AP Photo) Hollywood, California - March 4: Alison Williams attends the 90th Academy Awards ceremony at Hollywood Highland Center, California on March 4, 2018
(Fraser Harrison / Getty pictures) Mary J. blich arrives at the Academy Awards ceremony at the Dolby theater in Los Angeles on Sunday, March 4, 2018
(kevork djansezian / Getty Images) Hollywood, California – March 4: Alison Williams attends the 90th Academy Awards ceremony on March 4, 2018 at Hollywood Highland Center, California. "
(Jordan Strauss / invasion / AP) Hollywood, California - March 4: March 4, 2018, Margot Robbie attends the 90th Academy Awards ceremony at Hollywood Highland Center, California



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.2422680412371134
Correct number is  47
Total number is  194
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
